Maine, session 132, LD2212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund Z263
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position previously
established in Public Law 2023, chapter 683 through June 30, 2028 and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $129,510
All Other $0 $9,453
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $138,963
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund Z263
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($546,225)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($546,225)
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund Z263
Page 1 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($64,853)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($64,853)
Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement Reserve Fund
0883
Initiative: Provides funding for capital construction and repair for state-owned buildings.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Central Fleet Management 0703
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position.
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $18,628
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $0 $18,628
Developmental Services Oversight and Advisory Board Z363
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine Developmental Services Oversight and Advisory
Board to meet the requirements of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 34-B, section 1223.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $58,715
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $58,715
Developmental Services Oversight and Advisory Board Z363
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Developmental Services Oversight and
Advisory Board to meet the requirements of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 34-B, section
1223.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $58,715
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $58,715
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Human Resource Assistant position, previously
continued by Financial Order 004351 F6, through June 19, 2027.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $102,746
All Other $0 $6,065
Page 2 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $0 $108,811
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Senior Staff
Accountant position to a Senior Staff Accountant Supervisory position.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,775
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $0 $5,775
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Continues one Accounting Analyst position, previously continued by Financial
Order 004369 F6, through June 19, 2027, to assist the Natural Resources Service Center in
addressing an increased financial management workload.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $104,780
All Other $0 $6,065
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $0 $110,845
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding to train state employees to safely,
responsibly and effectively use artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $450,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $450,000
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding for data management and governance
practice.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $908,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $908,000
Public Improvements - Planning/Construction - Administration 0057
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $11,778
Page 3 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $11,778
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Management Analyst
II position to a Procurement Analyst Manager position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,213
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $8,213
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Adjusts funding by increasing General Fund appropriations and decreasing
Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery funds in the All Other line
category within the Revenue Services, Bureau of program in order to reverse an increase
and reduction in Public Law 2023, chapter 643 for fiscal year 2024-25 that was meant to
be one time.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $0 ($5,000,000)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $0 ($5,000,000)
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Business Systems
Administrator position to a Tax Section Manager position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $15,384
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $15,384
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Reduces allocations for the Bureau of Revenue Services for the Maine Military
Family Relief Fund voluntary income tax return checkoff.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($5,500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($5,500)
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Page 4 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for administrative expenses to update the State's tax
and administration system for a new optional account type for pass-through entities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $438,771
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $438,771
Risk Management - Claims 0008
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator I position to assist with the increased
number of claims and insurance services to state agencies and quasi-state agencies.
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $125,102
All Other $0 $6,065
__________ __________
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND TOTAL $0 $131,167
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $6,949,576
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $1,522,385
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $0 ($5,000,000)
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES $0 $225,431
FUND
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND $0 $131,167
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL $0 $18,628
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $3,847,187
Sec. A-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Contract/Grant Manager position previously
continued by Financial Order CV0824 F6 to create sustained capacity within the bureau to
administer both one-time and ongoing financial assistance programs. This position will
end on June 19, 2027.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $67,698
All Other $0 $3,388
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $71,086
Page 5 - 132LR3049(37)

Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 32 Consumer Protection
Inspector positions from range 23 to range 24, retroactive to December 18, 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $338,659
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $338,659
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $57,187
All Other $0 $2,858
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $60,045
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $31,281
All Other $0 $1,563
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $32,844
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of one Natural Resource
Marketing and Economic Development Specialist position from range 32 to range 35,
retroactive to August 4, 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $45,954
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $45,954
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Forest Fire Prevention
Specialist positions from range 24 to range 26. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $23,752
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $23,752
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $9,302
All Other $0 $312
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $9,614
Forest Resource Management Z233
Page 6 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position for landowner outreach from Federal
Expenditures Fund to General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $131,964
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $131,964
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($131,964)
All Other $0 ($6,605)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($138,569)
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Transfers one Resource Management Coordinator position serving as an urban
and community forestry program coordinator from Federal Expenditures Fund to General
Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $134,596
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $134,596
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($134,596)
All Other $0 ($6,737)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($141,333)
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Entomologist II position from 50% General Fund and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $55,059
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $55,059
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($55,059)
All Other $0 ($2,756)
__________ __________
Page 7 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($57,815)
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Natural Resource Pathologist position from 80%
General Fund and 20% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund within the same
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $26,157
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $26,157
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($26,157)
All Other $0 ($1,310)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($27,467)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Increases Legislative Count for one Senior Planner position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Harness Racing Commission 0320
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($872,337)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($872,337)
Harness Racing Commission 0320
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($616,888)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($616,888)
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Director Real Property Management position from
50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Land Management and Planning program and
50% General Fund in the Parks - General Operations program to 100% General Fund in
the Parks - General Operations program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 8 - 132LR3049(37)

Personal Services $0 ($61,842)
All Other $0 ($2,754)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($64,596)
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Director Bureau of Parks and Lands position from
50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Land Management and Planning program and
50% General Fund in the Parks - General Operations program to 100% General Fund in
the Parks - General Operations program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($119,000)
All Other $0 ($5,298)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($124,298)
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for public lands operational expenses.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,250,000
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Senior Technician
position to a Lead Technician position. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $11,536
All Other $0 $514
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $12,050
Milk Commission 0188
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($1,654,305)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($1,654,305)
Milk Commission 0188
Initiative: Increases funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,283,036
__________ __________
Page 9 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,283,036
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $804,726
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $804,726
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($8,241)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($8,241)
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Director Real Property Management position from
50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Land Management and Planning program and
50% General Fund in the Parks - General Operations program to 100% General Fund in
the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $61,842
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $61,842
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Director Bureau of Parks and Lands position from
50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Land Management and Planning program and
50% General Fund in the Parks - General Operations program to 100% General Fund in
the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $119,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $119,000
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Park Manager II
position to a Park Manager III position, retroactive to April 16, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $18,909
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $18,909
Pesticides Control - Board of 0287
Page 10 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers one Environmental Specialist III position and reallocates the cost from
50% Federal Expenditures Fund and 50% Other Special Revenue Funds to 100% Other
Special Revenue Funds within the same program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($60,003)
All Other $0 ($3,004)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($63,007)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $60,003
All Other $0 $3,004
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $63,007
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $3,205,892
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($358,532)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($73,916)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $2,773,444
Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Development Program
Officer position to a Director Special Projects position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,031
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $16,031
Sec. A-4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Page 11 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Research Assistant
MSEA-B position from range 20 to range 22 retroactive to May 7, 2025 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,336
All Other $0 $218
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $16,554
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 3 Research Assistant MSEA-
B positions from range 22 to range 29, retroactive to September 3, 2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $211,394
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $211,394
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Reallocates 4 Attorney General Detective positions, 3 Assistant Attorney
General positions, one Auditor III position, one Research Assistant MSEA-B position and
one Senior Attorney General Detective position from 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to
75% Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% Other Special Revenue Funds within the same
program. This initiative also reallocates funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($436,532)
All Other $0 ($12,560)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($449,092)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $436,532
All Other $0 $12,560
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $449,092
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Establishes one Research Assistant MSEA-B position to support the criminal
division and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $95,457
All Other $0 $9,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $104,957
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Page 12 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Establishes one Assistant Attorney General position dedicated to legal issues
related to housing and mobile home parks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $145,962
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $145,962
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funds for the prospective costs for employees in the employment of the
Office of Chief Medical Examiner within the Department of the Attorney General to
participate in the 1998 Special Plan effective August 1, 2026.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $34,051
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $34,051
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Allocates funds for the prospective costs for employees in the employment of
the Office of Chief Medical Examiner within the Department of the Attorney General to
participate in the 1998 Special Plan effective August 1, 2026.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $1,064
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,064
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: Eliminates 4 Assistant District Attorney positions.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (4.000)
Personal Services $0 ($573,921)
All Other $0 ($15,852)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($589,773)
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: Provides funding for so-called kiosk licenses for all prosecutors required to use
the State's new human resources and payroll system and related STA-CAP charges.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,745
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $12,745
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Assistant District Attorney position
previously continued by Financial Order 004372 F6 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
Page 13 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $220,914
All Other $0 $5,897
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $226,811
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for so-called kiosk licenses for all prosecutors
required to use the State's new human resources and payroll system and related STA-CAP
charges.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,745
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $12,745
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of one Research Assistant
MSEA-B position from range 20 to range 22 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,453
All Other $0 $291
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $7,744
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Research Assistant
MSEA-B position to a Research Assistant MSEA-D position retroactive to October 7, 2024
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $23,919
All Other $0 $331
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $24,250
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $350,402
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($1,021,247)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $879,349
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $208,504
Sec. A-5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 14 - 132LR3049(37)

AUDITOR, OFFICE OF THE STATE
Audit Bureau 0067
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
I position from range 25 to range 28.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,669
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $8,669
Sec. A-6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($224,076)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($224,076)
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($25,988)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($25,988)
MCCS Free Community College - Two Enrollment Years Z335
Initiative: Provides funding for the State's 7 community colleges to continue offering
student scholarships through the State's free community college tuition program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,500,000
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $2,500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($250,064)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $2,249,936
Page 15 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. A-7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $6,899
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $6,899
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's agriculture program to support current
growth.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $76,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $76,000
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $6,899
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $6,899
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides funding for transitional housing for formerly incarcerated clients to
reduce recidivism and help with stability while reintegrating into the community.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $83,820
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $83,820
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,679
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $10,679
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for transitional housing for formerly incarcerated
clients to reduce recidivism and help with stability while reintegrating into the community.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $83,820
Page 16 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $83,820
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,679
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $10,679
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: Transfers funding for electricity, central fleet and insurance costs from the
Bolduc Correctional Facility program to the State Prison program within the same fund due
to the merging of appropriations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($236,106)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($236,106)
Correctional Center 0162
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $58,428
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $58,428
Correctional Center 0162
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $58,428
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $58,428
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,768
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,768
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,768
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,768
Page 17 - 132LR3049(37)

Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $147
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $147
Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $147
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $147
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $22,600
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $22,600
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $22,600
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $22,600
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $24,907
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $24,907
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $24,907
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $24,907
Office of Victim Services 0046
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $443
Page 18 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $443
Office of Victim Services 0046
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $443
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $443
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Provides funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $111,085
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $111,085
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Transfers funding for electricity, central fleet and insurance costs from the
Bolduc Correctional Facility program to the State Prison program within the same fund due
to the merging of appropriations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $236,106
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $236,106
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for management insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $111,085
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $111,085
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $641,552
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $76,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $717,552
Sec. A-8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Page 19 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $50,937,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $50,937,000
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Establishes one Biologist II position effective July 1, 2026 and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $125,594
All Other $0 $5,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $130,594
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Business Systems
Administrator position to a Business Systems Administrator II position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $10,168
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $10,168
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Heavy Vehicle and
Equipment Technician position to a Supervisor Grounds & Transportation Services
position and reallocates the cost from 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 75% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $26,017
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $26,017
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($18,269)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($18,269)
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Electronic Security System Technician position from
73% Federal Expenditures Fund and 27% General Fund to 75% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($1,876)
__________ __________
Page 20 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($1,876)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $1,876
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,876
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Building Maintenance Coordinator position from
73% Federal Expenditures Fund and 27% General Fund to 75% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($2,165)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,165)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,165
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,165
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost one Office Specialist II position from 27%
General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures Fund
within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($28,449)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($28,449)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $28,449
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $28,449
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Maintenance Mechanic position from
27% General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures
Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($22,952)
__________ __________
Page 21 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($22,952)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $22,952
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $22,952
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Building Maintenance Coordinator position from
47% Federal Expenditures Fund and 53% General Fund to 50% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 50% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($2,401)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,401)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,401
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,401
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one High Voltage Electrician Supervisor
position from 27% General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 75% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($2,559)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,559)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $2,559
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,559
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Maintenance Mechanic position from
27% General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 75% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($1,429)
Page 22 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($1,429)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $1,429
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,429
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Auto Mechanic II position from 27%
General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures Fund
within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($23,532)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($23,532)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $23,532
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $23,532
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Maintenance Mechanic Supervisor
position from 27% General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 75% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($2,199)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,199)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $2,199
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,199
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager III position from 73%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 27% General Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures Fund
within the same program.
Page 23 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($51,777)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($51,777)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $51,777
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $51,777
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Building Mechanical Systems Specialist
position from 27% General Fund and 73% Federal Expenditures Fund to 75% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($2,074)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,074)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $2,074
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,074
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Warehouse Superintendent position from 73%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 27% General Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures Fund
within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($23,459)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($23,459)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $23,459
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $23,459
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Auto Mechanic II
position to an Auto Mechanic III position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $13,015
Page 24 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $13,015
Veterans' Homelessness Prevention Partnership Fund Z298
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Veterans Services program, Other Special Revenue
Funds and increases funding in the Veterans' Homelessness Prevention Partnership Fund
program, Other Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Provides funding for the Staff Sergeant Parker Gordon Fox suicide prevention
grant program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $750,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $750,000
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Specialist I
position to an Auditor II position and increases the hours from 60 hours to 80 hours
biweekly.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $25,191
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $25,191
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Veterans Services program, Other Special Revenue
Funds and increases funding in the Veterans' Homelessness Prevention Partnership Fund
program, Other Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($4,120)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($4,120)
Page 25 - 132LR3049(37)

DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 ($138,855)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $52,012,571
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($4,120)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $51,869,596
Sec. A-9. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DISABILITY RIGHTS MAINE
Disability Rights Maine 0523
Initiative: Provides funding for increased costs for inflation, rental and lease agreements,
supplies, sign language interpreters, professional insurance, travel, health insurance and
cost-of-living wage increases.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $20,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $20,000
Disability Rights Maine 0523
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for increased costs for inflation, rental and lease
agreements, supplies, sign language interpreters, professional insurance, travel, health
insurance and cost-of-living wage increases.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $20,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $20,000
DISABILITY RIGHTS MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $40,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $40,000
Sec. A-10. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
Page 26 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $636,532
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $636,532
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($254,894)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($254,894)
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $381,638
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $381,638
Sec. A-11. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Building Assets Reducing Risks Program N582
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Building Assets, Reducing Risks kindergarten
to grade 12 coaching and training program in Maine schools.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Child Development Services 0449
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a baseline allocation.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Climate Education Professional Development Pilot Program Fund Z361
Initiative: Continues one State Education Representative position, previously established
by Resolve 2021, chapter 178, through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All
Other costs. This initiative also transfers the position from the Climate Education
Professional Development Pilot Program Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds to
the Office of Innovation program, General Fund and reduces All Other allocations in the
Page 27 - 132LR3049(37)

Climate Education Professional Development Pilot Program Fund program, Other Special
Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($12,185)
All Other $0 ($8,784)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($20,969)
Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program N583
Initiative: Provides funding to establish 2 Education Specialist II positions and for related
All Other costs to support a grant program to allow school administrative units to enter into
agreements with providers of off-site public preschool programs to provide students in
those programs with breakfast, lunch and a snack.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $217,430
All Other $0 $18,656
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $236,086
Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program N583
Initiative: Provides one-time, nonlapsing funding for a grant program to allow school
administrative units to enter into agreements with providers of off-site public preschool
programs to provide students in those programs with breakfast, lunch and a snack.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $375,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $375,000
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Transfers one seasonal part-time Teacher Aide position from the Federal
Expenditures Fund to the General Fund within the same program and reorganizes the
position to a seasonal part-time Education Technician II position. This initiative also
provides All Other funding in the Federal Expenditures Fund to maintain the allocation.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.000 0.707
Personal Services $0 $42,145
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $42,145
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.000 (0.707)
Personal Services $0 ($38,385)
All Other $0 $38,385
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Page 28 - 132LR3049(37)

Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Transfers one Teacher BS position from the Federal Expenditures Fund to the
General Fund within the same program and transfers and reallocates the cost of one Teacher
MS position from 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General
Fund within the same program. This initiative also provides All Other funding in the
Federal Expenditures Fund to maintain the allocation.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $126,005
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $126,005
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (2.000)
Personal Services $0 ($126,005)
All Other $0 $126,005
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to update mechanical, electrical and plumbing
systems and complete minor renovations at a state-owned building in the unorganized
territory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $145,482
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $145,482
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to update outdoor play areas in 3 state-owned schools
in the unorganized territory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $185,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $185,000
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides funding to establish an allocation to properly record child nutrition
expenditures.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $320,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $320,000
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Page 29 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding for the annual purchase of one school bus to maintain an
updated fleet of school buses.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $130,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $130,000
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the annual purchase of one school bus to maintain
an updated fleet of school buses.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $130,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $130,000
Education Stabilization Fund Z339
Initiative: Allocates funding to prevent any reduction in the state share percentage of the
statewide adjusted total cost of the components of essential programs and services that
would otherwise result from insufficient General Fund appropriations or any other shortage
of funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $31,250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $31,250,000
Federal Programs Team Z081
Initiative: Reduces funding for an annual contract with the Maine Education Policy
Research Institute.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($250,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($250,000)
Federal Programs Team Z081
Initiative: Continues one limited-period State Education Representative position, one
limited-period Education Specialist III position and 2 limited-period Education Specialist
II positions previously continued by Public Law 2025, chapter 388 through December 30,
2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs and grant activities.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $223,117
All Other $0 $902,688
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,125,805
Federal Programs Team Z081
Page 30 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers one Education Specialist III position, related All Other costs and
program administration costs from the Federal Expenditures Fund to Other Special
Revenue Funds within the same program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($129,575)
All Other $0 ($42,256)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($171,831)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $129,575
All Other $0 $42,256
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $171,831
Fund for the Efficient Delivery of Educational Services Z005
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected resources as funding is no
longer available.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one limited-period Education Specialist II
position previously established by Financial Order 004467 F6 and reduces All Other to
fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $109,827
All Other $0 ($109,827)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($2,011,360)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($2,011,360)
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Page 31 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one limited-period Agency Procurement and
Program Administrator position previously established by Financial Order 004466 F6 and
reduces All Other to fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $128,674
All Other $0 ($128,674)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding to maintain the statutory requirement of funding the state share
of the total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 at 55%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $45,966,181
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $45,966,181
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $15,527
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $15,527
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to school districts to stabilize school budgets for
schools with a high proportion of economically disadvantaged students.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $8,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $8,000,000
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding to expand the department's artificial
intelligence guidance toolkit and to provide grants to school administrative units,
nonprofits, universities and professional organizations that provide professional
development or planning to educators related to artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $212,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $212,000
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Page 32 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one limited-period State Education
Representative position previously continued by Financial Order 004383 F6 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $152,199
All Other $0 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $161,527
Learning Through Technology Z029
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for school administrative units to support costs
associated with prohibiting the use of personal electronic devices during the school day.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $350,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $350,000
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position through
June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $129,995
All Other $0 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $139,323
Office of Innovation Z333
Initiative: Continues one State Education Representative position, previously established
by Resolve 2021, chapter 178, through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All
Other costs. This initiative also transfers the position from the Climate Education
Professional Development Pilot Program Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds to
the Office of Innovation program, General Fund and reduces All Other allocations in the
Climate Education Professional Development Pilot Program Fund program, Other Special
Revenue Funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $152,199
All Other $0 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $161,527
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine Career Pathways program to provide participants
with opportunities to complete certifications and credentials to meet the workforce needs
of employers and their local and regional economies.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 33 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $250,000
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Adjusts funding for debt service costs associated with the bonding authority
granted in Public Law 2021, chapter 635, Part X for career and technical education centers
and regions. This initiative also provides one-time funding for the overhead costs of 2
limited-period positions supporting career and technical education bonds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($992,995)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($992,995)
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Manager II position from range 30 to range 32 retroactive to December 29, 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $48,699
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $48,699
School Facilities Z271
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $146,119
All Other $0 $13,565
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $159,684
Special Services Team Z080
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Education Specialist
III position to a State Education Representative position retroactive to September 19, 2024
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $22,481
All Other $0 $242
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $22,723
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $57,165,980
Page 34 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $976,697
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $30,134,713
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $88,277,390
Sec. A-12. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, STATE BOARD OF
State Board of Education 0614
Initiative: Provides a baseline allocation to allow for the expenditure of funds in the event
private grant funding is received.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Sec. A-13. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENERGY RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator II position,
previously continued by Public Law 2025, chapter 388 under the former Governor's Energy
Office program within the Executive Department, to support energy program management
initiatives and related grant management, programming, communications and external
engagement. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $120,138
All Other $0 $8,568
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $128,706
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $9,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $9,531
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding provided in Public Law 2025, chapter 388 for
various initiatives from the former Governor's Energy Office program, General Fund
within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy Resources program, General
Fund within the Department of Energy Resources.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,500,000
Page 35 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,500,000
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Transfers one Commissioner of The Department of Energy Resources from the
Federal Expenditures Fund to the General Fund within the same program and transfers and
reallocates one Deputy Commissioner of The Department of Energy Resources from Other
Special Revenue Funds to the General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $449,682
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $449,682
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($428,514)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($428,514)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($21,185)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($21,185)
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position from range 32 to range 33.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,758
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $6,758
Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program Z453
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Distributed Solar and Energy
Storage Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Executive Department to the
Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the
Department of Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy & Econ Development Prog Z454
Page 36 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Maine Offshore Wind Renewable
Energy and Economic Development Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the
Executive Department to the Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy & Econ
Development Prog program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Department of
Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Offshore Wind Research Consortium Fund Z452
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Offshore Wind Research
Consortium Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Executive Department
to the Offshore Wind Research Consortium Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds
within the Department of Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
ENERGY RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,956,440
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($299,808)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($10,154)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,646,478
Sec. A-14. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Policy Development
Specialist position to a Public Service Coordinator II position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $10,680
All Other $0 $483
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $11,163
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: Provides funding in the Air Quality program and in the Performance Partnership
Grant program for the approved reclassification of one Environmental Specialist IV
Page 37 - 132LR3049(37)

position to a Policy Development Specialist position retroactive to March 2024 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $24,171
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $24,171
Land Resources Z188
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Biologist I position to
an Environmental Specialist III position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($5,169)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($5,169)
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position retroactive to September
2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $28,874
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $28,874
Performance Partnership Grant 0851
Initiative: Provides funding in the Air Quality program and in the Performance Partnership
Grant program for the approved reclassification of one Environmental Specialist IV
position to a Policy Development Specialist position retroactive to March 2024 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $24,172
All Other $0 $297
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $24,469
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Environmental
Engineer position to an Environmental Engineer Specialist position and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $9,923
All Other $0 $449
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $10,372
Page 38 - 132LR3049(37)

ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $47,876
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $24,469
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $21,535
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $93,880
Sec. A-15. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program Z388
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Distributed Solar and Energy
Storage Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Executive Department to the
Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the
Department of Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding provided in Public Law 2025, chapter 388 for
various initiatives from the former Governor's Energy Office program, General Fund
within the Executive Department to the Department of Energy Resources program, General
Fund within the Department of Energy Resources.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($1,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($1,500,000)
Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy and Economic Development Program
Z389
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Maine Offshore Wind Renewable
Energy and Economic Development Program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the
Executive Department to the Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy & Econ
Development Prog program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Department of
Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Page 39 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position and related
All Other costs from the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future program within the
Executive Department to the State Resilience Fund program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, within the same fund, and continues this position through September
30, 2029.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($162,086)
All Other $0 ($8,762)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($170,848)
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position to coordinate
development and implementation of state policies, practices and partnerships related to
artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $151,465
All Other $0 $16,335
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $167,800
Offshore Wind Research Consortium Fund Z314
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the former Offshore Wind Research
Consortium Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds within the Executive Department
to the Offshore Wind Research Consortium Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds
within the Department of Energy Resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 ($1,332,200)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($170,848)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($1,500)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 ($1,504,548)
Sec. A-16. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Dairy Improvement Fund Z143
Page 40 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($31,944)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($31,944)
Dairy Improvement Fund Z143
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $593
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $593
Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Program Fund Z330
Initiative: Eliminates allocations in the Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment
Program Fund program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($500)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($500)
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($500)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($31,851)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 ($32,351)
Sec. A-17. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Additional Support for People in Retraining and Employment 0146
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator II position to a Public Service Manager II position in the Additional Support
for People in Retraining and Employment program, Federal Block Grant Fund and also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
Page 41 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $11,581
All Other $0 $362
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $11,943
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Social Services
Manager I position to a Social Services Program Manager position in the Child Care
Services program, retroactive to February 27, 2024. This initiative also provides funding
for a one-time retroactive payment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,043
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $16,043
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the Maine Child Care Affordability Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $10,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Child Support 0100
Initiative: Eliminates 5 Human Services Enforcement Agent positions in the Department
of Health and Human Services, Office of Family Independence, funded 34% General Fund
and 66% Federal Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (5.000)
Personal Services $0 ($168,789)
All Other $0 ($12,335)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($181,124)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($327,579)
All Other $0 ($23,945)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($351,524)
Consent Decree Z204
Page 42 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding to achieve parity with MaineCare cost-of-living adjustments
for certain community behavioral health-related services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $44,460
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $44,460
Crisis Outreach Program Z216
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the increase in the employer retirement
contribution costs created as a result of allowing employees of the Department of Health
and Human Services who provide crisis outreach and crisis services to adults with
developmental disabilities or intellectual disabilities in a community-based or residential
setting to participate in the 1998 Special Plan.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $26,125
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $26,125
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Social Services Manager I position from 100%
General Fund to 60% General Fund and 40% Other Special Revenue Funds within the same
program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($49,133)
All Other $0 ($2,902)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($52,035)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $49,133
All Other $0 $4,529
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $53,662
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: Reduces funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
III position to a Public Service Coordinator I position, transfers and reallocates the cost of
the position from 60% General Fund and 40% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations program to 50% General
Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program
and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($101,653)
All Other $0 ($4,354)
__________ __________
Page 43 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($106,007)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($67,768)
All Other $0 ($5,111)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($72,879)
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,877,204
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $12,877,204
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,506,525
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,506,525
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding to replenish 15 reserve slots for individuals who have been
determined Priority 1 waiver program candidates under the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 21, Home and Community Benefits for
Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum Disorder.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $942,205
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $942,205
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,880,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $12,880,000
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
Page 44 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,601,826
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,601,826
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,879,375
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,879,375
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $782,710
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $782,710
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $4,000
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,880,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,880,000
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $295,468
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $295,468
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Page 45 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate
for fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $154,206
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $154,206
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate
for fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $851
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $851
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate for
fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $266
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $266
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate for
fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $202,847
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $202,847
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund
and the Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund due
to facility security's being moved to the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of Capitol
Police.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($100,232)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($100,232)
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Page 46 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate
for fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($154,206)
All Other $0 ($3,558)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($157,764)
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate
for fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($851)
All Other $0 ($20)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($871)
Early Childhood Consultation Program Z280
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Agency Procurement & Program Administrator
position from 100% in the Early Childhood Consultation Program, General Fund to 72%
General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family
Services - Central program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($143,967)
All Other $0 ($7,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($151,223)
Early Childhood Consultation Program Z280
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program to 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Block Grant
Fund in the Early Childhood Consultation Program and adjusts funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $56,687
All Other $0 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $60,315
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $56,684
Page 47 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $6,259
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $62,943
Food Supplement Administration Z019
Initiative: Adjusts funding between General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds in both
the Office for Family Independence program and the Office for Family Independence -
District program and between General Fund and Federal Expenditures Fund in the Food
Supplement Administration program as a result of the decrease in the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program federal financial participation rate from 50% to 25% by
October 1, 2026 pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $187,853
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $187,853
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($193,651)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($193,651)
Food Supplement Administration Z019
Initiative: Provides funding for heating assistance benefits for Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program participants to improve the payment error rate.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,486,103
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,486,103
Fund to Maintain Access to Statewide Family Planning Services N339
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to provide for management and oversight of the
delivery of family planning services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000,000
Housing First Program Z374
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Manager position and one
Public Service Manager III position from General Fund to Other Special Revenue Funds
in the Housing First Program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (2.000)
Personal Services $0 ($300,346)
All Other $0 ($12,574)
__________ __________
Page 48 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($312,920)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $300,346
All Other $0 $24,354
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $324,700
IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0137
Initiative: Establishes 2 Management Analyst II positions funded 72% General Fund and
28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central
program and provides funding for related All Other costs. This initiative also provides
funding across programs to support requirements related to offsetting the reimbursement
of federal income benefits to pay for a child's care.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,479,064
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,479,064
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,481,409
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,481,409
Lifespan Waiver Z370
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the number of lifespan waiver slots during and
beyond the implementation of the new federal home and community-based services
lifespan waiver program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,446,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,446,950
Lifespan Waiver Z370
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,953
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $10,953
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: Provides funding for a cost-of-living increase for state-funded home and
community-based services related to the department's Office of Aging and Disability
Page 49 - 132LR3049(37)

Services, Part 1 rule Chapter 5, Office of Aging and Disability Services Policy Manual,
Sections 61, 63, 68 and 69 to maintain parity with similar MaineCare programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $941,453
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $941,453
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $253,130
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $253,130
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Initiative: Provides funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $201,749
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $201,749
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $74,959
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $74,959
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Health Educator
III position to a Comprehensive Health Planner II position, retroactive to February 11,
2025, and provides funding for related All Other costs. This initiative also provides funding
for a one-time retroactive payment.
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,343
All Other $0 $154
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $0 $16,497
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Establishes one Health Program Manager position funded 50% General Fund
and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Maine Center for Disease Control and
Prevention program to oversee investigations, outbreaks, surveillance and disease
prevention for sexually transmitted infections and human immunodeficiency virus cases
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
Page 50 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $59,882
All Other $0 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $63,510
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $59,875
All Other $0 $5,613
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $65,488
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Establishes one Public Health Educator III position funded 100% Maine Center
for Disease Control and Prevention program, General Fund to support disease prevention
and surveillance for sexually transmitted infections, including congenital syphilis and
human immunodeficiency virus, and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $103,615
All Other $0 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $110,871
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one part-time Chemist II position in
the Health and Environmental Testing Laboratory seized drug unit from 32 to 80 hours
biweekly funded 62% General Fund and 38% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Maine
Center for Disease Control and Prevention program and transfers All Other to Personal
Services to cover the cost of the increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $41,995
All Other $0 ($41,995)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (0.500)
Personal Services $0 $25,738
All Other $0 ($25,738)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $0
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Page 51 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Center for Disease Control and
Prevention to support federally qualified health centers in developing and expanding
pharmacy services and access to affordably priced prescription drugs for the patients of
such health centers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,000,000
MaineCare Stabilization Fund Z018
Initiative: Allocates funding to prevent any loss of services or increased cost of services to
a MaineCare member that would otherwise result from insufficient General Fund
appropriations, insufficient federal matching funds or any other shortage of funds or
changes in federal or state law, rule or policy.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $31,250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $31,250,000
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,159,531
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,159,531
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $526,909
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $526,909
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,000
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
Page 52 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,160,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,160,000
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $270,572
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $270,572
Medicaid Waiver for Brain Injury Residential /Community Serv Z218
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $559,878
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $559,878
Medicaid Waiver for Brain Injury Residential /Community Serv Z218
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $139,613
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $139,613
Medicaid Waiver for Brain Injury Residential /Community Serv Z218
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $560,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $560,000
Medicaid Waiver for Other Related Conditions Z217
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $159,965
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $159,965
Medicaid Waiver for Other Related Conditions Z217
Page 53 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $58,422
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $58,422
Medicaid Waiver for Other Related Conditions Z217
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $160,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $160,000
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the number of lifespan waiver slots during and
beyond the implementation of the new federal home and community-based services
lifespan waiver program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,757,290
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $3,757,290
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $28,518,106
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $28,518,106
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $161,500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $161,500,000
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,722,198
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $3,722,198
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding in response to a reduction in the Federal Medical Assistance
Percentage-affected rate for emergency services for nonqualified immigrants who would
Page 54 - 132LR3049(37)

have otherwise qualified for Medicaid expansion from 90% to the base Federal Medical
Assistance Percentage-affected rate under federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $524,639
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $524,639
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $13,389,785
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $13,389,785
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($20,587,755)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($20,587,755)
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $471,555
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $0 $471,555
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($3,386)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 ($3,386)
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $6,285,364
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $6,285,364
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a 2.5% temporary rate increase to the Medicare
physician fee schedule pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,659,858
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,659,858
Page 55 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,588,741
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $3,588,741
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $144,535
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $144,535
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Adjusts funding in the Medical Care - Payments to Providers program between
the General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds related to rebasing the hospital tax
year from fiscal year 2021-22 to fiscal year 2023-24.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($28,905,898)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($28,905,898)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $28,905,898
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $28,905,898
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides additional funding to increase supplemental payments to private
psychiatric hospitals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $313,665
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $313,665
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $482,843
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $482,843
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides additional funding to cover increased hospital costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $23,773,758
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $23,773,758
Page 56 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $54,086,558
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $54,086,558
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to offset the provider impact of the federal budget
reconciliation law in federal Public Law 119-21, Section 71113, which prohibits federal
payments to prohibited entities, as defined in federal Public Law 119-21, Section 71113,
for items and services for a 1-year period beginning July 4, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,249,459
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,249,459
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a supplemental payment to the Maine Veterans'
Homes for MaineCare residents.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,192,705
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,192,705
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,836,002
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,836,002
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to replenish 15 reserve slots for individuals who have been
determined Priority 1 waiver program candidates under the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 21, Home and Community Benefits for
Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum Disorder.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,450,383
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,450,383
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($1,351,252)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($1,351,252)
Page 57 - 132LR3049(37)

Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,335,301
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,335,301
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Adjusts one-time funding in the Medical Care - Payments to Providers program
between the General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds related to rebasing the
hospital tax year from fiscal year 2021-22 to fiscal year 2023-24.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($13,495,835)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($13,495,835)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $13,495,835
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $13,495,835
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $100,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $100,000,000
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,789,294
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $3,789,294
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides additional one-time funding to increase supplemental payments to
private psychiatric hospitals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $156,832
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $156,832
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $248,315
Page 58 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $248,315
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides additional one-time funding to cover increased hospital costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $16,419,784
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $16,419,784
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $33,723,975
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $33,723,975
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,954,257
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,954,257
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $11,488,930
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $11,488,930
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $75,046
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $75,046
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a supplemental payment to acute care hospitals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,500,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000,000
__________ __________
Page 59 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000,000
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for acute care
hospitals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $10,000,000
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,079,549
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,079,549
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $629,451
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $629,451
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,080,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,080,000
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
81% General Fund and 19% Federal Block Grant Fund in the Mental Health Services -
Children program to 72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and adjusts funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 60 - 132LR3049(37)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($110,902)
All Other $0 ($5,877)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($116,779)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($26,013)
All Other $0 ($2,235)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 ($28,248)
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Nurse III position to a
Child Protective Services Nurse Consultant position and transfers and reallocates the
position from 100% General Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program to
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($118,680)
All Other $0 ($7,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($125,936)
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Reallocates one Social Services Program Manager position from 76% General
Fund and 24% Federal Block Grant Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program
to 50% General Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program and adjusts funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($36,666)
All Other $0 ($1,886)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($38,552)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($33,848)
All Other $0 ($3,294)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 ($37,142)
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Page 61 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program to 50% General Fund in the Mental Health Services -
Children program and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services
program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $61,657
All Other $0 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $65,285
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides funding to achieve parity with MaineCare cost-of-living adjustments
for certain community behavioral health-related services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $17,803
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $17,803
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Manager I position from the
Mental Health Services - Community program, General Fund to the Office of Behavioral
Health program, Federal Block Grant Fund and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($141,519)
All Other $0 ($7,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($148,775)
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Provides funding to achieve parity with MaineCare cost-of-living adjustments
for certain community behavioral health-related services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $40,972
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $40,972
Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,799,392
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,799,392
Page 62 - 132LR3049(37)

Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $848,691
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $848,691
Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,800,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,800,000
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,316,300
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,316,300
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $13,392,288
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $13,392,288
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,321,825
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,321,825
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,469,613
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,469,613
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($3,469,613)
Page 63 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($3,469,613)
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding to address cost differences affecting Maine Veterans' Homes
nursing facilities in per diem rates for services provided to MaineCare members.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $505,794
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $505,794
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $861,554
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $861,554
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $87,367
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $87,367
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,512,110
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,512,110
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,300,811
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,300,811
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $13,679,814
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $13,679,814
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,339,189
Page 64 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,339,189
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,099,642
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,099,642
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,843,337
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $3,843,337
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $379,339
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $379,339
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Reallocates positions within the Office for Family Independence program and
the Office for Family Independence - District program as a result of the decrease in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program federal financial participation rate from 50%
to 25% by October 1, 2026 pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 12.000
Personal Services $0 $544,946
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $544,946
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (12.000)
Personal Services $0 ($513,072)
All Other $0 ($16,039)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($529,111)
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Adjusts funding between General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds in both
the Office for Family Independence program and the Office for Family Independence -
District program and between General Fund and Federal Expenditures Fund in the Food
Supplement Administration program as a result of the decrease in the Supplemental
Page 65 - 132LR3049(37)

Nutrition Assistance Program federal financial participation rate from 50% to 25% by
October 1, 2026 pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $884,150
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $884,150
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($911,789)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($911,789)
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Establishes 35 Eligibility Specialist I positions, 4 Family Independence Unit
Supervisor positions and one Program Administrator - Family Independence position
within the Office for Family Independence - District program and establishes one
Management Analyst II position, one Senior Planner position, 3 Eligibility Specialist II
positions and one Business Systems Administrator position within the Office for Family
Independence program funded 25% General Fund and 75% Other Special Revenue Funds
to implement MaineCare work requirements pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $155,873
All Other $0 $10,884
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $166,757
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 6.000
Personal Services $0 $467,662
All Other $0 $48,292
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $515,954
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding in the Office for Family Independence program for the
projected increase in income verification services pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $901,314
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $901,314
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,884,403
Page 66 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,884,403
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position from range 30 to range 32, funded 55.2% Other Special Revenue Funds and
44.8% General Fund in the Office for Family Independence program, and also provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,190
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,190
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,391
All Other $0 $225
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $6,616
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator II position to a Public Service Manager II position, funded 75% General Fund
and 25% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office for Family Independence program,
and also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,684
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $8,684
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,895
All Other $0 $181
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,076
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator II position to a Public Service Manager II position, funded 50% General Fund
and 50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office for Family Independence program and
also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,740
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,740
Page 67 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,741
All Other $0 $179
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $5,920
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position to a Public Service Manager III position, funded 55.2% Other Special Revenue
Funds and 44.8% General Fund in the Office for Family Independence program, and also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,050
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,050
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,685
All Other $0 $181
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,866
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in the Office for Family Independence program for
the projected increase in income verification services pursuant to federal Public Law 119-
21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $249,051
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $249,051
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $256,835
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $256,835
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Reallocates positions within the Office for Family Independence program and
the Office for Family Independence - District program as a result of the decrease in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program federal financial participation rate from 50%
to 25% by October 1, 2026 pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (2.000)
Personal Services $0 $2,552,613
__________ __________
Page 68 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,552,613
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 ($2,552,618)
All Other $0 ($79,795)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($2,632,413)
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Adjusts funding between General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds in both
the Office for Family Independence program and the Office for Family Independence -
District program and between General Fund and Federal Expenditures Fund in the Food
Supplement Administration program as a result of the decrease in the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program federal financial participation rate from 50% to 25% by
October 1, 2026 pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $417,518
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $417,518
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($430,570)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($430,570)
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Establishes 40 Eligibility Specialist II positions and 4 Family Independence Unit
Supervisor positions in the Office for Family Independence - District program, funded
44.8% General Fund and 55.2% Other Special Revenue Funds, to improve the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program payment error rate pursuant to federal Public
Law 119-21. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $1,931,482
All Other $0 $137,506
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,068,988
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 44.000
Personal Services $0 $2,394,726
All Other $0 $262,299
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,657,025
Page 69 - 132LR3049(37)

Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Establishes 35 Eligibility Specialist I positions, 4 Family Independence Unit
Supervisor positions and one Program Administrator - Family Independence position
within the Office for Family Independence - District program and establishes one
Management Analyst II position, one Senior Planner position, 3 Eligibility Specialist II
positions and one Business Systems Administrator position within the Office for Family
Independence program funded 25% General Fund and 75% Other Special Revenue Funds
to implement MaineCare work requirements pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $923,747
All Other $0 $72,560
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $996,307
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 40.000
Personal Services $0 $2,771,533
All Other $0 $311,123
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,082,656
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding in the Office for Family Independence - District program for
the projected increase in postage pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $148,640
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $148,640
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $394,570
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $394,570
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator II position to a Public Service Coordinator III position within the Office for
Family Independence - District program to align with similar positions within the
department. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,099
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,099
Page 70 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,347
All Other $0 $261
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,608
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Family Independence
Program Manager position to a Public Service Manager II position, funded 55.2% Other
Special Revenue Funds and 44.8% General Fund in the Office for Family Independence -
District program, and also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $5,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,328
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,564
All Other $0 $223
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $6,787
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in the Office for Family Independence - District
program for the projected increase in postage pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $15,625
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $15,625
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $16,113
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $16,113
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to address unmet needs of older adults through
community-based services and programs delivered by the area agency in each of the State's
coordinated community program areas.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,000,000
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Page 71 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Manager I position from the
Mental Health Services - Community program, General Fund to the Office of Behavioral
Health program, Federal Block Grant Fund and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $141,519
All Other $0 $11,907
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $153,426
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding to achieve parity with MaineCare cost-of-living adjustments
for certain community behavioral health-related services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $78,842
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $78,842
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding for ongoing support to adult treatment recovery courts within
the judicial branch in Oxford County and Region 6.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $342,760
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $342,760
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a youth psychiatric residential treatment facility in
the State pursuant to Public Law 2023, chapter 643.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,399,680
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,399,680
Office of Behavioral Health-Medicaid Seed Z202
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $319,931
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $319,931
Office of Behavioral Health-Medicaid Seed Z202
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 72 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $204,810
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $204,810
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $19,844
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $0 $19,844
Office of Behavioral Health-Medicaid Seed Z202
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $320,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $320,000
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
81% General Fund and 19% Federal Block Grant Fund in the Mental Health Services -
Children program to 72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and adjusts funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $98,580
All Other $0 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $103,805
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $38,335
All Other $0 $3,293
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $41,628
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Nurse III position to a
Child Protective Services Nurse Consultant position and transfers and reallocates the
position from 100% General Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program to
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Page 73 - 132LR3049(37)

Personal Services $0 $93,067
All Other $0 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $98,292
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $36,193
All Other $0 $3,698
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $39,891
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Establishes one Management Analyst II position funded 72% General Fund and
28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central
program to support reporting requirements related to the psychotropic medication
settlement. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $77,269
All Other $0 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $82,494
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $30,050
All Other $0 $3,034
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $33,084
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Agency Procurement & Program Administrator
position from 100% in the Early Childhood Consultation Program, General Fund to 72%
General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family
Services - Central program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $103,657
All Other $0 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $108,882
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $40,310
All Other $0 $3,878
__________ __________
Page 74 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $44,188
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program to 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Block Grant
Fund in the Early Childhood Consultation Program and adjusts funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($81,627)
All Other $0 ($5,225)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($86,852)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($31,744)
All Other $0 ($3,504)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($35,248)
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program to 50% General Fund in the Mental Health Services -
Children program and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services
program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($88,782)
All Other $0 ($5,225)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($94,007)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($34,526)
All Other $0 ($3,626)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($38,152)
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Establishes 2 Management Analyst II positions funded 72% General Fund and
28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central
program and provides funding for related All Other costs. This initiative also provides
funding across programs to support requirements related to offsetting the reimbursement
of federal income benefits to pay for a child's care.
Page 75 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $155,638
All Other $0 $10,449
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $166,087
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $60,528
All Other $0 $6,881
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $67,409
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: Establishes one Child Protective Services Case Aide position funded 79%
General Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family
Services - District program to support requirements related to the psychotropic medication
settlement. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $69,819
All Other $0 $5,732
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $75,551
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $18,560
All Other $0 $2,152
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $20,712
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: Establishes 2 Child Protective Services Nurse Consultant positions funded 79%
General Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family
Services - District program to support reporting requirements related to the psychotropic
medication settlement. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $201,002
All Other $0 $11,464
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $212,466
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $53,434
Page 76 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $4,813
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $58,247
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Social Services Supervisor
positions funded 79% General Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office
of Child and Family Services - District program and 6 Social Services Supervisor positions
funded 70% General Fund and 30% Other Special Revenue Funds in the State-funded
Foster Care/Adoption Assistance program to Social Services Program Specialist II
positions, retroactive to February 23, 2024, and provides funding for related All Other
costs. This initiative also provides funding for one-time retroactive payments.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $40,915
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $40,915
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,417
All Other $0 $107
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,524
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 9 Child Protective Services
Program Administrator positions from range 28 to range 30 confidential funded 79%
General Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family
Services - District program and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $137,425
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $137,425
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $36,516
All Other $0 $424
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $36,940
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Adjusts funding in the Office of MaineCare Services, Federal Expenditures Fund
between All Other and Personal Services to correct the allocation of the funding approved
in Public Law 2025, chapter 388 to establish positions for the federal home and community-
based services lifespan waiver.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 77 - 132LR3049(37)

Personal Services $0 $439,919
All Other $0 ($439,919)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in MaineCare disability determination services
funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund within the Office of
MaineCare Services program pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $295,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $295,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $304,222
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $304,222
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reallocates one Social Services Program Manager position from 76% General
Fund and 24% Federal Block Grant Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program
to 50% General Fund in the Mental Health Services - Children program and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program and adjusts funding for
related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $70,514
All Other $0 $5,946
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $76,460
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Social Services Program Specialist II position from
72% General Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and
Family Services - Central program to 50% General Fund in the Mental Health Services -
Children program and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services
program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $61,651
All Other $0 $5,669
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $67,320
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Reimbursement
Specialist position to a Management Analyst I position funded 50% General Fund and 50%
Page 78 - 132LR3049(37)

Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,365
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,365
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,364
All Other $0 $53
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,417
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for contracted actuarial services funded 50% General Fund and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program to assist with
forecasting and fiscal management related to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,031,260
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,031,260
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes 2 Public Service Coordinator 1 positions and one Management
Analyst II position funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the
Office of MaineCare Services program pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $181,780
All Other $0 $10,884
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $192,664
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 3.000
Personal Services $0 $181,791
All Other $0 $16,907
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $198,698
Page 79 - 132LR3049(37)

Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Comprehensive Health Planner II position funded
50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare
Services program through June 12, 2027 to assist with increased eligibility under
MaineCare and rulemaking associated with federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $57,122
All Other $0 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $60,750
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $57,127
All Other $0 $5,527
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $62,654
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reduces funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
III position to a Public Service Coordinator I position, transfers and reallocates the cost of
the position from 60% General Fund and 40% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations program to 50% General
Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program
and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $67,220
All Other $0 ($19,626)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $47,594
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $67,224
All Other $0 ($24,991)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $42,233
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes one Provider Relations Specialist position and 2 Eligibility Specialist
II positions funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office
of MaineCare Services program to support provider and staff training pursuant to federal
Public Law 119-21. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $143,742
All Other $0 $10,884
Page 80 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $154,626
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 3.000
Personal Services $0 $143,757
All Other $0 $15,718
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $159,475
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for staff augmentation funded 50% General Fund and 50%
Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program to enable
response to forthcoming additional guidance and rules regarding federal Public Law 119-
21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $150,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $154,689
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $154,689
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes one Comprehensive Health Planner II position funded 50% General
Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program to
handle representation of program integrity appeals. This initiative also provides funding
for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $57,122
All Other $0 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $60,750
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $57,127
All Other $0 $5,527
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $62,654
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Page 81 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for contracted actuarial services funded 50% General
Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program to
assist with forecasting and fiscal management related to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,031,260
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,031,260
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for staff augmentation funded 50% General Fund and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services program to enable
response to forthcoming additional guidance and rules regarding federal Public Law 119-
21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $75,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $77,345
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $77,345
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for an increase in MaineCare disability determination
services funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund within the Office
of MaineCare Services program pursuant to federal Public Law 119-21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $295,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $295,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $304,222
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $304,222
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Page 82 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $42,194
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $42,194
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $130,538
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $130,538
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,079,549
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,079,549
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a supplemental payment to the Maine Veterans'
Homes for MaineCare residents.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,386,060
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,386,060
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect trends in health care costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,080,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,080,000
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides funding to the department to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for
direct care services under several MaineCare policy sections and state-funded home and
community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $534,775
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $534,775
Page 83 - 132LR3049(37)

Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to replace current and anticipated reductions in grants
to the department under the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered
by the United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims
of Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984. Any amount of the funding
not needed for the federal victim assistance formula grant program must be disbursed in
equal amounts to a statewide coalition of domestic violence resource centers and to a
statewide coalition of sexual assault support centers to support community-based services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,000,000
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Reduces funding one time for current and anticipated reductions in grants to the
department under the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered by the
United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims of
Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($3,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($3,000,000)
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for services for victims of domestic violence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for services for victims of sexual assault.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
Residential Treatment Facilities Assessment Z197
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($150,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($150,000)
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Page 84 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate for
fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($266)
All Other $0 ($6)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($272)
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2027 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new blended rate for
fiscal year 2026-27 is 60.7875%.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($202,847)
All Other $0 ($4,631)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($207,478)
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund
and the Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund due
to facility security's being moved to the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of Capitol
Police.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($403,323)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($403,323)
State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0139
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Social Services Supervisor
positions funded 79% General Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office
of Child and Family Services - District program and 6 Social Services Supervisor positions
funded 70% General Fund and 30% Other Special Revenue Funds in the State-funded
Foster Care/Adoption Assistance program to Social Services Program Specialist II
positions, retroactive to February 23, 2024, and provides funding for related All Other
costs. This initiative also provides funding for one-time retroactive payments.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $70,226
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $70,226
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,567
All Other $0 $268
__________ __________
Page 85 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,835
State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0139
Initiative: Establishes 2 Management Analyst II positions funded 72% General Fund and
28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central
program and provides funding for related All Other costs. This initiative also provides
funding across programs to support requirements related to offsetting the reimbursement
of federal income benefits to pay for a child's care.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,236,188
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,236,188
Traumatic Brain Injury Seed Z214
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage for fiscal year 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,873
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,873
Universal Immunization Program Z121
Initiative: Provides funding in the Universal Immunization Program, Other Special
Revenue Funds to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $10,000,000
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $200,608,783
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $399,589,831
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $0 $507,896
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $93,361,513
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $0 $7,890,609
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $701,958,632
Sec. A-18. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Low-income Home Energy Assistance - MSHA 0708
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for low-income electric ratepayer assistance.
Page 86 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,500,000
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: Provides funding for emergency homeless shelters in the State to be allocated as
part of the operations share of the shelter operating subsidy through the Maine State
Housing Authority's emergency shelter and housing assistance program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,500,000
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: Appropriates one-time funding for emergency homeless shelters in the State to
be allocated as part of the operations share of the shelter operating subsidy through the
Maine State Housing Authority's emergency shelter and housing assistance program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for emergency homeless shelters in the State to be
allocated as part of the operations share of the shelter operating subsidy through the Maine
State Housing Authority's emergency shelter and housing assistance program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,250,000
Stable Home Fund Z405
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to continue the Maine Eviction Prevention Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $11,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $11,000,000
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $23,250,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $23,250,000
Page 87 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. A-19. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Transfers one Secretary Associate Legal position from 60% General Fund and
40% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund to align the funding with the
appropriate source and transfers funding for the associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $42,954
All Other $0 $2,426
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $45,380
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($42,954)
All Other $0 ($2,426)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($45,380)
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Transfers one Maine Human Rights Investigator position from 75% General
Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund to align the funding with
the appropriate source and transfers funding for the associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $34,010
All Other $0 $1,516
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $35,526
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($34,010)
All Other $0 ($1,516)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($35,526)
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Public Service Manager II position from 66%
General Fund and 34% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund to align the
funding with the appropriate source and transfers funding for the associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $56,996
Page 88 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $2,062
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $59,058
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($56,996)
All Other $0 ($2,062)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($59,058)
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Reallocates one Maine Human Rights Investigator position from 75% General
Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund to align the funding with
the appropriate source and transfers funding for the associated All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $30,743
All Other $0 $1,516
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $32,259
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($30,743)
All Other $0 ($1,516)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($32,259)
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $172,223
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($172,223)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
Sec. A-20. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE, DEPARTMENT OF
ATV Safety and Educational Program 0559
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($706)
__________ __________
Page 89 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($706)
ATV Safety and Educational Program 0559
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($268)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($268)
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife program to the Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife
program within the same fund for wildlife conflict management.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($163,446)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($163,446)
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides funding for fish hatchery improvements.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $250,000
Landowner Relations Z140
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Deputy Game Warden
positions to 3 Game Warden positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $74,655
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $74,655
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding across programs for the approved reorganization of one Public
Relations Specialist position to a Marketing Specialist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,157
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,157
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $1,576
All Other $0 $50
Page 90 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,626
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife program to the Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife
program within the same fund for wildlife conflict management.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $163,446
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $163,446
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding across programs for the approved reorganization of one Public
Relations Specialist position to a Marketing Specialist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,157
All Other $0 $100
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,257
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one IF&W Resource
Technician position to an IF&W Resource Biologist position and one IF&W Senior
Resource Biologist position to an IF&W Resource Supervisor position and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $4,187
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,187
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $12,673
All Other $0 $402
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $13,075
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,132
All Other $0 $68
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,200
Page 91 - 132LR3049(37)

INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $81,999
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $13,075
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $256,109
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $351,183
Sec. A-21. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for increased insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $91,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $91,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to pay counsel fees related to weapons restriction
orders and civil commitment cases.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,990,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,990,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Accounting Clerk I
positions from range 9 to range 10.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,992
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $8,992
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Establishes 5 Electronic Filing Specialist positions and one Electronic Filing
Supervisor position. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 6.000
Personal Services $0 $639,257
All Other $0 $28,380
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $667,637
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Page 92 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Establishes 3 Assistant Clerk positions and 2 Associate Clerk positions. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 5.000
Personal Services $0 $499,236
All Other $0 $33,650
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $532,886
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Director of State
Judicial Marshals from range 22 to range 23, retroactive to May 14, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $40,731
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $40,731
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Establishes one IT Security Analyst position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $154,896
All Other $0 $5,050
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $159,946
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Supervisor Law Clerk
position at range 6 to a Trial Chief position at range 7.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $12,139
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $12,139
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Division Supervisor I
position to a Division Supervisor II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,341
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,341
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Internal Case
Processing Lead position from range 10 to range 11.
Page 93 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $4,846
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,846
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Establishes 2 District Court Judge positions, 2 Deputy Marshal positions and 2
Assistant Clerk positions and provides funding to implement the Extreme Risk Protection
Order Act.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 6.000
Personal Services $0 $896,951
All Other $0 $81,860
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $978,811
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for increased insurance costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $91,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $91,000
Judicial - Debt Service Z097
Initiative: Provides funding for debt service costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,098,013
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,098,013
Judicial - Debt Service Z097
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for debt service costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,944,265
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,944,265
Maine Civil Legal Services Fund Z367
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for civil legal services for persons unable to afford a
lawyer by increasing funds available for distribution by the Civil Legal Services Fund
Commission pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 18-A, subsection 1.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Maine Civil Legal Services Fund Z367
Page 94 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for civil legal services for persons unable to afford a
lawyer by increasing funds available for distribution by the Civil Legal Services Fund
Commission pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 18-A, subsection 1.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,000,000
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $15,627,607
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $15,627,607
Sec. A-22. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Transfers one Principal Economic Research Analyst position from the
Employment Security Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Workforce
Research program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($166,066)
All Other $0 ($2,489)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($168,555)
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Transfers one Office Specialist I position from the Workforce Research program
to the Employment Services Activity program to align the funding with the work being
performed.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $88,323
All Other $0 $4,490
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $92,813
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
Page 95 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Continues one limited-period CareerCenter Consultant position previously
established by financial order in fiscal year 2025-26 through June 19, 2027 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $93,510
All Other $0 $19,214
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $112,724
Maine Apprenticeship Program Z375
Initiative: Continues one limited-period CareerCenter Consultant position previously
established by Public Law 2023, chapter 683 through June 17, 2028.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $80,242
All Other $0 $8,840
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $89,082
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Rehabilitation Counselor II positions previously
established by financial order in fiscal year 2025-26 through June 19, 2027 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $307,914
All Other $0 $6,143
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $314,057
State Workforce Investment Board Z158
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $10,000
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: Transfers one Office Specialist I position from the Workforce Research program
to the Employment Services Activity program to align the funding with the work being
performed.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($88,323)
Page 96 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 ($4,640)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($92,963)
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: Transfers one Principal Economic Research Analyst position from the
Employment Security Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Workforce
Research program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $166,066
All Other $0 $5,214
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $171,280
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $2,439,356
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $89,082
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $2,528,438
Sec. A-23. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Transfers funding for a contract for the Executive Director of Maine InfoNet's
salary from the Maine State Library program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Statewide
Library Information System program, General Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($118,559)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($118,559)
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Transfers one Library Section Supervisor position and related All Other costs
from Federal Expenditures Fund to General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $146,035
All Other $0 $6,065
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $152,100
Page 97 - 132LR3049(37)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($146,035)
All Other $0 ($6,065)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($152,100)
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Transfers one Librarian - Specialized Services position and related All Other
costs from Federal Expenditures Fund to General Fund within the same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $133,598
All Other $0 $6,065
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $139,663
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($133,598)
All Other $0 ($6,065)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($139,663)
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Transfers one Interlibrary Loan Coordinator position from 70% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund to 100% General Fund, one part-time Customer
Representative Assistant II position from General Fund to Federal Expenditures Fund and
one Librarian - Specialized Services position from 50% General Fund and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund to 100% Federal Expenditures Fund. All transfers are within the same
program. This initiative also transfers funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($27,893)
All Other $0 ($4,853)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($32,746)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $27,893
All Other $0 $4,853
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $32,746
Maine State Library 0217
Page 98 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Transfers funding from the Statewide Library Information System program to
the Maine State Library program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $35,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $35,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding to design a program to promote a public
literacy and safety program related to artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding for media and outreach to promote a public
literacy and safety program related to artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Pursuant to the Governor's Maine Artificial Intelligence Task Force
recommendations, provides one-time funding for competitive grants to deploy and
implement a public literacy and safety program related to artificial intelligence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Librarian-Generalist
position to a Librarian-Core Services position and one Office Associate II position to a
Public Relations Specialist position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $13,776
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $13,776
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Transfers funding for a contract for the Executive Director of Maine InfoNet's
salary from the Maine State Library program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Statewide
Library Information System program, General Fund.
Page 99 - 132LR3049(37)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $118,559
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $118,559
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Statewide Library Information System program to
the Maine State Library program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($35,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($35,000)
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,141,352
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($377,576)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $763,776
Sec. A-24. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Community Resilience Partnership Z412
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator II position and All Other costs from
the Community Resilience Partnership program to the State Resilience Fund program
within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($156,306)
All Other $0 ($3,003,660)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($3,159,966)
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Safety Inspector
III position to a Public Safety Inspector Supervisor position retroactive to August 21, 2024
and transfers All Other to Personal Services one time to fund the retroactive portion of the
reclassification. This initiative also provides funding for authorized overtime.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $94,594
All Other $0 ($9,282)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $85,312
Page 100 - 132LR3049(37)

Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Manufactured Housing Inspector position and one
Manufactured Housing Inspector position from the Office of Professional and
Occupational Regulation program within the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation to the Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs within the same fund. These transferred positions, including
those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based
on the classification of the position. These employees retain their accrued vacation and sick
leave balances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $255,443
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $255,443
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Manufactured Housing Board program
within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Division of Building
Codes and Standards program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $22,486
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $22,486
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides funding for an attorney position under the Department of the Attorney
General.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $145,962
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $145,962
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Establishes one Resource Management Coordinator position and provides
funding for training and support for local code enforcement officers.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $122,761
All Other $0 $13,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $135,761
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides funding for changes in retirement plans.
Page 101 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $2,137
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,137
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for changes in retirement plans.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $1,576
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,576
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides funding for the proposed reorganization of one Public Safety Inspector
Supervisor position to a Public Service Manager II position.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,340
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $16,340
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Establishes one Resource Management Coordinator position for coordination of
the training and certification program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $122,761
All Other $0 $10,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $132,761
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Transfers funding from the All Other line category to the Personal Services line
category to fund the proposed reorganization of one Public Service Coordinator II position
to one Public Service Manager II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $12,037
All Other $0 ($12,037)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Provides funding for the proposed reorganization of one Senior Manufactured
Housing Inspector position to a Public Service Manager I position and one Manufactured
Housing Inspector position to a Senior Manufactured Housing Inspector position.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $18,535
__________ __________
Page 102 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $18,535
Housing Opportunity Program Z418
Initiative: Transfers one Executive Director Manufactured Housing Board position and one
Secretary Specialist position from the Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation
program within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Housing
Opportunity Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund.
These transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions
at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. These
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $244,057
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $244,057
Maine Climate Corps Program Z416
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support the Maine Climate Corps Program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Maine Climate Corps Program Z416
Initiative: Reduces Legislative Count for one Senior Planner position that was continued
as limited-period through June 19, 2027 in the Department of Education in Public Law
2025, chapter 388, Part A.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Maine Floodplain Program Z420
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position, one Planner II position and All Other
costs from the Maine Floodplain Program to the State Resilience Fund program within the
same respective funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($104,710)
All Other $0 ($14,190)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($118,900)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Page 103 - 132LR3049(37)

Personal Services $0 ($134,251)
All Other $0 ($49,909)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($184,160)
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Provides funding for the office's share of the cost for the financial and human
resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $47,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $47,500
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Provides funding for DICAP costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $243,296
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $243,296
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Executive II position, 3 limited-
period Public Service Manager II positions and related All Other costs from the Maine
Office of Community Affairs program to the State Resilience Fund program within the
same fund and changes the end date of the positions to September 30, 2029. This initiative
also provides funding for All Other costs for a 5-year grant received from the United States
Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($598,336)
All Other $0 ($35,652)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($633,988)
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the office's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $47,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $47,500
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Provides funding for All Other costs for a 5-year grant received from the United
States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $226,110
Page 104 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $226,110
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $10,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $10,000
Municipal Planning Assistance Z414
Initiative: Reduces Legislative Count to correct an error for one Senior Planner position
that was continued as a limited-period position through June 19, 2027 in the Department
of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry in Public Law 2025, chapter 388, Part A.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
State Resilience Fund Z430
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position and related
All Other costs from the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future program within the
Executive Department to the State Resilience Fund program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, within the same fund, and continues this position through September
30, 2029.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $156,630
All Other $0 $8,762
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $165,392
State Resilience Fund Z430
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position, one Planner II position and All Other
costs from the Maine Floodplain Program to the State Resilience Fund program within the
same respective funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $104,710
All Other $0 $14,190
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $118,900
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $134,251
All Other $0 $49,909
Page 105 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $184,160
State Resilience Fund Z430
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator II position and All Other costs from
the Community Resilience Partnership program to the State Resilience Fund program
within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $156,306
All Other $0 $3,003,660
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,159,966
State Resilience Fund Z430
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Public Service Executive II position, 3 limited-
period Public Service Manager II positions and related All Other costs from the Maine
Office of Community Affairs program to the State Resilience Fund program within the
same fund and changes the end date of the positions to September 30, 2029. This initiative
also provides funding for All Other costs for a 5-year grant received from the United States
Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $598,336
All Other $0 $4,832,943
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $5,431,279
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $227,761
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $5,211,279
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $1,158,919
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $6,597,959
Sec. A-25. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund to the Bureau of Marine Science
program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $118,684
Page 106 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 $5,454
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $124,138
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position, 2 limited-
period Marine Resource Scientist II positions, one limited-period Marine Resource
Scientist III position and 2 limited-period Marine Resource Specialist positions and all
related All Other costs from the Bureau of Policy and Management program to the Bureau
of Marine Science program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $741,293
All Other $0 $82,927
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $824,220
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Marine Resource Scientist III position from another
Other Special Revenue Funds account within the same program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $45,577
All Other $0 $2,095
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $47,672
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Establishes a baseline allocation in the Marine Science Research and Boat
Operations Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $202,559
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $202,559
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Management Analyst I position and one limited-
period Public Service Coordinator I position from the Bureau of Marine Science program,
Federal Expenditures Fund to the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Other
Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($307,409)
Page 107 - 132LR3049(37)

All Other $0 ($14,126)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($321,535)
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for contractual services and other operational support in order
to effectively execute a more limited offshore wind monitoring program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $222,091
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $222,091
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Marine Resource Scientist III position to another
Other Special Revenue Funds account within the same program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($45,577)
All Other $0 ($2,095)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($47,672)
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Marine Resource
Specialist position to a Marine Resource Scientist I position, retroactive to May 27, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,928
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $3,928
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $3,926
All Other $0 $180
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $4,106
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $7,853
All Other $0 $361
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,214
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Marine Resource
Scientist III position to a Marine Resource Scientist IV position, retroactive to May 22,
2025.
Page 108 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $28,284
All Other $0 $1,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $29,584
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund to the Bureau of Marine Science
program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($118,684)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($118,684)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position, 2 limited-
period Marine Resource Scientist II positions, one limited-period Marine Resource
Scientist III position and 2 limited-period Marine Resource Specialist positions and all
related All Other costs from the Bureau of Policy and Management program to the Bureau
of Marine Science program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($741,293)
All Other $0 ($82,927)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($824,220)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Eliminates one limited-period Marine Resource Specialist position inadvertently
continued in Public Law 2025, chapter 388.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($103,407)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($103,407)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Management Analyst I position and one limited-
period Public Service Coordinator I position from the Bureau of Marine Science program,
Federal Expenditures Fund to the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Other
Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $248,279
All Other $0 $11,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $259,688
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 109 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Executive II position from range 34 to range 36, retroactive to September 10, 2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $37,239
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $37,239
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $15,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $15,000
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Establishes a baseline allocation in the Division of Administrative Services
Federal Expenditures Fund account.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $500
Bureau of Public Health and Aquaculture Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Planning and Research
Associate II position to a Marine Resource Management Coordinator position, retroactive
to December 17, 2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $23,190
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $23,190
Bureau of Public Health and Aquaculture Z154
Initiative: Provides allocations to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $74,404
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $74,404
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Planning and Research
Associate I position to one Management Analyst II position, retroactive to April 18, 2025,
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $13,558
All Other $0 $329
__________ __________
Page 110 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $13,887
Sea Run Fisheries and Habitat Z295
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Executive II position from range 34 to range 36, retroactive to August 20, 2024, and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $9,459
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $9,459
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $28,382
All Other $0 $550
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $28,932
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $73,816
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($163,859)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $603,836
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $513,793
Sec. A-26. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($2,163)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($2,163)
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($13,454)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($13,454)
Page 111 - 132LR3049(37)

MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($15,617)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 ($15,617)
Sec. A-27. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Manufactured Housing Board 0351
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Manufactured Housing Board program
within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Division of Building
Codes and Standards program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($22,486)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 ($22,486)
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Manufactured Housing Inspector position and one
Manufactured Housing Inspector position from the Office of Professional and
Occupational Regulation program within the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation to the Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs within the same fund. These transferred positions, including
those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based
on the classification of the position. These employees retain their accrued vacation and sick
leave balances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (2.000)
Personal Services $0 ($255,823)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($255,823)
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: Transfers one Executive Director Manufactured Housing Board position and one
Secretary Specialist position from the Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation
program within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Housing
Opportunity Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund.
These transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions
at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. These
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
Page 112 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (2.000)
Personal Services $0 ($244,437)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($244,437)
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL
REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 ($22,486)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($500,260)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 ($522,746)
Sec. A-28. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION, MAINE
Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation 0033
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation in delivering
broadcast and emergency alert services on the State's public television and radio network.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $200,000
Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation 0033
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation in
delivering broadcast and emergency alert services on the State's public television and radio
network.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $200,000
PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION,
MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $400,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $400,000
Sec. A-29. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 113 - 132LR3049(37)

PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Establishes one District Defender position, 2 Assistant Defender II positions, one
Paralegal position and one Field Investigator position to provide indigent legal services in
areas of the State with the greatest need and provides funding for office rent and related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 5.000
Personal Services $0 $673,913
All Other $0 $99,477
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $773,390
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Establishes 2 Assistant Defender I positions and one Paralegal position to
support the establishment of the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services, parents
counsel division and provides funding for office rent and related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 3.000
Personal Services $0 $487,668
All Other $0 $134,580
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $622,248
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides allocations to align with projected resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $210,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $210,000
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE
COMMISSION ON
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,395,638
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $210,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,605,638
Sec. A-30. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Public Safety 0088
Page 114 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator I position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $139,498
All Other $0 $8,150
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $147,648
Capitol Police - Bureau of 0101
Initiative: Transfers 4 Capitol Police Officer positions and one Capitol Police Sergeant
position from Other Special Revenue Funds to General Fund within the same program and
provides funding that was not provided in a previous initiative for the positions and related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 5.000
Personal Services $0 $725,206
All Other $0 $59,696
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $784,902
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (5.000)
Personal Services $0 ($725,206)
All Other $0 ($59,696)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($784,902)
Computer Crimes 0048
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Supervisor Computer
Forensic Lab positions from range 29 to range 31.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $19,433
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $19,433
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one MCJA Assistant
Director position to a Public Service Manager II position, retroactive to May 29, 2025.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $16,158
All Other $0 $4,757
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $20,915
EMS Stabilization and Sustainability Program Z382
Page 115 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides baseline allocation in the EMS Stabilization and Sustainability
Program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $500
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Establishes one Fire Investigation Sergeant position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $163,076
All Other $0 $13,616
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $176,692
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position from range 29 to range 32.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $19,031
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $19,031
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 3 Public Safety Inspector
III positions to 3 Public Safety Inspector Supervisor positions, retroactive to August 21,
2024, and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $233,141
All Other $0 $754
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $233,895
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($758,533)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($758,533)
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
Page 116 - 132LR3049(37)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($44,589)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($44,589)
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,100,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $4,100,000
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes 4 State Police Detective positions and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 4.000
Personal Services $0 $498,456
All Other $0 $30,052
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $528,508
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 5 Senior Laboratory
Scientist positions from range 29 to range 31 and related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $38,933
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $38,933
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in rent for the northern field troop barracks.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $65,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $65,000
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one State Police Lieutenant position and provides funding for related
All Other costs for additional staffing related to the Extreme Risk Protection Order Act.
This initiative also provides funding for one Ford Police Interceptor Utility Hybrid vehicle
for this position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $118,257
All Other $0 $37,164
Page 117 - 132LR3049(37)

Capital Expenditures $0 $31,200
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $186,621
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one Forensic Chemist II position and one DNA Forensic Analyst
position and provides funding for related All Other costs, a mobile office unit and a
contracted trainer for the tracking system.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $173,658
All Other $0 $93,389
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $267,047
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 8 Public Safety Mechanic
positions to 8 Auto Mechanic III positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $20,216
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $20,216
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $6,831
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $6,831
Turnpike Enforcement 0547
Initiative: Establishes one State Police Sergeant position, 2 State Police Corporal positions
and 4 State Police Trooper positions and provides funding for related All Other costs to
increase coverage on the Maine Turnpike. This initiative also provides funding for 7
vehicles for those 7 positions.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 7.000
Personal Services $0 $1,040,648
All Other $0 $190,958
Capital Expenditures $0 $385,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,616,606
Turnpike Enforcement 0547
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 8 Public Safety Mechanic
positions to 8 Auto Mechanic III positions.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $8,356
Page 118 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,356
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,929,691
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $4,100,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $623,419
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $6,653,110
Sec. A-31. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Specialist I
position to an Office Specialist II position, retroactive to July 2024, and provides one-time
funding for the retroactive costs associated with the reclassification.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $15,539
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $15,539
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for the lease of new voter tabulation machines.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $792,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $792,000
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $314,167
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $314,167
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator I position and All Other costs from the
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions program to the Permanent
Commission on the Status of Women program within the same funds to align funding with
actual operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 119 - 132LR3049(37)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($143,493)
All Other $0 ($27,196)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($170,689)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($8,290)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($8,290)
Permanent Commission on the Status of Women Z455
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator I position and All Other costs from the
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions program to the Permanent
Commission on the Status of Women program within the same funds to align funding with
actual operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $143,493
All Other $0 $27,196
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $170,689
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $8,290
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $8,290
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $792,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $329,706
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,121,706
Sec. A-32. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
Debt Service - Treasury 0021
Initiative: Reduces funding one time based on anticipated authorized general obligation
bonds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($14,752,057)
Page 120 - 132LR3049(37)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($14,752,057)
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund 0472
Initiative: Increases funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $741,723
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $741,723
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund 0472
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,115,378
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,115,378
State - Municipal Revenue Sharing 0020
Initiative: Increases funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,966,891
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,966,891
State - Municipal Revenue Sharing 0020
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,461,512
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $4,461,512
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 ($14,752,057)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $9,285,504
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 ($5,466,553)
Sec. A-33. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Page 121 - 132LR3049(37)

Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides funding for an annual contract with the Maine Education Policy
Research Institute.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support commercially promising faculty, staff and
student research at the University of Maine System in emerging areas of state and national
interest and economic opportunity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($306,923)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($306,923)
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($52,185)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($52,185)
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $2,250,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 ($359,108)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,890,892
Sec. A-34. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH DATA ORGANIZATION, MAINE
Page 122 - 132LR3049(37)

Maine Health Data Organization 0848
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Maine Health Data Organization for data
collection and initial implementation of a reporting dashboard to calculate the care gap for
Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Aging and Disability Services
services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $133,768
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $133,768
Sec. A-35. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MAINE PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
Retirement System - Retirement Allowance Fund 0085
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the increase in the unfunded actuarial liability
created as a result of allowing employees of the Department of Health and Human Services
who provide crisis outreach and crisis services to adults with developmental disabilities or
intellectual disabilities in a community-based or residential setting to participate in the
1998 Special Plan.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,876,610
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,876,610
Retirement System - Retirement Allowance Fund 0085
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the increase in the unfunded actuarial liability as a
result of allowing service retirement benefits for employees employed in the Office of
Chief Medical Examiner within the Department of the Attorney General earned under the
regular state employee and teacher plan to be calculated under the 1998 Special Plan.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $483,270
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $483,270
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MAINE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $2,359,880
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $2,359,880
PART B
Sec. B-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 123 - 132LR3049(37)

AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $42,487
All Other $0 ($42,487)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Sec. B-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $19,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $19,848
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $74,877
All Other $0 $1,964
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $76,841
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $23,675
All Other $0 $343
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $24,018
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $66,432
All Other $0 $845
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $67,277
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
Page 124 - 132LR3049(37)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $24,018
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $163,966
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $187,984
PART C
Sec. C-1. Mill expectation. The mill expectation pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 20-A, section 15671-A for fiscal year 2026-27 is 5.645.
Sec. C-2. Total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade
12. The total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 for fiscal year
2026-27 is as follows:
2026-27
TOTAL
Total Operating Allocation
Total operating allocation pursuant to the $1,687,739,449
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section
15683
Total operating allocation for public charter $40,404,647
schools pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15683-B
Total adjustments to state subsidy pursuant $770,551,816
to Title 20-A, section 15689 included in
subsidizable costs and total other
subsidizable costs pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15681-A
Total Operating Allocation and Subsidizable
Costs
Total operating allocation pursuant to Title $2,498,695,912
20-A, section 15683 and total other
subsidizable costs pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15681-A
Total Debt Service Allocation
Total debt service allocation pursuant to $4,479,686
Title 20-A, section 15683-A
Total Adjustments and Targeted Education Funds
Adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689
Page 125 - 132LR3049(37)

Audit adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A, section $0
15689, subsection 4
Educating students in long-term drug treatment $249,607
center adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15689, subsection 5
Minimum teacher salary adjustment pursuant to $0
Title 20-A, section 15689, subsection 7-A
Regionalization, consolidation and efficiency $6,506,869
assistance adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689, subsection 9
Maine Care seed payments adjustments pursuant $3,000,000
to Title 20-A, section 15689, subsection 14
Special education budgetary hardship adjustment $100,000
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689, subsection
15
English learner budgetary hardship adjustment $500,000
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689, subsection
16
Total adjustments to the state share of total $10,356,476
allocation pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689
Targeted education funds pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A
Special education costs for state agency clients $26,250,000
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 1
Essential programs and services components $300,000
contract pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 3
Data management and support services for $10,750,000
essential programs and services pursuant to Title
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 10
Postsecondary course payments pursuant to Title $5,500,000
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 11
Page 126 - 132LR3049(37)

National board certification salary supplement $0
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 12
Learning through technology program pursuant to $14,000,000
Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 12-A
Jobs for Maine's Graduates, including costs for $3,881,379
postsecondary education, pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A, subsection 13
Maine School of Science and Mathematics, $3,615,347
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 14
Maine Educational Center for the Deaf and Hard $9,758,979
of Hearing pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15689-A, subsection 15
Transportation administration pursuant to Title $300,000
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 16
Special education for juvenile offenders pursuant $420,326
to Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 17
Comprehensive early college programs funding $1,000,000
(bridge year program) pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A, subsection 23
Community schools pursuant to Title 20-A, $250,000
section 15689-A, subsection 25
Musical instruments and professional $50,000
development in rural schools pursuant to Title
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 28
Major capital projects principal payments $91,916,877
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 29
Major capital projects interest payments pursuant $30,682,975
to Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 29
Adult education pursuant to Title 20-A, section $4,000,000
15689-A, subsection 30
Total targeted education funds pursuant to Title $202,675,883
20-A, section 15689-A
Page 127 - 132LR3049(37)

Enhancing student performance and opportunity
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15688-A
Career and technical education costs pursuant to $82,351,963
Title 20-A, section 15688-A, subsection 1
College transitions programs through adult $450,000
education programs pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15688-A, subsection 2
National industry standards for career and $2,000,000
technical education pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15688-A, subsection 6
Career and technical education middle school $500,000
grant program pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15688-A, subsection 8
Career and technical education early childhood $100,000
education program expansion support pursuant to
Title 20-A, section 15688-A, subsection 10
Total enhancing student performance and $85,401,963
opportunity pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15688-A
Total Cost of Funding Public Education from
Kindergarten to Grade 12
Total cost of funding public education from $2,801,609,920
kindergarten to grade 12 for the fiscal year pursuant
to Title 20-A, chapter 606-B, not including normal
retirement costs
Total normal cost of teacher retirement $69,763,590
Total cost of funding public education from $2,871,373,510
kindergarten to grade 12 for the fiscal year pursuant
to Title 20-A, chapter 606-B, including normal
retirement costs
Total cost of state contribution to unfunded actuarial $292,083,135
liabilities of the Maine Public Employees Retirement
System that are attributable to teachers, retired
teachers' health insurance and retired teachers' life
insurance for fiscal year 2026-27 pursuant to Title 5,
chapters 421 and 423, excluding the normal cost of
teacher retirement
Page 128 - 132LR3049(37)

Total cost of funding public education from $3,163,456,645
kindergarten to grade 12, plus state contributions to
the unfunded actuarial liabilities of the Maine Public
Employees Retirement System that are attributable
to teachers, retired teachers' health insurance and
retired teachers' life insurance for fiscal year 2026-
27 pursuant to Title 5, chapters 421 and 423
Sec. C-3. Local and state contributions to total cost of funding public
education from kindergarten to grade 12. The local contribution and the state
contribution appropriation provided for general purpose aid for local schools for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027 is calculated as follows:
2026-27 2026-27
LOCAL STATE
Local and State Contributions to the Total
Cost of Funding Public Education from
Kindergarten to Grade 12
Local and state contributions to the total cost $1,292,118,080 $1,579,255,430
of funding public education from
kindergarten to grade 12 pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section
15683, subject to statewide distributions
required by law
State contribution to the total cost of $292,083,135
unfunded actuarial liabilities of the Maine
Public Employees Retirement System that
are attributable to teachers, retired teachers'
health insurance and retired teachers' life
insurance for fiscal year 2026-27 pursuant to
Title 5, chapters 421 and 423 excluding the
normal cost of teacher retirement
State contribution to the total cost of funding $1,871,338,565
public education from kindergarten to grade
12 plus state contribution to the total cost of
unfunded actuarial liabilities of the Maine
Public Employees Retirement System that
are attributable to teachers, retired teachers'
health insurance and retired teachers' life
insurance pursuant to Title 5, chapters 421
and 423
Sec. C-4. Authorization of payments. If the State's continued obligation for any
individual component contained in those sections of this Part that set the total cost of
funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 and the local and state
Page 129 - 132LR3049(37)

contributions for that purpose exceeds the level of funding provided for that component,
any unexpended balances occurring in other programs may be applied to avoid proration
of payments for any individual component. Any unexpended balances from this Part may
not lapse but must be carried forward for the same purpose.
Sec. C-5. Limit of State's obligation. Those sections of this Part that set the total
cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 and the local and state
contributions for that purpose may not be construed to require the State to provide payments
that exceed the appropriation of funds for general purpose aid for local schools for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027.
PART D
Sec. D-1. PL 2023, c. 3, Pt. C, §5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. D, §1, is
further amended to read:
Sec. C-5. Continuation of limited-period positions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, limited-period positions funded with the Federal
Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery funds authorized in Public Law 2021,
chapter 483, "An Act To Provide Allocations for the Distribution of State Fiscal Recovery
Funds," may be extended beyond 2 years by financial order but not later than December
31, 2026 May 31, 2027.
Sec. D-2. PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. D, §2 is amended to read:
Sec. D-2. Adjustments to allocations. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 37-B, section 746 or any other provision of law to the contrary, Federal
Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery funds allocated to departments, agencies
and programs may be adjusted in fiscal years 2023-24, 2024-25 and, 2025-26 and 2026-27
either within the same department or agency or between departments or agencies on
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. The
Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services shall report any adjustments to
allocations made pursuant to this section to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs at least quarterly.
Sec. D-3. PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. D, §4 is amended to read:
Sec. D-4. Calculation and transfer. The State Budget Officer shall calculate the
cost of extending positions necessary to complete authorized projects initially funded with
funds received through the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. The State Budget
Officer shall transfer the amounts by financial order upon the approval of the Governor.
These transfers are considered adjustments to allocations in fiscal year 2023-24, 2024-25
or, 2025-26 or 2026-27.
PART E
Sec. E-1. 5 MRSA §286, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 48, Pt. B, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. E-2. 5 MRSA §286, 6th ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 48, Pt. B, §3, is further
amended to read:
A reserve fund, administered by the Executive Director of Employee Health, Wellness
and Workers' Compensation and the State Human Resources Officer with approval of the
Page 130 - 132LR3049(37)

Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services, is created within the Accident,
Sickness and Health Insurance Internal Service Fund to protect the program from
unexpected losses and self-insured losses and related expenses incurred in the provision of
health and dental benefits for the eligible participants. The fund is a continuing fund and
may not lapse. The Treasurer of State shall invest the fund. All proceeds of these
investments accrue to the fund.
Sec. E-3. 5 MRSA §286-A, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 1, Pt. B, §2 and affected
by §50, is repealed.
Sec. E-4. 5 MRSA §957, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2005, c. 683, Pt. A, §5 and
PL 2023, c. 412, §3, is further amended to read:
4. Funds. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services shall receive and
disburse funds made available to the program through the provisions of section 286‑A state
employee health insurance program under section 286. The State Human Resources
Officer shall oversee the implementation and administration of the program. Funds made
available to the department for the purposes of this section, from any source, may not lapse,
but must be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be expended for the same purpose.
Sec. E-5. 5 MRSA §1731, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. O, §4, is
further amended to read:
A reserve fund, referred to in this chapter as the "self-insurance fund," is created to
indemnify the State or the State's designated payee for self-insured retention losses and
related loss adjustment expenses from those perils insured against under a deductible or
self-insured retention program, as recommended by the State Controller and approved by
the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services. With the approval of the
commissioner, the self-insurance fund may be used for loss prevention programs
administered by either the risk management division within the Office of the State
Controller or the Bureau of Human Resources. The total amount of the self-insurance fund
provided for loss prevention programs in any given year may not exceed 5% of the self-
insurance fund as of July 1st of that fiscal year. The self-insurance fund is a continuing
fund and does not lapse. Funds provided from the self-insurance fund to the Bureau of
Human Resources are similarly nonlapsing and are carried forward through the Bureau of
Human Resources' Dedicated Revenue Account reserve fund established within the
Accident, Sickness and Health Insurance Internal Service Fund under section 286.
Sec. E-6. 5 MRSA §7034, sub-§9, as amended by PL 1991, c. 780, Pt. Y, §93, is
further amended to read:
9. Administer state employee health insurance program. Administer a health
insurance program that is consistent with the rules adopted by the State Employee Health
Commission and the requirements of sections 285 to 286‑A, 285-A and 286;
Sec. E-7. 5 MRSA §7036, sub-§24, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 528, Pt. III, §18 and
affected by Pt. RRR and amended by c. 591, Pt. III, §18, is further amended to read:
24. Administer state employee health insurance program for state employees.
Administer the Employee Health Insurance Program state employee health insurance
program and the fund accounts established for this purpose by sections 286, 286‑A and
1731;
Page 131 - 132LR3049(37)

PART F
Sec. F-1. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 424, §1, is amended
to read:
9. Emergency funding for nonprofit food banks. During a state of emergency
declared in accordance with Title 37‑B, section 742, subsection 1 that exceeds 10 days, the
Governor, in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, may distribute up to $400,000 $4,000,000 from the stabilization
fund to nonprofit entities, including food banks, food pantries and soup kitchens, that
provide or distribute food to low-income, indigent or unemployed individuals or
households without charge. The Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry
shall adopt rules to prescribe the manner in which the funds distributed under this
subsection must be disbursed. The commissioner may leverage funds distributed under
this subsection to match any relevant federal funding available for qualifying food
programs in the State. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules
as described in chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A. The Governor may not suspend under Title
37‑B, section 742, subsection 1, paragraph C, subparagraph (1) rules adopted under this
subsection.
Sec. F-2. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Emergency heating assistance. During a state of emergency declared in
accordance with Title 37-B, section 742, subsection 1 that exceeds 10 days, the Governor,
in coordination with the Maine State Housing Authority, may distribute up to $1,500,000
from the stabilization fund to the Maine State Housing Authority without charge to be used
for the administration of benefit payments for emergency heating assistance. The Maine
State Housing Authority shall return any of the funds distributed pursuant to this subsection
if federal funding becomes available at a later time. Any funds returned by the Maine State
Housing Authority must be deposited to the stabilization fund.
Sec. F-3. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Emergency nutrition assistance. During a state of emergency declared in
accordance with Title 37-B, section 742, subsection 1 that exceeds 10 days, the Governor,
in coordination with the Department of Health and Human Services, may distribute up to
$30,000,000 from the stabilization fund to the Department of Health and Human Services
without charge to be used for the administration of benefit payments for the Women,
Infants and Children Special Supplemental Food Program of the federal Child Nutrition
Act of 1966 and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. The Department of
Health and Human Services shall return any of the funds distributed pursuant to this
subsection if federal funding becomes available at a later time. Any funds returned by the
Department of Health and Human Services must be deposited to the stabilization fund.
PART G
Sec. G-1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. N, §1, is
further amended to read:
1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services. The Department of
Administrative and Financial Services must apply:
Page 132 - 132LR3049(37)

A. Any balance remaining in the Salary Plan program in the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward
for the next fiscal year;
B. Any balance remaining in the General Fund Capital, Construction, Repairs,
Improvements - Administrative program in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal
year;
C. Any balance remaining in the Debt Service - Government Facilities Authority
program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal year; and
D. Any balance remaining in the Central Administrative Applications program,
General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services at
the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal year.;
E. Any balance remaining in the Information Services program, General Fund account
in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services at the end of any fiscal
year to be carried forward for the next fiscal year; and
F. Any balance remaining in the Developmental Services Oversight and Advisory
Board program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal
year.
PART H
Sec. H-1. 5 MRSA §135, first ¶, as amended by PL 2005, c. 386, Pt. CC, §2, is
further amended to read:
The Treasurer of State may deposit the money, including trust funds of the State, in
any national bank or in any banking institution, trust company, state or federal savings and
loan association or mutual savings bank organized under the laws of this State or having a
location in the State except as provided in chapter 161. Before making a deposit, the
Treasurer of State must consider the rating of the banking institution, trust company, state
or federal savings and loan association or mutual savings bank on its most recent
assessment conducted pursuant to the federal Community Reinvestment Act, 12 United
States Code, Section 2901. The Treasurer of State may transfer funds into and out of the
respective funds in the cash pool as circumstances may require to meet current obligations
and shall request the State Controller to effect such transfers by journal entry as set forth
in section 131‑B. When there is excess money in the State Treasury that is not needed to
meet current obligations, the Treasurer of State may invest, with the concurrence of the
State Controller or the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services and with
the consent of the Governor, those amounts in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness or
other obligations of the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities that mature not
more than 36 months from the date of investment or in repurchase agreements that mature
within the succeeding 12 months that are secured by obligations of the United States and
its agencies and instrumentalities, prime commercial paper, tax-exempt obligations and
corporate bonds rated "AAA" that mature not more than 36 months from the date of
investment, banker's acceptances or so-called "no-load" shares of any investment company
registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, that complies
Page 133 - 132LR3049(37)

with Rule 2a-7 guidelines and maintains a constant share price. The Treasurer of State may
participate in the securities loan market by loaning state-owned bonds, notes or certificates
of indebtedness of the Federal Government, only if loans are fully collateralized by treasury
bills or cash. The Treasurer of State shall seek competitive bids for investments except
when, after a reasonable investigation, it appears that an investment of the desired maturity
is procurable by the State from only one source. Interest earned on those investments of
money must be credited to the respective funds, except that interest earned on investments
of special revenue funds and internal service funds, unless otherwise specified, must be
credited to the General Fund of the State. Effective July 1, 1995, interest earned on
investments of the Highway Fund must be credited to the Highway Fund. Interest earned
on funds of the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife must be credited to the General
Fund. Interest earned on funds of the Baxter State Park Authority must be credited to the
Baxter State Park Fund. This section does not prevent the deposit for safekeeping or
custodial care of the securities of the several funds of the State in banks or safe deposit
companies in this State or any other state, nor the deposit of state funds required by the
terms of custodial contracts or agreements negotiated in accordance with the laws of this
State. All custodial contracts and agreements are subject to the approval of the Governor.
Sec. H-2. 5 MRSA §1827, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 386, Pt. H, §10, is
amended to read:
6. Internal service fund accounts. Maintain or establish, through the Office of the
State Controller, an internal service fund account for each of the central services described
in subsections 1 to 5. The funds deposited in the account must include, but are not limited
to, appropriations made to the account, funds transferred to the account from within the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, and funds received from state
departments and agencies using the services provided by the central services and earnings
by the fund from the Treasurer of State's pool.
Each of the central services described in subsections 1 to 5 may levy charges according to
a rate schedule recommended by the Director of the Bureau of General Services and
approved by the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services against all
departments and agencies using their services.
PART I
Sec. I-1. 5 MRSA §1827, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 386, Pt. H, §10, is
amended to read:
1. Postal service. Purchase or contract for all postal service required for the use of
State Government or any department or agency thereof of State Government. Such services
must be available to all departments and agencies of State Government and may be
available to the University of Maine System or any political subdivision, educational
institution or qualifying nonprofit organization in the State;
Sec. I-2. 5 MRSA §1827, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 386, Pt. H, §10, is
amended to read:
3. Central warehouse; procurement services. Establish and operate, with the
approval of the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services, a warehouse that,
in the judgment of the Director of the Bureau of General Services, is determined necessary
for the storage and distribution of supplies, materials and equipment by resale, rental or
Page 134 - 132LR3049(37)

other method, required for use by State Government or any department or agency, or any
political subdivision or school administrative unit. The Director of the Bureau of General
Services may establish, administer and oversee a state purchasing card program for the
purpose of facilitating the efficient acquisition and payment of goods and services by
departments and agencies of State Government in accordance with applicable procurement
laws, rules and policies. Participation in the state purchasing card program by departments
and agencies must be in accordance with guidelines approved by the Commissioner of
Administrative and Financial Services. In accordance with section 1587, the Director of
the Bureau of General Services may purchase, lease, lease-purchase or enter into other
financing agreements for the acquisition of equipment in accordance with this subsection
when it can be demonstrated that any such action or agreement provides a clear cost
advantage to the State;
PART J
Sec. J-1. 5 MRSA §13080-Q, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2013, c. 413, §1, is
further amended to read:
D. Payments made to the fund may not be made for tax years beginning on or after
July 1, 2026 2031.
Sec. J-2. 5 MRSA §13080-S, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 18, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Deposit and payment of revenue. On or before July 15th of each year prior to
2026, the assessor shall deposit an amount equal to 50% of the employment tax increment
for the preceding year into a contingent account established, maintained and administered
by the State Controller. On or before July 15th of each year beginning after 2025, the
assessor shall deposit an amount equal to 100% of the employment tax increment for the
preceding year into a contingent account established, maintained and administered by the
State Controller. On or before July 31st of each year, the assessor shall pay that amount to
the fund.
PART K
Sec. K-1. 36 MRSA §111, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 432, §1 and
affected by §2, is further amended to read:
1-A. Code. "Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and
amendments to that Code as of December 31, 2024 2025.
Sec. K-2. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶QQ is enacted to read:
QQ. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and before January 1,
2030, an amount equal to the deduction for domestic research or experimental
expenditures claimed by the taxpayer under the Code, Section 174A(a) or pursuant to
federal Public Law 119-21, Section 70302(f)(2) multiplied by the applicable
percentage. Except for a tax shelter prohibited from using the cash receipts and
disbursements method of accounting under the Code, Section 448(a)(3), this paragraph
does not apply to a taxpayer that meets the gross receipts test of the Code, Section
448(c) for the taxable year.
For purposes of this paragraph, "applicable percentage" means:
Page 135 - 132LR3049(37)

(1) For tax years beginning in 2025, 100%;
(2) For tax years beginning in 2026, 70%, except that "applicable percentage"
means, for the same period, 100% for deductions claimed pursuant to federal
Public Law 119-21, Section 70302(f)(2);
(3) For tax years beginning in 2027, 50%;
(4) For tax years beginning in 2028, 30%; and
(5) For tax years beginning in 2029, 10%.
Sec. K-3. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶RR is enacted to read:
RR. An amount equal to the net increase in depreciation attributable to the depreciation
deduction claimed by the taxpayer under the Code, Section 168(n).
Sec. K-4. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶SS is enacted to read:
SS. An amount equal to the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income by the
taxpayer under the Code, Section 1400Z-2(a) with respect to amounts invested in a
qualified opportunity zone after December 31, 2026.
Sec. K-5. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶TT is enacted to read:
TT. Upon the sale of any property acquired after December 31, 2026, an amount equal
to an increase in basis made by the taxpayer pursuant to the Code, Section
1400Z-2(b)(2)(B)(iii) or Section 1400Z-2(c).
Sec. K-6. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶UU is enacted to read:
UU. An amount equal to the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income by
the taxpayer under the Code, Section 1202(a)(1) with respect to sales of qualified small
business stock first acquired after July 3, 2025.
Sec. K-7. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶BBB is enacted to read:
BBB. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and before January 1,
2031, an amount equal to the sum of the following:
(1) An amount equal to the amortization deductions allowable for domestic
research or experimental expenditures under former Section 174 of the Code, prior
to the enactment of the federal Public Law 119-21, with respect to expenditures
that are paid or incurred in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021 and
before January 1, 2026 for which an addition was required under subsection 1,
paragraph QQ; and
(2) An amortization deduction for domestic research or experimental expenditures,
except those described in subparagraph (1), for which an addition was required
under subsection 1, paragraph QQ in a prior tax year. The amortization deduction
is equal to the amount of the addition modification attributable to such
expenditures allowed to be ratably apportioned under federal Public Law 119-21,
Section 70302 over a period beginning with the taxable year immediately
following the taxable year in which the addition modification was required and
ending in the taxable year beginning in 2030.
Sec. K-8. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶CCC is enacted to read:
Page 136 - 132LR3049(37)

CCC. An amount equal to the net increase in depreciation attributable to the
depreciation deductions allowable under Sections 167 and 168 of the Code that would
have been applicable to that property had the depreciation deduction under the Code,
Section 168(n) not been claimed with respect to such property for which an addition
was required under subsection 1, paragraph RR in a prior year.
Upon the taxable disposition of property to which this paragraph applies, the amount
of any gain or loss includable in federal taxable income must be adjusted for Maine
income tax purposes by an amount equal to the difference between the addition
modification for such property under subsection 1, paragraph RR and the subtraction
modification allowed pursuant to this paragraph.
The total amount of subtraction claimed for property under this paragraph for all tax
years may not exceed the addition modifications under subsection 1, paragraph RR for
the same property.
Sec. K-9. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶DDD is enacted to read:
DDD. To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income pursuant to the Code,
Section 1400Z-2(b) the amount of gain for which an addition was required under
subsection 1, paragraph SS in a prior tax year.
Sec. K-10. 36 MRSA §5124-C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §§4 and
5, is further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§5124-C. Standard deduction; resident on or after January 1, 2018 2020
Sec. K-11. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 616, Pt. X,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. K-12. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
ZZZ, §4, is further amended to read:
1-A. Amount; before January 1, 2026 2025. For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2020 and before January 1, 2026 2025, the standard deduction of a resident
individual is equal to the federal standard deduction, subject to the phase-out under
subsection 2.
Sec. K-13. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ,
§5, is amended to read:
1-B. Amount; on or after before January 1, 2026. For tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the standard deduction of a resident
individual is equal to the sum of the basic standard deduction and the additional standard
deduction, subject to the phase-out under subsection 2.
A. The basic standard deduction is:
(1) For single individuals and married persons filing separate returns, $12,000;
(2) For individuals filing as heads of households, the amount allowed under
subparagraph (1) multiplied by 1.5; and
(3) For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, the amount
allowed under subparagraph (1) multiplied by 2.
Page 137 - 132LR3049(37)

B. The additional standard deduction is the amount allowed under the Code, Section
63(c)(3).
Sec. K-14. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Amount; before January 1, 2027. For tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026 and before January 1, 2027, the standard deduction of a resident individual is equal
to the sum of the basic standard deduction and the additional standard deduction, subject
to the phase-out under subsection 2.
A. The basic standard deduction is:
(1) For single individuals and married persons filing separate returns, $15,700;
(2) For individuals filing as heads of households, the amount allowed under
subparagraph (1) multiplied by 1.5; and
(3) For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, the amount
allowed under subparagraph (1) multiplied by 2.
B. The additional standard deduction is the amount allowed under the Code, Section
63(c)(3).
Sec. K-15. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1-D is enacted to read:
1-D. Amount; on or after January 1, 2027. For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, the standard deduction of a resident individual is equal to the federal
standard deduction, subject to the phase-out under subsection 2.
Sec. K-16. 36 MRSA §5126, as amended by PL 2017, c. 474, Pt. B, §6, is repealed.
Sec. K-17. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§1, ¶LL is enacted to read:
LL. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and before January 1,
2030, an amount equal to the deduction for domestic research or experimental
expenditures claimed by the taxpayer under the Code, Section 174A(a) or pursuant to
federal Public Law 119-21, Section 70302(f)(2) multiplied by the applicable
percentage. Except for a tax shelter prohibited from using the cash receipts and
disbursements method of accounting under the Code, Section 448(a)(3), this paragraph
does not apply to any taxpayer that meets the gross receipts test of the Code, Section
448(c) for the taxable year.
For purposes of this paragraph, "applicable percentage" means:
(1) For tax years beginning in 2025, 100%;
(2) For tax years beginning in 2026, 70%, except that "applicable percentage"
means, for the same period, 100% for deductions claimed pursuant to federal
Public Law 119-21, Section 70302(f)(2);
(3) For tax years beginning in 2027, 50%;
(4) For tax years beginning in 2028, 30%; and
(5) For tax years beginning in 2029, 10%.
Sec. K-18. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§1, ¶MM is enacted to read:
Page 138 - 132LR3049(37)

MM. An amount equal to the net increase in depreciation attributable to the
depreciation deduction claimed by the taxpayer under the Code, Section 168(n).
Sec. K-19. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§1, ¶NN is enacted to read:
NN. An amount equal to the amount of gain excluded from federal gross income by
the taxpayer under the Code, Section 1400Z-2(a) with respect to the amount invested
in a qualified opportunity zone after December 31, 2026.
Sec. K-20. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§1, ¶OO is enacted to read:
OO. Upon the sale of any property acquired after December 31, 2026, an amount equal
to any increase in basis made by the taxpayer pursuant to the Code, Section
1400Z-2(b)(2)(B)(iii) or Section 1400Z-2(c).
Sec. K-21. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶EE, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 474, Pt.
D, §3 and affected by §4, is amended to read:
EE. An amount equal to 50% of the apportionable global intangible low-taxed net CFC
tested income that the taxpayer included in federal gross income during the taxable
year in accordance with the Code, Section 951A, net of related expenses and other
related deductions deducted in computing federal taxable income. The amount
included in the sales factor of any apportionment formula employed to attribute
apportionable income to this State the taxpayer included in federal gross income during
the taxable year in accordance with the Code, Section 951A is 50% of the amount
included in federal gross income.
Sec. K-22. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶KK is enacted to read:
KK. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and before January 1,
2031, an amount equal to the sum of the following:
(1) An amount equal to the amortization deductions allowable for domestic
research or experimental expenditures under former Section 174 of the Code, prior
to the enactment of the federal Public Law 119-21, with respect to expenditures
that are paid or incurred in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021 and
before January 1, 2026 for which an addition was required under subsection 1,
paragraph LL; and
(2) An amortization deduction for domestic research or experimental expenditures,
except those described in subparagraph (1), for which an addition was required
under subsection 1, paragraph LL in a prior tax year. The amortization deduction
is equal to the amount of the addition modification attributable to such
expenditures allowed to be ratably apportioned under federal Public Law 119-21,
Section 70302 over a period beginning with the taxable year immediately
following the taxable year in which the addition modification was required and
ending in the taxable year beginning in 2030.
Sec. K-23. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶LL is enacted to read:
LL. An amount equal to the net increase in depreciation attributable to the depreciation
deductions allowable under Sections 167 and 168 of the Code that would have been
applicable to that property had the depreciation deduction under the Code, Section
Page 139 - 132LR3049(37)

168(n) not been claimed with respect to such property for which an addition was
required under subsection 1, paragraph MM in a prior year.
Upon the taxable disposition of property to which this paragraph applies, the amount
of any gain or loss includable in federal taxable income must be adjusted for Maine
income tax purposes by an amount equal to the difference between the addition
modification for such property under subsection 1, paragraph MM and the subtraction
modification allowed pursuant to this paragraph.
The total amount of subtraction claimed for property under this paragraph for all tax
years may not exceed the addition modifications under subsection 1, paragraph MM
for the same property.
Sec. K-24. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶MM is enacted to read:
MM. To the extent included in federal taxable income pursuant to the Code, Section
1400Z-2(b), the amount of gain for which an addition was required under subsection
1, paragraph NN in a prior tax year.
Sec. K-25. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. C, §§6 to 11
and c. 388, Pt. Q, §§1 and 2, is further amended to read:
§5219-SS. Dependent exemption tax credit
1. Resident taxpayer; tax years beginning before 2026. For tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2018 and before January 1, 2026, a resident individual is allowed a credit
against the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each qualifying child and
dependent of the taxpayer for whom the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal child tax
credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for the same taxable year, subject to the phase-out
provisions under subsection 4.
1-A. Resident taxpayer; tax years beginning 2026 or after. For tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2026, a resident individual is allowed a credit against the tax
otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each dependent of the taxpayer for whom
the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal personal exemption pursuant to the Code,
Section 151 in an amount greater than $0 for the same taxable year, subject to the phase-
out provisions under subsection 4.
2. Nonresident taxpayer; tax years beginning before 2026. For tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2018 and before January 1, 2026, a nonresident individual is allowed
a credit against the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each qualifying child
and dependent of the taxpayer for whom the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal child
tax credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for the same taxable year, subject to the phase-
out provisions under subsection 4, multiplied by the ratio of the individual's Maine adjusted
gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection 1‑C, paragraph B, to the individual's
entire federal adjusted gross income as modified by section 5122.
2-A. Nonresident taxpayer; tax years beginning 2026 or after. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a nonresident individual is allowed a credit against
the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each dependent of the taxpayer for
whom the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal personal exemption pursuant to the
Code, Section 151 in an amount greater than $0 for the same taxable year, subject to the
phase-out provisions under subsection 4, multiplied by the ratio of the individual's Maine
Page 140 - 132LR3049(37)

adjusted gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection 1‑C, paragraph B, to the
individual's entire federal adjusted gross income as modified by section 5122.
3. Part-year resident taxpayer; tax years beginning before 2026. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2018 and before January 1, 2026, an individual who files
a return as a part-year resident in accordance with section 5224‑A is allowed a credit against
the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each qualifying child and dependent
of the taxpayer for whom the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal child tax credit
pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for the same taxable year, subject to the phase-out
provisions under subsection 4, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
individual's Maine adjusted gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection 1‑C,
paragraph A, for that portion of the taxable year during which the individual was a resident
plus the individual's Maine adjusted gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection
1‑C, paragraph B, for that portion of the taxable year during which the individual was a
nonresident and the denominator of which is the individual's entire federal adjusted gross
income as modified by section 5122.
3-A. Part-year resident taxpayer; tax years beginning 2026 or after. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an individual who files a return as a part-year
resident in accordance with section 5224‑A is allowed a credit against the tax otherwise
due under this Part equal to $300 for each dependent of the taxpayer for whom the taxpayer
was eligible to claim the federal personal exemption pursuant to the Code, Section 151 in
an amount greater than $0 for the same taxable year, subject to the phase-out provisions
under subsection 4, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the individual's
Maine adjusted gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection 1‑C, paragraph A, for
that portion of the taxable year during which the individual was a resident plus the
individual's Maine adjusted gross income, as defined in section 5102, subsection 1‑C,
paragraph B, for that portion of the taxable year during which the individual was a
nonresident and the denominator of which is the individual's entire federal adjusted gross
income as modified by section 5122.
4. Refundability; phase-out. For tax years beginning before January 1, 2024, the
credit allowed by this section may not reduce the tax otherwise due under this Part to less
than zero. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the credit allowed under
subsections 1, 1‑A, and 3 and 3‑A, as increased by subsection 5 for tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2025, is refundable.
For tax years beginning before January 1, 2025, the amount of the credit allowed by this
section must be reduced, but not below zero, by $7.50 for each $1,000 or fraction thereof
by which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income exceeds $400,000 in the case of a
joint return and $200,000 in any other case.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of the credit allowed by
this section, as increased by subsection 5, must be reduced, but not below zero, by $20 for
each $500 or fraction thereof by which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income
exceeds:
A. For a single individual, $100,000;
B. For an individual filing as a head of household, $125,000;
C. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, $150,000; and
Page 141 - 132LR3049(37)

D. For a married individual filing a separate return, 1/2 of the applicable amount under
paragraph C.
5. Increased credit for qualifying children and dependents under 6 years of age.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the credit amount allowed in
subsections 1, 1‑A, 2, 2‑A, and 3 and 3‑A for each qualifying child and dependent who has
not attained 6 years of age before the end of the taxable year is multiplied by 2.
Sec. K-26. 36 MRSA §5219-UU, as amended by PL 2021, c. 253, Pt. A, §6 and
affected by §10, is repealed.
Sec. K-27. Application. This Part applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025 and to any prior tax year as specifically provided by the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, amendments to that Code as of December 31, 2025, and as provided
by federal Public Law 119-21, Section 70302(f), except that the section of this Part that
repeals the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 5219-UU applies to tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
PART L
Sec. L-1. 36 MRSA §2892, 10th ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. JJ, §4, is
amended to read:
For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, the hospital's taxable year is
the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2022 as required in section 2893,
subsection 2-B.
Sec. L-2. 36 MRSA §2892, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. II, §1 and affected
by §6, is further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the hospital's taxable year is
the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2024.
Sec. L-3. 36 MRSA §2893, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Return required in state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. For tax due for
the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, a person subject to the tax imposed by section
2892 shall submit to the assessor a return on a form prescribed by the assessor and pay:
A. An amount equal to 3.25% of the hospital's net operating revenue as identified in
the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's fiscal year that ended during
calendar year 2022 multiplied by one-half on or before November 15, 2025; and
B. An amount equal to 3.25% of the hospital's net operating revenue as identified in
the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's fiscal year that ended during
calendar year 2024 multiplied by one-half.
Sec. L-4. Form and timing of payments. A hospital subject to the tax imposed
by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, chapter 377 shall submit to the State Tax Assessor
a return on a form prescribed and furnished by the assessor and pay the tax by the 30th day
following the effective date of this Part.
Any amounts paid to the assessor for the 2nd half-payment of the total tax due for the
state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2025, pursuant to Title 36, section 2893, subsection
Page 142 - 132LR3049(37)

2, must be deducted from the total amount owed by the hospital pursuant to Title 36, section
2893, subsection 2-B, paragraph B.
Sec. L-5. Retroactivity. Those sections of this Part that amend the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 36, sections 2892 and 2893 apply retroactively to tax due for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2025.
PART M
Sec. M-1. 36 MRSA §383, sub-§4, as repealed and replaced by PL 2001, c. 32,
§1, is amended to read:
4. Penalty for late filing. If the complete return and lists required by this section are
not filed on time, the State Tax Assessor shall impose a penalty to be deducted from state
reimbursement due to the municipality or primary assessing area pursuant to the following
programs in the following order of priority:
A. Maine Tree Growth Tax Law, section 578; and
B. Veterans' property tax exemptions, section 653; and
C. Maine resident homestead property tax exemption, section 685 chapter 105,
subchapter 4-B.
For a municipality or primary assessing area with a population of 2,000 or less, the penalty
is $50 for the first late day plus $10 for each late day thereafter. For a municipality or
primary assessing area with a population of more than 2,000, the penalty is $100 for the
first late day plus $20 for each late day thereafter.
Sec. M-2. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Discontinuance of exemptions. The exemptions provided in this section are
discontinued beginning with property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2027.
Sec. M-3. 36 MRSA §654-A, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Discontinuance of exemption. The exemption provided by subsection 1 is
discontinued beginning with property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2027.
Sec. M-4. 36 MRSA §681, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 647, §2 and affected
by §5, is further amended to read:
2. Homestead. "Homestead" means any residential property, including cooperative
property, in this State assessed as real property owned by an applicant or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of the applicant and occupied by the applicant as the applicant's
permanent residence or owned by a cooperative housing corporation and occupied as a
permanent residence by a resident who is a qualifying shareholder. A "homestead"
"Homestead" does not include any real property used solely for commercial purposes.
For purposes of this subsection, "owned by an applicant" includes:
A. Real property held in a revocable living trust for the benefit of an applicant;
B. Real property in which an applicant has a deeded life estate; and
C. Real property owned by a cooperative housing corporation to the extent that
property is occupied as a permanent residence by an applicant who is a qualifying
shareholder.
Page 143 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. M-5. 36 MRSA §681, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Veteran. "Veteran" means an individual who was on active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States and who, if discharged, retired or separated from the Armed
Forces of the United States, was discharged, retired or separated under conditions other
than dishonorable. “Veteran” also includes:
A. The unremarried surviving spouse or minor child of a deceased veteran who would
be entitled to an exemption under this subchapter if living, or who is in receipt of a
pension or compensation from the Federal Government as the unremarried surviving
spouse or minor child of a deceased veteran; and
B. The parent of a deceased veteran who is 62 years of age or older and is an
unremarried surviving spouse who is in receipt of a pension or compensation from the
Federal Government based upon the service-connected death of that parent’s child.
Sec. M-6. 36 MRSA §682, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 643, Pt. HHH, §3 and
affected by §10, is amended to read:
The assessor shall determine whether an applicant has a permanent residence in this
State for the purpose of this subchapter. In making a determination as to the intent of an
individual to establish a permanent residence in this State, the assessor may consider the
following:
Sec. M-7. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Discontinuance of exemptions. The exemptions provided in this section are
discontinued beginning with property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2027.
Sec. M-8. 36 MRSA §683-A is enacted to read:
§683-A. Homestead exemption
1. Homestead property tax exemption; generally. For property tax years beginning
on or after April 1, 2027, up to $25,000 of the just value of a homestead owned by an
applicant for the preceding 12 months is exempt from taxation.
2. Homestead property tax exemption; veterans. A homestead eligible for
exemption under subsection 1 is eligible for an additional exemption if the permanent
resident is a veteran, as follows.
A. If the veteran does not have a service-connected disability rating or has a service-
connected disability rating of less than 60% as determined by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, the homestead is eligible for an additional exemption
of $5,000 of just value if the veteran is under 62 years of age.
B. If the veteran does not have a service-connected disability rating or has a service-
connected disability rating of less than 60% as determined by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, the homestead is eligible for an additional exemption
of $6,000 of just value if the veteran is 62 years of age or older.
C. If the veteran does not have a service-connected disability rating or has a service-
connected disability rating of less than 60% as determined by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, the homestead is eligible for an additional exemption
of $7,000 of just value if the veteran served during or before World War I.
Page 144 - 132LR3049(37)

D. If the veteran has a service-connected disability rating of 60% or greater, as
determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs:
(1) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 60%, the homestead
is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $10,000 of just value;
(2) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 70%, the homestead
is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $20,000 of just value;
(3) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 80%, the homestead
is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $30,000 of just value;
(4) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 90%, the homestead
is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $40,000 of just value; and
(5) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 100%, the homestead
is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $50,000 of just value.
E. If the veteran has received a grant from the United States Government for a specially
adapted housing unit under 38 United States Code, Section 2101, the homestead is
eligible for an additional exemption of $50,000 of just value.
A homestead eligible for exemption under this subsection is not entitled to exemption under
more than one paragraph of this subsection. An applicant seeking an additional exemption
under this subsection as the unremarried surviving spouse, minor child or parent of a
deceased veteran is eligible for the additional exemption that the deceased veteran would
be eligible for pursuant to this subsection if living.
3. Homestead property tax exemption; individual who is legally blind. If the
permanent resident of a homestead is an individual who is legally blind as determined by a
properly licensed doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy or doctor of optometry, the
homestead is eligible for an additional exemption of up to $5,000 of just value.
4. Cooperative housing corporations. A cooperative housing corporation is eligible
for an exemption under this section to be applied against the valuation of property of the
cooperative housing corporation that is occupied by certain cooperative housing
shareholders. The exemption for a cooperative housing corporation is equal to the total of
all the exemptions that each shareholder would be entitled to under subsection 1 if the
shareholder were the owner of the property. A cooperative housing corporation that
receives an exemption pursuant to this section must apportion the property tax reduction
resulting from the exemption among the cooperative housing shareholders who qualify for
the exemption according to the proportion of the total exemption that each shareholder
would be entitled to if the shareholder were the owner of the property. A supplemental
assessment resulting from disqualification for exemption must be applied in the same
manner against the qualifying shareholders for whom the disqualification applies.
5. Calculation of exemption. In determining the local assessed value of the
exemption provided in this section, the assessor must multiply the amount of the exemption
by the assessment ratio certified by the assessor pursuant to section 383, subsection 2. If
the title to the homestead is held by the applicant jointly or in common with others, the
exemption may not exceed the amounts provided for in this section but may be apportioned
among the owners who reside on the property to the extent of their respective interests. A
municipality responsible for administering the homestead exemption is not obligated to
Page 145 - 132LR3049(37)

create separate accounts for each partial interest in a homestead owned jointly or in
common.
Sec. M-9. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
further amended to read:
1. Generally. The bureau shall provide to the assessor of each municipality access to
forms to be filed by applicants for an exemption under this subchapter and shall determine
the content of the forms. A municipality shall provide to its inhabitants reasonable notice
of the availability of application forms. An individual claiming an exemption under this
subchapter for the first time shall file the application form and proof of entitlement with
the assessor or the assessor's representative. The application and proof of entitlement must
be filed on or before April 1st of the year on which the taxes are based.
Sec. M-10. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Cooperative housing corporations. An application for exemption under this
subchapter filed by a cooperative housing corporation must include a list of all eligible
shareholders and any information required by the assessor to verify the eligibility of those
shareholders and the applicable exemption amount. The application must be updated
annually to reflect changes in eligibility.
Sec. M-11. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Fraudulent conveyance. Property conveyed to a person for the purpose of
obtaining an exemption under this subchapter is not entitled to the exemption, except for
property conveyed between spouses. An applicant who obtains the exemption provided
under this subchapter by means of fraudulent conveyance is subject to a fine of $100 or up
to 2 times the amount of the taxes evaded by the fraudulent conveyance, whichever amount
is greater.
Sec. M-12. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2003, c. 13, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Continuation of eligibility. The assessor shall evaluate annually the ongoing
eligibility of property for which a homestead exemption has been approved under this
subchapter. The evaluation must be based on the status of the property on April 1st of the
year on which the homestead exemption is based. The evaluation must include, but is not
limited to, a review of whether the ownership of the property has changed in any manner
that would disqualify the property for an exemption under this subchapter or whether the
owner has ceased to use the property as a homestead. Unless the assessor determines that
the property is no longer entitled to an exemption under this subchapter, the owner is
entitled to receive the exemption without having to reapply. If the assessor determines that
the property is no longer entitled to an exemption under this subchapter, the assessor shall
notify the owner as provided in section 686 that the property is no longer entitled to an
exemption under this subchapter. Notwithstanding section 683-A, subsection 1, a
permanent resident of this State who loses ownership of a homestead in this State due to a
tax lien foreclosure and subsequently regains ownership of the homestead from the
municipality that foreclosed on the tax lien is deemed to have continuously owned the
homestead and may not be determined ineligible for the exemption provided under this
subchapter due to the ownership of the homestead by the municipality.
Page 146 - 132LR3049(37)

If the assessor determines that the property is no longer entitled to an exemption under this
subchapter, the assessor shall notify the owner of that determination as provided in section
686.
Sec. M-13. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 643, Pt. HHH, §3
and affected by §10, is amended to read:
4. Owner notification. An owner of property receiving an exemption under this
subchapter shall notify the assessor promptly when the ownership or use of the property or
status of the owner changes so as to change the qualification update the eligibility of the
property for an exemption under this subchapter.
Sec. M-14. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Application and proof of entitlement. An individual who desires to secure an
exemption under this section shall, on or before the first day of April in the year in which
such an exemption is first requested, make written application and, for an individual
seeking an additional exemption for veterans under section 683-A, subsection 2, file written
proof of entitlement with the assessors of the place in which the individual resides.
Sec. M-15. 36 MRSA §684, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Confidentiality. Notwithstanding Title 1, chapter 13, an application and proof of
entitlement filed pursuant to subsection 5 are confidential and may not be made available
for public inspection. The application and proof of entitlement must be made available to
the bureau by the municipality upon request.
Sec. M-16. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Effect of reimbursement. A percentage of the just value of all the homestead
exemptions granted under this subchapter in each municipality must be included in the total
municipal valuation used to determine the municipal tax rate and must be included in the
annual determination of state valuation under section 208 and section 305, subsection 1.
The percentage for each property tax year is the same as the percentage of state
reimbursement under subsection 2.
Sec. M-17. 36 MRSA §841, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. D, §38,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
4. Surviving relatives of deceased veterans. Notwithstanding failure to comply with
section 706‑A, the assessors, on written application within one year from the date of
commitment, may make such abatement as they think proper for the surviving relative of a
veteran who died during the 12-month period preceding the April 1st for which the tax was
committed, if the surviving relative would be entitled to the additional exemption under
section 683-A, subsection 2, except for the failure of the surviving relative to file a timely
application and proof of entitlement as required by section 684. For purposes of this
subsection, “surviving relative” is limited to those persons described in section 681,
subsection 6, paragraphs A and B.
Sec. M-18. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§2-E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 360, Pt.
B, §14, is further amended to read:
2-E. Permanently and totally disabled veterans; additional credit. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023, in addition to the credit under subsection 2‑D, a
Page 147 - 132LR3049(37)

resident individual who is a veteran who is 100% permanently and totally disabled is
allowed an additional credit against the taxes imposed under this Part in an amount equal
to the amount calculated under subsection 2‑D. The combined credit under subsection 2‑D
and this subsection may not exceed the property taxes paid by the resident individual or the
bureau pursuant to chapter 908 on behalf of the resident individual during the tax year on
the resident individual's homestead in this State and rent constituting property taxes paid
by the resident individual during the tax year on a homestead in the State, combined. In
the case of married individuals filing a joint return, only one spouse is required to be a
veteran who is 100% permanently and totally disabled to qualify for the additional credit
allowed under this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "100% permanently
and totally disabled" means having a rating by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs at 100% for one or more service-connected disabilities that are rated permanent and
"veteran" has the same meaning as in section 653, subsection 1, paragraph E means an
individual who was on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who, if
discharged, retired or separated from the Armed Forces of the United States, was
discharged, retired or separated under conditions other than dishonorable.
Sec. M-19. 36 MRSA §6234, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 69, §1, is
amended to read:
B. "Veteran" has the same meaning as in section 653 681, subsection 1, paragraph E
and includes any family members eligible for an exemption under that subsection 6.
Sec. M-20. Transition of property tax exemptions for homesteads, veterans
and individuals who are legally blind. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 36, section 684, subsection 1, property that received one of the following property tax
exemptions or additional property tax exemptions in the property tax year beginning April
1, 2026 is presumed to be eligible for that equivalent property tax exemption or additional
property tax exemption for the property tax year beginning April 1, 2027 unless the State
Tax Assessor determines that property is no longer eligible for that exemption under Title
36, chapter 105, subchapter 4-B:
1. The Maine resident homestead property tax exemption pursuant to Title 36, section
683;
2. The additional property tax exemption pursuant to Title 36, section 653 for veterans;
or
3. An additional property tax exemption pursuant to Title 36, section 654-A for persons
who are legally blind.
Sec. M-21. Guidance regarding consolidation of property tax exemptions
for homesteads, veterans and individuals who are legally blind. The State Tax
Assessor shall develop and make publicly available guidance regarding the consolidation
of the Maine resident homestead property tax exemption and the property tax exemptions
for veterans and individuals who are legally blind in accordance with this Part. The
guidance must describe the transition and continuing eligibility for these property tax
exemptions.
PART N
Sec. N-1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶QQ is enacted to read:
Page 148 - 132LR3049(37)

QQ. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amount equal to the
taxpayer's distributive share of the tax imposed by chapter 815, subchapter 3 and the
taxpayer's distributive share of the tax imposed by another state of the United States, a
political subdivision of any such state or the District of Columbia that is substantially
the same as the tax imposed under chapter 815, subchapter 3.
Sec. N-2. 36 MRSA §5190, first ¶, as amended by PL 2019, c. 380, §1 and affected
by §5, is further amended to read:
A partnership is not subject to the tax imposed by this Part. Persons carrying on
business as partners are liable for the tax imposed by this Part only in their separate or
individual capacities. This section does not apply to the taxes imposed by chapters 819 and
827 or, the tax imposed on partnership audit adjustments pursuant to subchapter 2 or the
tax imposed on pass-through entities pursuant to subchapter 3.
Sec. N-3. 36 MRSA c. 815, sub-c. 3 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 3
PASS-THROUGH ENTITY TAX
§5199-A. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Allowable credits. "Allowable credits" means the total amount of any payments
with regard to a taxpayer that have been or will be paid to the bureau prior to the date the
payment against which the total amount of any payments is to be used as a credit is due
and that are available to offset any estimated tax liability under section 5199-H.
2. Distributive share of income. "Distributive share of income" means, with regard
to a qualified member that is a resident individual or resident estate or trust, the net of the
portion of income, gain, loss and deduction for the taxable year from the pass-through
entity, including guaranteed payments, entering into the qualified member's federal
adjusted gross income in the case of a resident individual or federal taxable income in the
case of a resident estate or trust. "Distributive share of income" means, with regard to a
qualified member that is a nonresident individual or nonresident estate or trust, the net of
the portion of income, gain, loss and deduction derived from or connected with sources in
this State, as provided by section 5142, for the taxable year from the pass-through entity,
including guaranteed payments, entering into the qualified member's federal adjusted gross
income in the case of a nonresident individual or federal taxable income in the case of a
nonresident estate or trust. If the qualified member is a trust, residency is determined by
the residency status of the trust and not by the residency status of the beneficiaries of the
trust. For purposes of this subchapter, the distributive share of income for a qualified
member is zero if the amount determined in accordance with this subsection is zero or less.
3. Distributive share of tax. "Distributive share of tax" means the tax paid by an
electing pass-through entity pursuant to section 5199-C multiplied by a fraction, the
numerator of which is equal to the qualified member's distributive share of income and the
denominator of which is equal to the pass-through entity taxable income.
Page 149 - 132LR3049(37)

4. Electing pass-through entity. "Electing pass-through entity" means a pass-through
entity that has elected for the taxable year to be subject to the tax imposed by this
subchapter.
5. Estimated tax. "Estimated tax" means the total amount of tax that an electing pass-
through entity estimates will be due for a taxable year under this subchapter, excluding the
estimated tax liability under section 5199-D, less any allowable credits for that taxable
year.
6. Pass-through entity. "Pass-through entity" means:
A. A partnership as defined in the Code, Section 7701(a)(2), excluding a publicly
traded partnership as defined in the Code, Section 7704(b); and
B. An entity classified as an S corporation under the Code for federal income tax
purposes.
"Pass-through entity" does not include an entity subject to tax under chapter 819.
7. Pass-through entity taxable income. "Pass-through entity taxable income" means
the aggregate total of distributive share of income of all qualified members for the taxable
year increased by the amount of the tax imposed on the pass-through entity by this
subchapter and by the amount of the tax imposed on the pass-through entity by another
state of the United States, a political subdivision of any such state or the District of
Columbia that is substantially the same as the tax imposed under this subchapter.
8. Period of underpayment. "Period of underpayment" means the period of time
from the date an estimated tax installment under section 5199-H is due until the
underpayment is satisfied or until the tax return to which the estimated tax installment
applies is due, whichever is less.
9. Qualified member. "Qualified member" means an individual, trust or estate that
is a direct owner, partner or shareholder in an electing pass-through entity, except that
"qualified member" does not include an organization exempt from tax under the Code,
Section 501. For purposes of this subsection, "direct owner" includes a qualified member
whose ownership in the electing pass-through entity is held through an entity that is
disregarded under the Code for federal income tax purposes.
§5199-B. Election of pass-through entity tax
A pass-through entity that elects to be subject to the tax imposed by this subchapter
shall declare that election annually on a timely filed return, including any extension granted
for filing the return. The election is irrevocable after the due date, including any extension
granted, for filing the return.
§5199-C. Imposition of tax
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for every taxable year beginning
on or after January 1, 2026, a tax is imposed on every electing pass-through entity. For
each taxable year, the tax is equal to the pass-through entity taxable income multiplied by
the highest marginal tax rate under section 5111 except for the income tax surcharge
imposed pursuant to section 5111, subsection 7. The tax imposed by this section may not
be reduced for a pass-through entity by any of the credits in chapter 822. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, for all budgetary accounting purposes, receipts from
Page 150 - 132LR3049(37)

the tax imposed by this section are individual income tax revenue and must be treated for
such purposes in the same manner as receipts from the tax imposed by chapter 803.
§5199-D. Estimated tax payment of 10% on behalf of nonresident qualified members
For every taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a pass-through entity
subject to the tax under this subchapter shall pay, in addition to the tax under section
5199-C, an estimated tax on behalf of its nonresident qualified members in an amount equal
to 10% of the amount of the tax required to be reported to each nonresident qualified
member for the taxable year by the electing pass-through entity in accordance with section
5199-G. The electing pass-through entity, no later than 30 days following the date the
Maine return of the electing pass-through entity is due in accordance with section 5199-E,
without regard to any extension, shall report to each nonresident qualified member the
amount of the estimated tax paid by the pass-through entity for the taxable year on behalf
of the nonresident qualified member. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
for all budgetary accounting purposes, receipts from the tax imposed by this section are
individual income tax revenue and must be treated for such purposes in the same manner
as receipts from the tax imposed by chapter 803.
§5199-E. Filing of returns
1. Filing of returns. An electing pass-through entity shall file a return with respect to
the tax imposed by this subchapter on such forms as may be required by the assessor. The
return must contain such information as required by the assessor, including the name and
social security or federal identification number of each qualified member and, for the
taxable year, each qualified member's distributive share of income, distributive share of tax
paid by the electing pass-through entity pursuant to this subchapter, the amount of the
estimated tax paid by the entity under section 5199-D and the distributive share of tax paid
to another state of the United States, a political subdivision of any such state or the District
of Columbia that is substantially the same as the tax imposed by this subchapter. The
distributive share of the tax paid to another state of the United States, a political subdivision
of any such state or the District of Columbia that is substantially the same as the tax
imposed by this subchapter with respect to qualified members that are not residents of the
State may be reported on an aggregated basis. The return required by this subsection must
be filed, along with any tax due, on or before the 15th day of the 3rd month following the
end of the electing pass-through entity's taxable year for federal income tax purposes. The
return, including related schedules and worksheets, required by this subsection must be
filed with the bureau by electronic data submission.
2. Consent required to amend returns. Notwithstanding the requirement to file an
amended return pursuant to section 5227-A, an electing pass-through entity may not amend
a return filed under this subchapter without the written consent of, or as otherwise
authorized by, the assessor.
§5199-F. Nonresident qualified member filing exception
1. Nonresident individual. A qualified member of an electing pass-through entity
who is a nonresident individual for the entire taxable year is not required to file an income
tax return pursuant to section 5220, subsection 2 for the same taxable year if:
Page 151 - 132LR3049(37)

A. The member's entire Maine adjusted gross income, including a spouse's income in
the case of married individuals filing a joint federal return, is from one or more electing
pass-through entities;
B. The electing pass-through entity or entities file and pay the tax due under this
subchapter; and
C. The qualified member's credit provided by section 5219-CCC plus the estimated
tax amount paid by the electing pass-through entity on behalf of the nonresident
qualified member in accordance with section 5199-D is sufficient to satisfy the Maine
individual income tax liability of the member and the member's spouse for that taxable
year.
2. Nonresident trust or estate. A qualified member of an electing pass-through entity
that is a nonresident trust or estate for the entire taxable year is not required to file an
income tax return pursuant to section 5220, subsection 4 for the same taxable year if:
A. The member has its entire Maine-sourced income, as determined pursuant to section
5142, for the taxable year from one or more electing pass-through entities;
B. The member would have been required to include income described in paragraph
A as Maine taxable income if it were to file an income tax return for that year;
C. The member has not distributed any of its Maine-sourced income, as determined
pursuant to section 5142, for the taxable year to its beneficiaries as distributable net
income;
D. The electing pass-through entity or entities file and pay the tax due under this
subchapter; and
E. The member's credit provided by section 5219-CCC plus the estimated tax amount
paid by the electing pass-through entity on behalf of the nonresident qualified member
in accordance with section 5199-D is sufficient to satisfy the Maine income tax liability
for that taxable year.
§5199-G. Reporting tax to members
For purposes of the credit under section 5219-CCC, the electing pass-through entity,
no later than 30 days following the date the Maine return of the electing pass-through entity
is due in accordance with section 5199-E, shall report to each qualified member that
member's distributive share of tax. Each member report must clearly identify the member's
name and federal employer identification number or social security number, the member's
ownership interest in the entity, whether the member was a resident or nonresident of the
State during the taxable year, each member's distributive share of income and the
distributive share of tax paid to another state of the United States, a political subdivision of
any such state or the District of Columbia that is substantially the same as the tax imposed
by this subchapter and any other information that may be required by the assessor.
§5199-H. Estimated tax installment payments
Estimated taxes are required with respect to the tax imposed under section 5199-C in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
Page 152 - 132LR3049(37)

1. Requirement to pay estimated tax. Every person subject to taxation under this
subchapter shall make payment of estimated tax as required by this section. The
requirement to make estimated tax payments is waived if:
A. The electing pass-through entity's estimated tax liability is less than $1,000 for the
taxable year; or
B. The electing pass-through entity had less than $1,000 tax liability under this
subchapter, excluding the estimated tax liability under section 5199-D, for the
preceding taxable year.
2. Amount of estimated tax to be paid. Every electing pass-through entity required
to make payment of estimated tax under this subchapter is liable for an estimated tax that
is no less than the smaller of:
A. An amount equal to the electing pass-through entity's tax liability under this
subchapter, excluding the estimated tax liability under section 5199-D, for the
preceding taxable year, if that preceding year was a taxable year of 12 months; and
B. An amount equal to 90% of the electing pass-through entity's tax liability under this
subchapter, excluding the estimated tax liability under section 5199-D, for the current
taxable year.
3. Due dates for estimated tax installments. An installment payment is due the 15th
day of the 4th, 6th, 9th and 13th month following the beginning of the electing pass-through
entity's taxable year.
4. Amount of installment. The amount of estimated tax to be paid in a taxable year
by an electing pass-through entity must be paid in installments by the dates established in
subsection 3. The amount of the estimated tax must be paid in 4 equal installments unless
the taxpayer establishes by adequate record the actual distribution of tax liability and
allowable credits, or both, in which case the amount of the installment payments must be
adjusted accordingly and be determined in accordance with the portion of the electing pass-
through entity's estimated tax liability applicable to that portion of the electing pass-through
entity's taxable year completed by the close of the month preceding the installment's due
date less estimated tax payments already made for the taxable year.
5. Penalty. A penalty accrues automatically on underpayments of the required
installment amount for the period of underpayment at the rate provided pursuant to section
186. For cause, the assessor may waive or abate all or part of the penalty.
6. Short taxable year. For a taxable year of less than 12 months, the estimated tax
must be paid in full by the 15th day of the last month of the taxable year. For payment dates
falling within the short taxable year, payment must be made as provided in subsection 3.
7. Installments paid in advance. At the election of the electing pass-through entity,
an installment of estimated tax may be paid prior to the date prescribed for its payment.
§5199-I. Interest on refunds prohibited
Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, interest may not be paid by
the assessor on an overpayment of the tax imposed by this subchapter.
Sec. N-4. 36 MRSA §5217-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 391, §9 and c. 673, Pt.
JJ, §4 and affected by §6, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
Page 153 - 132LR3049(37)

§5217-A. Income tax paid to other taxing jurisdiction
A resident individual is allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this Part,
excluding the tax imposed by section 5203-C, equal to the amount determined in subsection
1 plus the amount determined in subsection 2, as limited by subsection 4.
1. Individual income tax. For individual income tax, the credit is the amount of
income tax imposed on that individual for the taxable year by another state of the United
States, a political subdivision of any such state, the District of Columbia or any political
subdivision of a foreign country that is analogous to a state of the United States with respect
to income subject to tax under this Part that is derived from sources in that taxing
jurisdiction.
2. Distributive share. If another state of the United States, a political subdivision of
any such state, the District of Columbia or any political subdivision of a foreign country
that is analogous to a state of the United States imposes an income tax on an individual,
trust or estate that is substantially similar to the income tax imposed on such an individual,
trust or estate under this Part, the credit is equal to the amount of the individual's distributive
share of tax imposed on a pass-through entity that is substantially similar to the tax imposed
under chapter 815, subchapter 3, reduced by any refundable credits to the extent the
refundable credits reduce the income tax imposed on the individual, trust or estate below
zero, with respect to income subject to tax under this Part that is derived from sources in
that taxing jurisdiction.
3. Sourcing of income. In determining whether income is derived from sources in
another jurisdiction described in subsections 1 and 2, the assessor may not employ the law
of the other jurisdiction but shall instead assume that a statute equivalent to section 5142
applies in that jurisdiction.
4. Credit limitation. The credit, for any of the specified taxing jurisdictions described
in subsections 1 and 2, may not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this
Part, excluding the tax imposed by section 5203-C, that the amount of the taxpayer's Maine
adjusted gross income derived from sources in that taxing jurisdiction bears to the
taxpayer's entire Maine adjusted gross income; except that, when a credit is claimed for
taxes paid to both a state and a political subdivision of a state, the total credit allowable for
those taxes does not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this Part,
excluding the tax imposed by section 5203-C, that the amount of the taxpayer's Maine
adjusted gross income derived from sources in the other state bears to the taxpayer's entire
Maine adjusted gross income.
Sec. N-5. 36 MRSA §5219-CCC is enacted to read:
§5219-CCC. Credit for pass-through entity tax paid
A qualified member, as defined in section 5199-A, subsection 9, is allowed a credit
against the tax imposed by this Part equal to 90% of the amount of the tax required to be
reported to the qualified member for the taxable year by an electing pass-through entity, as
defined in section 5199-A, subsection 4, in accordance with section 5199-G. The credit
authorized by this section is refundable. A credit is not allowed under this section unless
the electing pass-through entity paid the tax imposed under chapter 815, subchapter 3 and
provided sufficient information on the pass-through entity tax return as prescribed by the
assessor to identify that qualified member and the qualified member's distributive share of
Page 154 - 132LR3049(37)

the tax paid by the electing pass-through entity. The provisions of section 5219-G,
subsection 2 may not be applied to the credit allowed under this section.
Sec. N-6. 36 MRSA §5228, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2007, c. 438, §105, is
further amended to read:
B. "Estimated tax" means the total amount of tax that a person estimates will be due
for a taxable year under this Part, exclusive of a withholder's liability for taxes withheld
and the tax imposed by chapter 815, subchapter 3, less any allowable credits for that
taxable year.
Sec. N-7. 36 MRSA §5231, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. C, §7
and affected by §11, is further amended to read:
1-A. Federal extension. When an individual, estate or trust is granted an extension
of time within which to file a federal income tax return for any taxable year, an extension
to file the taxpayer's income tax return with respect to the tax imposed by this Part is
automatically granted for an equivalent period from the date prescribed for filing the return.
When a taxable corporation, an electing pass-through entity under chapter 815, subchapter
3 or a financial institution subject to the tax imposed by chapter 819 is granted an extension
of time within which to file its federal income tax return for any taxable year, an extension
to file the taxpayer's income tax, pass-through entity tax or franchise tax return with respect
to the tax imposed by this Part is automatically granted for an equivalent period from the
date prescribed for filing the return plus 30 days.
Sec. N-8. Application. This Act applies to taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.
PART O
Sec. O-1. 36 MRSA §6652, sub-§1-D, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 12, Pt. BBB, §2
and affected by §6, is amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to
read:
For application periods that begin on or after August 1, 2029, reimbursement may not be
made with respect to property located at a retail sales facility and used primarily in a retail
sales activity, including property grandfathered into the program pursuant to this
subsection.
Sec. O-2. 36 MRSA §6652, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2013, c. 368, Pt. K, §1, is
further amended to read:
4. Reimbursement percentage. The reimbursement under this chapter is an amount
equal to the percentage specified in paragraphs A and B of taxes assessed and paid with
respect to each item of eligible property, except that for claims filed for application periods
that begin on August 1, 2006, August 1, 2009, August 1, 2010 or August 1, 2013, the
reimbursement is 90% of that amount and, for claims filed for the application period that
begins on August 1, 2014, the reimbursement is 80% of that amount and for claims filed
for the application period that begins on August 1, 2028, the reimbursement is 50% of that
amount with respect to eligible property located at a retail sales facility and used primarily
in a retail sales activity.
A. For each of the first to 12th years for which reimbursement is made, the percentage
is 100%.
Page 155 - 132LR3049(37)

B. Pursuant to section 699, subsection 2, reimbursement under this chapter after the
12th year for which reimbursement is made is according to the following percentages
of taxes assessed and paid with respect to each item of eligible property.
(1) For the 13th year for which reimbursement is made, the percentage is 75%.
(2) For the 14th year for which reimbursement is made, the percentage is 70%.
(3) For the 15th year for which reimbursement is made, the percentage is 65%.
(4) For the 16th year for which reimbursement is made, the percentage is 60%.
(5) For the 17th year for which reimbursement is made, the percentage is 55%.
(6) For the 18th year for which reimbursement is made and for subsequent years,
the percentage is 50%.
PART P
Sec. P-1. Suspension of appropriation limitation. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the requirements in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 1534 establishing a General Fund appropriation limitation and the criteria for
exceeding that limitation are suspended for fiscal year 2026-27.
PART Q
Sec. Q-1. Transfer of interest earnings; General Fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $6,678,121 from the interest earnings on the Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP
State Fiscal Recovery fund and the Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP fund to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
PART R
Sec. R-1. Transfer to General Fund unappropriated surplus; Reserve for
General Fund Operating Capital. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $2,500,000 from
available balance in the Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund.
PART S
Sec. S-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Information Services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services is authorized to transfer up to
$812,630 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all salary, benefit
and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category in the Information Services
program, General Fund for the purpose of funding stabilization of geographic information
system functions, including latency. These amounts may be transferred by financial order
upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART T
Page 156 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. T-1. Affordability Payment Program established; purpose. The State
has determined that residents face increasingly high costs for basic necessities of life and,
further, that the burden of these high costs warrants assistance from the State. The
Affordability Payment Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established
within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services to promote the general
welfare by returning a portion of consumption taxes through a payment to individuals
disproportionately affected by those costs. The affordability payment is intended to offset
expenses that have been incurred, and will be incurred in fiscal year 2026-27, by those
individuals.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Affordability payment" means a payment in the amount of $300 made pursuant to
the program.
B. "Assessor" means the State Tax Assessor.
C. "Eligible recipient" means an individual who:
(1) Filed, by October 15, 2026, a Maine income tax return as a full-year resident
of the State for the tax year;
(2) Had, and reported to the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Maine Revenue Services by October 15, 2026 on an income tax return, federal
adjusted gross income for the tax year of less than:
(a) For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses permitted
to file a joint return, $100,000;
(b) For an individual filing as a head of household, $75,000;
(c) For a single individual, $50,000; or
(d) For a married individual filing a separate return, $50,000; and
(3) May not be claimed as a dependent on another taxpayer's return for the tax
year.
D. "Fund" means the Affordability Payment Program Fund Other Special Revenue
Funds account established by the State Controller pursuant to subsection 2.
E. "Tax year" means a tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2025 but not later than
December 31, 2025.
Any other terms used in this section have the same meanings as when used in a comparable
context in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, Part 8 relating to Maine income taxes,
unless different meanings are clearly required.
2. Affordability Payment Program Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account
established. The State Controller shall establish within the Department of Administrative
and Financial Services the nonlapsing Affordability Payment Program Fund Other Special
Revenue Funds account, which is funded through a transfer from the available balance of
the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund pursuant to section 2.
3. Affordability payment. The assessor shall make affordability payments in
accordance with this subsection.
A. The assessor shall identify all eligible recipients.
Page 157 - 132LR3049(37)

B. Beginning as soon as administratively feasible but not later than July 31, 2026, the
assessor shall make an affordability payment to each eligible recipient for Maine
income tax returns filed by July 1, 2026 for the tax year. Funds for the affordability
payments must come from the fund and, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, are not subject to setoff to debts owed to agencies of the State.
C. By December 31, 2026, the assessor shall make an affordability payment to each
eligible recipient who did not receive an affordability payment pursuant to paragraph
B. Funds for the affordability payments must come from the fund and, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, are not subject to setoff to debts owed to agencies
of the State.
D. An individual who has not received an affordability payment under paragraph B or
C may provide documentation to the assessor by March 1, 2027 showing that the
individual is an eligible recipient. The assessor shall review the documentation,
determine if the individual is an eligible recipient and notify the individual of any
adverse determination. This determination constitutes final agency action and is not
reviewable pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 151.
E. By April 30, 2027, the assessor shall make an affordability payment to each eligible
recipient determined eligible pursuant to paragraph D. Funds for the affordability
payments must come from the fund and, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, are not subject to setoff to debts owed to agencies of the State.
4. State income tax subtraction modification. For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026 but not later than December 31, 2027, in determining the taxable income
of an individual, within the meaning of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 5122,
federal adjusted gross income must be reduced by an amount equal to the affordability
payment received by the individual, pursuant to this Part, to the extent the payment is
included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year. The assessor shall request
a ruling from the United States Internal Revenue Service that the affordability payments
are not subject to federal taxation.
5. Designation as unclaimed property. For purposes of the program, affordability
payment checks that remain undeposited on December 31, 2027 are to be treated as
unclaimed property but are not subject to the notice and receipt provisions established in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 33, section 2101 or the one-year dormancy period
specified in Title 33, section 2061 that would be applicable to such checks. The Treasurer
of State shall use unclaimed property systems and networks to find the proper recipients of
such checks as quickly as possible.
6. Application to municipal general assistance program. For purposes of the
municipal general assistance program established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 22, chapter 1161, affordability payments are not income, as defined in Title 22, section
4301, subsection 7; may not be considered to reduce need, as defined in Title 22, section
4301, subsection 10; and may not be considered a potential resource, as described in Title
22, section 4317.
7. Taxability of affordability payment. The State finds that the great majority of
eligible recipients have paid at least $300 in Maine sales and excise taxes, which have
contributed to the balance in the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund. The State further finds
that the affordability payments authorized by this section in effect return a portion of those
Page 158 - 132LR3049(37)

tax payments to individuals considered to be disproportionately affected by such taxes.
Accordingly, the State finds and intends that the affordability payments constitute a refund
of those taxes paid for the purpose of determining whether the payments are income subject
to tax under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and the State's conformity to
the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Sec. T-2. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Department of
Administrative and Financial Services Affordability Payment Program Fund.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State
Controller shall transfer $155,200,000 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services to the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Affordability Payment Program Fund Other Special
Revenue Funds account for a one-time affordability payment to eligible recipients.
Sec. T-3. Department of Education, Maine School Safety Center program,
Other Special Revenue Funds account established. The State Controller shall
establish within the Department of Education a nonlapsing Other Special Revenue Funds
account within the Maine School Safety Center program, which is funded through a transfer
from the available balance of the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund pursuant to section 4.
Sec. T-4. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Department of
Education, Maine School Safety Center. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $5,921,640 from
the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services to the Department of Education, Maine School Safety Center program,
Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. T-5. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Department of
Health and Human Services, Office for Family Independence. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall
transfer $4,334,946 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Office for Family Independence program, Other Special Revenue Funds account for one-
time needs for technology and compliance with federal Public Law 119-21.
Sec. T-6. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Department of
Health and Human Services Office of MaineCare Services. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall
transfer $576,442 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Office of MaineCare Services program, Other Special Revenue Funds account for one-time
needs for technology and compliance with federal Public Law 119-21.
Sec. T-7. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Maine State
Housing Authority, Emergency Housing Relief Fund Program. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall
transfer $14,000,000 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to the Maine State Housing Authority, Emergency
Housing Relief Fund Program, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Page 159 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. T-8. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Maine State
Housing Authority, Housing Authority - State. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer
$37,500,000 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to the Maine State Housing Authority, Housing
Authority - State program, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. T-9. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; MaineCare
Stabilization Fund program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $22,000,000 from the Maine
Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services
to the MaineCare Stabilization Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Health and Human Services to prevent any loss of services or increased cost
of services to a MaineCare member that would otherwise result from insufficient General
Fund appropriations, insufficient federal matching funds or any other shortage of funds or
changes in federal or state law, regulation, rule or policy.
Sec. T-10. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Maine Office
of Community Affairs Housing Opportunity Program. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall
transfer $1,000,000 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services to the Maine Office of Community Affairs Housing
Opportunity Program, Other Special Revenue Funds account for a 3-year pilot project to
provide regionalized building code enforcement.
Sec. T-11. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Affordability Payment Program Z456
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for an affordability payment program that will
provide a $300 affordability payment to each eligible recipient and for the costs of
administration, programming, mailing and taxpayer assistance.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $155,200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $155,200,000
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $155,200,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $155,200,000
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Page 160 - 132LR3049(37)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for safety measures including retrofitting nearly 1,700
Maine school buses with crossing arms and antipinch door sensors.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,921,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $5,921,640
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $5,921,640
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $5,921,640
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
MaineCare Stabilization Fund Z018
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to prevent any loss of services or increased cost of
services to a MaineCare member that would otherwise result from insufficient General
Fund appropriations, insufficient federal matching funds or any other shortage of funds or
changes in federal or state law, rule or policy.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $22,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $22,000,000
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for one-time technology adjustments and compliance
with federal Public Law 119-21.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $14,044,045
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $14,044,045
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for one-time technology adjustments and compliance
with federal Public Law 119-21.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,276,682
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,276,682
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $576,442
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $576,442
Page 161 - 132LR3049(37)

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $1,276,682
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $36,620,487
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $37,897,169
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Emergency Housing Relief Fund Program Z340
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Community Aging in Place grant program for
2 years to provide services through nonprofit organizations around the State to eligible low-
income elderly and disabled homeowners.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Emergency Housing Relief Fund Program Z340
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to supplement or establish programs addressing the
needs of people experiencing homelessness or facing other immediate housing challenges
and support other uses that address housing emergencies in the State. These funds will
provide emergency, transitional and permanent housing responses to homelessness.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $12,000,000
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Provides one-time funding from the budget stabilization fund to create more than
300 new affordable homes for ownership and rental across the State through the Rural
Affordable Rental Housing Program, the federal Low-income Housing Tax Credit program
and the Affordable Homeownership Program, and for code enforcement compliance for
existing projects for low-income and moderate-income households, with incentives added
for projects that invest in wood fiber insulation and heat pumps and with consideration for
those that use a modular building approach. These funds may be used for expansion and
infill projects at manufactured home parks where the lots are not owned by the resident.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $37,500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $37,500,000
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Page 162 - 132LR3049(37)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $51,500,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $51,500,000
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Housing Opportunity Program Z418
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a 3-year pilot project to provide regionalized
building code enforcement.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,000,000
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $1,276,682
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $250,242,127
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $251,518,809
PART U
Sec. U-1. 7 MRSA c. 8-A, sub-c. 4, headnote is amended to read:
SUBCHAPTER 4
FARMERS DROUGHT RELIEF GRANT RESILIENCE PROGRAM
Sec. U-2. 7 MRSA §220-A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. TT, §1, is further
amended to read:
§220-A. Farmers Drought Relief Grant Resilience Program
1. Grant program established. The Farmers Drought Relief Grant Resilience
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established in the department to
assist farmers in the State to overcome the adverse effects of drought conditions by
providing grants in accordance with this section.
Page 163 - 132LR3049(37)

2. Eligibility. A farmer in the State may apply for a grant under the program if the
farmer needs to establish a source for irrigation water to alleviate the risk of crop losses
due to drought. The source for irrigation water must be sustainable, environmentally sound
and affordable.
3. Farmers Drought Relief Grant Resilience Program Fund. The Farmers Drought
Relief Grant Resilience Program Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund to provide
funding to achieve the purposes of the program. The department may use funds for
personnel services and to contract for professional services to carry out the purposes of this
section. The fund consists of any funds received from private and public sources. The
fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and accounts. Any
balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward to the
next fiscal year.
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement the program. The rules must
include grant eligibility requirements, grant application and award procedures and grant
funding limits. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
PART V
Sec. V-1. 12 MRSA §1849, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. W, §1, is
further amended to read:
2. Fund Funds established. All income received by the director from the public
reserved lands, except income provided for in section 1855, must be deposited with the
Treasurer of State to be credited to the Public Reserved Lands Management Fund, which
is established as a nonlapsing fund and is subject to allocation by the Legislature. Any
interest earned on this money must also be credited to the fund. No expenditure may be
made from the fund other than for the bureau's general operating purposes with respect to
management of the public reserved lands unless the fund has a cash operating balance of at
least $2,500,000 at the start of the fiscal year during which the expenditure is made.
A. The Public Reserved Lands Conservation Easement Trust Fund, referred to in this
paragraph as "the easement trust," is established as an account within the land
management and planning program within the department. The easement trust is a
nonlapsing, dedicated fund to be used only to monitor and defend conservation
easements held by the bureau. The director may accept funds from any source and may
accept gifts in trust to be credited to the easement trust to be invested by the Treasurer
of State according to the laws governing the investment of trust funds. Interest earned
on investments in the easement trust must be credited to the easement trust. The
director may use interest and earnings from the easement trust for purposes of the
easement trust as described in this paragraph. Principal from the easement trust may
be used only with the approval of the Treasurer of State for extenuating circumstances,
including legal defense.
B. The Public Reserved Lands Management Trust Fund, referred to in this paragraph
as "the land management trust," is established as an account within the land
management and planning program within the department. The land management trust
is a nonlapsing, dedicated fund to be used only for the management of public reserved
lands in which the State holds fee title or as a tenant in common. The director may
accept funds from any source and may accept gifts in trust to be credited to the land
Page 164 - 132LR3049(37)

management trust to be invested by the Treasurer of State according to the laws
governing the investment of trust funds. Interest earned on investments in the land
management trust must be credited to the land management trust. The director may
use interest and earnings from the land management trust for purposes of the land
management trust as described in this paragraph. When the Public Reserved Lands
Management Fund balance is above $5,000,000, the bureau, to the extent permitted
under the laws governing the investment of trust funds, may temporarily invest those
funds above $5,000,000 in the land management trust with the Treasurer of State.
Principal from the land management trust may be used only at the request of the
director and approval of the commissioner, after consultation with the Treasurer of
State.
PART W
Sec. W-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $550,000 appropriated in Public Law 2021, chapter
635 in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture
program, General Fund account, All Other line category to the next fiscal year to be used
for the replacement of the feed, seed and fertilizer database.
PART X
Sec. X-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $1,500,000 appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter
412 in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture
program, General Fund account, Capital Expenditures line category to the next fiscal year
to be used for replacement of the licensing and inspection database for the division of
quality assurance and regulations.
PART Y
Sec. Y-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $750,000 appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter
412, Part A in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of
Agriculture program, General Fund account, Capital Expenditures line category to the next
fiscal year to be used to upgrade the Cony Road facility in Augusta.
PART Z
Sec. Z-1. 22 MRSA §1902, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Maine Title X grantee. "Maine Title X grantee" means a provider of family
planning services as defined in 42 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 59.2 that is based
in the State; is licensed, certified or otherwise legally authorized to deliver services in the
State; is engaged primarily in the delivery of reproductive health care and family planning
Page 165 - 132LR3049(37)

services as described in 42 United States Code, Section 1396d(a)(4)(C); and has previously
received funding under the Title X program.
Sec. Z-2. 22 MRSA §1902, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Title X program. "Title X program" means the program of grants for voluntary
family planning projects described in Title X of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42
United States Code, Section 300.
Sec. Z-3. 22 MRSA §1912 is enacted to read:
§1912. Funding for Maine Title X grantees; substitute funding
For any fiscal year after state fiscal year 2024-25, if the funding previously received
by a Maine Title X grantee under the Title X program is reduced relative to the funds
received in fiscal year 2024-25 or is eliminated as a result of action by the Federal
Government or of a decision by the grantee to withdraw from receiving funding under the
Title X program due to the imposition of conditions attached to the funding, the department
shall grant state funds to the Maine Title X grantee equal to the difference between the
amount the grantee received from the Title X program in fiscal year 2024-25 and the
amount the grantee receives and accepts in any subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. Z-4. 22 MRSA §1913 is enacted to read:
§1913. Access to family planning services
1. Access to services. In accordance with this chapter, the department shall provide
funding to maintain statewide access to family planning services. The department shall
issue a request for proposals from qualified providers of family planning services. The
department shall select one provider to provide management and oversight of the delivery
of family planning services in this State, including, but not limited to, the coordination and
management of any grants to subrecipients, and shall distribute funds appropriated for that
purpose.
2. Fund established. The Fund to Maintain Access to Statewide Family Planning
Services, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established as a dedicated, nonlapsing
fund within the department to provide family planning services under this section. The
department may accept funds into the fund from any public or private source for the
purpose of awarding a grant under this section. Any funds appropriated to the fund may
not supplant other sources of funding. It is the intent of the Legislature that, beginning in
fiscal year 2027-28, $5,000,000 in ongoing funding be appropriated from the General Fund
to the fund to be distributed to a single grantee.
3. Grant. The department shall make funds available from the fund in the form of a
grant and may not distribute any funds under a fee-for-service basis.
Sec. Z-5. 22 MRSA §3196-A is enacted to read:
§3196-A. Services provided by federally unfunded providers
1. Federally unfunded provider; definition. For the purposes of this section,
"federally unfunded provider" means a health care provider:
A. That is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by state law to deliver health care
services; and
Page 166 - 132LR3049(37)

B. That, pursuant to any federal law, the department may not pay using federal funds
provided to carry out the state plan under Title XIX of the United States Social Security
Act, for items or services provided on or after July 1, 2025 pursuant to federal law.
2. State funding for services. Family planning services, as defined by section 1902,
subsection 4, and any other Medicaid-covered items or services lawfully provided to
MaineCare members by a federally unfunded provider during any period for which federal
funds may not be used to pay that provider, including any services provided between July
1, 2025 and the effective date of this section, must be reimbursed with state funds. The
department shall reimburse the federally unfunded provider at no less than the MaineCare
rate established by the department for those services on the date the service was provided.
If any federal funds were used to pay a federally unfunded provider prior to the effective
date of this section, state funds must be used to substitute for any federal funds that the
department is required to reimburse or adjust in its transactions with the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
3. Discrimination prohibited. The department may not discriminate against, exclude,
limit the participation of or modify the payment plan of a provider in the MaineCare
program because the provider is a federally unfunded provider for any period of time.
4. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection may be effective
retroactively to July 1, 2025, but any subsequent amendments to these rules may be
retroactive only as permitted by section 42, subsection 8.
Sec. Z-6. Emergency rulemaking. The Department of Health and Human
Services may adopt rules pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3196-A,
subsection 4 as emergency rules without making findings as to the existence of any
emergency required by Title 5, section 8054, subsection 2.
PART AA
Sec. AA-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Natural Areas
Program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27,
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry is authorized to transfer up to
$150,000 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all salary, benefit
and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the Natural Areas Program,
General Fund account for the purposes of funding early detection and rapid response to
eradicate invasive stilt grass. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon
the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. AA-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Natural Areas
Program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27,
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry is authorized to transfer up to
$25,000 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all salary, benefit
and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the Natural Areas Program,
General Fund account for the purpose of funding an update to Maine's Official List of
Page 167 - 132LR3049(37)

Threatened and Endangered Plants. These amounts may be transferred by financial order
upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. AA-3. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, DACF
Administration. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year
2026-27, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry is authorized to
transfer up to $159,643 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the DACF
Administration program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding an upgrade to
the Maine Land Use Planning Commission Geographically Oriented Action Tracker
database, geographic information system expenses, equipment and licenses required to use
the human resource management system. These amounts may be transferred by financial
order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor.
These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. AA-4. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Maine Land Use
Planning Commission. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal
year 2026-27, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry is authorized to
transfer up to $40,000 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the Maine
Land Use Planning Commission program, General Fund account for the purpose of funding
stakeholder engagement in preparation for updates to the Comprehensive Land Use Plan.
These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
PART BB
Sec. BB-1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Department of Education. The Department of Education shall carry forward any
balance remaining in the Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program Fund, General Fund
account at the end of any fiscal year for use in the next fiscal year for the same purpose.
Sec. BB-2. 20-A MRSA §6603-A is enacted to read:
§6603-A. Early childhood nutrition grant program
The department shall create and administer, in consultation with the Department of
Health and Human Services, Office of Child and Family Services, a grant program to
provide grants to school administrative units to enter into agreements with providers of off-
site public preschool programs to provide students in those programs with breakfast, lunch
and a snack in accordance with this section.
1. Definition. For the purposes of this section, "off-site public preschool program"
means a public preschool program offered by a public school in the State in partnership
with a community provider that is not located on the site of a public school and includes,
but is not limited to, a public preschool program offered at a private child care facility.
Page 168 - 132LR3049(37)

2. Eligibility. After consulting with the Department of Health and Human Services,
Office of Child and Family Services, the department shall adopt rules to establish eligibility
standards and requirements for participation in the grant program. Eligibility standards and
requirements must align with rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human
Services for the licensing of child care facilities, including, but not limited to, child care
centers, nursery schools and small child care facilities. Eligibility standards and
requirements must include, but are not limited to:
A. A requirement that the off-site public preschool program meet the basic approval
standards for public preschools adopted by the department;
B. A requirement that the off-site public preschool program provide food that meets
the nutritional standards developed for child care centers as provided in section 6602
and pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section 1766 and administered by the United
States Department of Agriculture, child and adult food care program;
C. Requirements for the eligibility of school administrative units partnering with
licensed child care programs for the delivery of special education services for children
eligible under Part B, Section 619 as defined in section 7001, subsection 1-D; and
D. A requirement that a memorandum of understanding between the school
administrative unit and the off-site public preschool program provider describe the
process by which meals will be delivered and reimbursed.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
3. Awards. Grants awarded by the department pursuant to this section are governed
as follows.
A. The amount of a grant is limited to the total annual per-student reimbursement rate
for the National School Lunch Program established in 7 Code of Federal Regulations,
Part 210.
B. The department may not distribute grant funds prior to the 2027-2028 school year.
4. Fund established. The Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program Fund, referred
to in this subsection as "the fund," is established within the department to be used for the
grant program in accordance with this section. The fund consists of any funds appropriated
or allocated for inclusion in the fund by the State. The fund is nonlapsing and any balance
remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
PART CC
Sec. CC-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Corrections, Maine State Prison. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Corrections is authorized to
transfer up to $1,304,186 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met to the All Other line category of the Maine
State Prison program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding rising electricity
costs, Maine Criminal Justice Academy training costs, rising water and sewer utility costs
and rising costs of contracting with Johnson Controls Fire Protection LP and Siemens
Industry, Inc. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
Page 169 - 132LR3049(37)

recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. CC-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Corrections, Correctional Center. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Corrections is authorized
to transfer up to $1,181,708 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations after
all salary, benefit and other obligations are met to the All Other line category of the
Correctional Center program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding rising
electricity costs, Maine Criminal Justice Academy training costs, rising water and sewer
utility costs and rising costs of contracting with Johnson Controls Fire Protection LP and
Siemens Industry, Inc. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. CC-3. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Corrections, Long Creek Youth Development Center.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the
Department of Corrections is authorized to transfer up to $417,720 of available balances of
Personal Services appropriations after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met to
the All Other line category of the Long Creek Youth Development Center program, General
Fund account for the purposes of funding rising electricity costs, Maine Criminal Justice
Academy training costs, rising water and sewer utility costs and rising costs of contracting
with Johnson Controls Fire Protection LP and Siemens Industry, Inc. These amounts may
be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. CC-4. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Corrections, Mountain View Correctional Facility.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the
Department of Corrections is authorized to transfer up to $379,411 of available balances of
Personal Services appropriations after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met to
the All Other line category of the Mountain View Correctional Facility program, General
Fund account for the purposes of funding rising electricity costs, Maine Criminal Justice
Academy training costs and rising costs of contracting with Johnson Controls Fire
Protection LP and Siemens Industry, Inc. These amounts may be transferred by financial
order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor.
These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART DD
Sec. DD-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the
Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management is authorized to transfer up
to $76,000 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations after all salary, benefit
and other obligations are met to the All Other line category of the Military Training &
Operations program for the purpose of funding rising electricity costs. These amounts may
be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Page 170 - 132LR3049(37)

PART EE
Sec. EE-1. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. XXX,
§1, is further amended to read:
B. Six hundred ninety-nine thousand, one hundred fifty dollars in fiscal year 2001-02
to federally qualified health centers to support the infrastructure of these programs in
providing primary care services to underserved populations. Forty-four thousand, two
hundred fifty dollars must be provided to each federally qualified health center with an
additional $8,850 for the 2nd and each additional site operated by a federally qualified
health center. For the purposes of this paragraph, "site" means a site or sites operated
by the federally qualified health center within its scope of service that meet all health
center requirements, including providing primary care services, regardless of patients'
ability to pay, 5 days a week with extended hours. If there is not sufficient funding to
meet the formula in this paragraph, the $699,150 must be allocated in proportion to the
formula outlined in this paragraph; and
Sec. EE-2. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. XXX,
§2, is further amended to read:
C. Five hundred thousand dollars, beginning with fiscal year 2015-16 and continuing
each fiscal year thereafter, to support access to primary medical, behavioral health and
dental services to residents of the State in rural and underserved communities and to
assist with provider recruitment and retention. Twenty-five thousand dollars must be
provided to each federally qualified health center.; and
Sec. EE-3. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Four million dollars in fiscal year 2026-27 to support access to pharmacy services
and affordably priced prescription drugs to residents of the State in rural and
underserved communities by providing funds to support federally qualified health
centers in developing or improving pharmacy services, including without limitation:
(1) Planning, designing, constructing and operating one or more licensed retail
pharmacies as part of a federally qualified health center's services;
(2) Entering into arrangements, including with one or more federally qualified
health centers, to expand the availability of prescription drugs purchased and
delivered to patients under the federal drug pricing program under Section 340B
of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 United States Code, Section 256b; and
(3) Expanding access to prescription drugs supplied by one or more federally
qualified health centers, including without limitation by increasing the number of
locations from which patients may obtain prescription drugs, improving existing
pharmacy facilities, expanding the availability of automated pharmacy systems as
defined in Title 32, section 13702-A, subsection 1 or addressing workforce issues
related to pharmacy program planning and operation.
Sec. EE-4. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Allocation of pharmacy services support funding. Each federally qualified health
center may apply for funds made available pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph E by
providing the department with a budget and plan for developing or improving pharmacy
services and access to affordably priced prescription drugs for its patients. The department
Page 171 - 132LR3049(37)

shall allocate available funds equitably among all applicants based on the cost-effectiveness
and feasibility of the proposed development or improvement of patient access to affordably
priced prescription drugs and the availability of other pharmacy services in the areas served
by a federally qualified health center applying for funds. In developing criteria for
awarding available funds, the department shall consult with and consider the
recommendations of a statewide association of federally qualified health centers. Any
available funds not awarded in fiscal year 2026-27 must be deposited in a nonlapsing
account from which awards may be made in subsequent fiscal periods for the purposes set
forth in subsection 1, paragraph E.
Upon issuance of each award pursuant to this subsection, the department shall promptly
implement a change in scope adjustment pursuant to section 3174-V, subsection 4 to reflect
the ongoing costs for the federally qualified health center receiving the grant of operating
expanded or improved pharmacy services.
Sec. EE-5. Implementation. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
publish a schedule and instructions for the content of applications and criteria for
determining awards for the pharmacy services support program described in this Part. The
department's schedule must ensure that initial awards of funding be made no later than
December 15, 2026 and must ensure that applicants have no less than 60 days to prepare
and submit applications after instructions for the content of applications and criteria for
selection have been published. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
department shall ensure that a majority of the persons selected to evaluate the applications
have substantial training or experience in the operation and management of a federally
qualified health center by including among those evaluating the applications volunteers
recommended by a statewide association of federally qualified health centers.
PART FF
Sec. FF-1. 22 MRSA §8712-A is enacted to read:
§8712-A. Care gap report
The organization shall submit an annual report to the joint standing committees of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters and over
appropriations and financial affairs no later than November 15th of each year beginning in
2027. This report must contain data on the care gap with a breakdown by MaineCare
Benefits Manual sections and Office of Aging and Disability Services Policy Manual
sections, including any changes in trends.
Data collected to create the report is not subject to the provisions of section 8712,
subsection 6.
For purposes of this section, "care gap" means the difference between the home and
community-based services individuals are authorized to receive and the services that they
actually received.
Sec. FF-2. 26 MRSA §3802, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 688, §2 and
reallocated by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §98, is amended to read:
2. Membership. The advisory committee consists of 14 16 members, appointed as
follows:
A. One member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
Page 172 - 132LR3049(37)

B. One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
C. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services or the commissioner's designee;
D. The Commissioner of Labor or the commissioner's designee;
E. One member representing an organization providing services to persons with
intellectual disabilities and autism who is a member of a statewide association of
providers of services to persons with intellectual disabilities and autism, appointed by
the President of the Senate;
F. One member representing a facility-based long-term care provider who is a member
of a statewide association of facility-based long-term care providers, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
G. One member representing a service coordination agency for people receiving home-
based and community-based long-term care, appointed by the President of the Senate;
H. One member representing an organization providing statewide homemaker services
through a state-funded, independent, support service program, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
I. One member representing an institution of higher education engaged in workforce
development, appointed by the President of the Senate;
J. One member representing a career and technical education center or region,
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
K. One member representing an organization promoting independent living for
persons with disabilities, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
L. One member who is an essential support worker, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
M. One member representing a statewide advocacy association that broadly advocates
for people who are entitled to receive essential support worker services, appointed by
the Speaker of the House; and
N. One member representing an organization providing services to persons with
behavioral health challenges who is a member of a statewide association of providers
of services to persons with behavioral health challenges, appointed by the Speaker of
the House.;
O. One member representing an organization providing personal care services in a
home setting, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
P. One member representing the long-term care ombudsman program established
under Title 22, section 5106, subsection 11-C and Title 22, section 5107-A.
Sec. FF-3. Maine Health Data Organization and Department of Health and
Human Services to develop care gap plan. The Maine Health Data Organization,
referred to in this section as "the organization," and the Department of Health and Human
Services, referred to in this section as "the department," shall develop a plan to measure the
State's care gap. For the purposes of this section, "care gap" means the difference between
the home and community-based services individuals are authorized to receive and the
Page 173 - 132LR3049(37)

services that they actually received. The organization and the department shall do the
following:
1. Work with the department's appropriate vendors to create a supplemental file to
report on the care gap for services provided under the sections of MaineCare policy
provided under rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 12, 17,
18, 19, 20, 21, 28, 29, 40, 65, 92 and 96. This file must include the authorization data
elements needed for the organization to link this data with the claims and eligibility data
that the vendor currently submits to the organization on behalf of the Office of MaineCare
Services within the department. The organization must have access to the authorization,
claims and eligibility data necessary to calculate the care gap. Using the existing data
governance framework, the organization shall securely integrate multiple data streams,
manage and store the data and develop dashboards to display key data points over time;
2. Work with the department's appropriate vendors to create a uniform reporting system
for submitting key data elements to report on the care gap for services provided under the
department's Office of Aging and Disability Services, Part 1 rule Chapter 5, Office of
Aging and Disability Services Policy Manual, Sections 61, 63, 68 and 69. These data
elements that may need modification to allow for data collection include, but are not limited
to, the medical eligibility determination form, authorized care plan, invoiced payment data
and utilization reports; and
3. Determine if there is any data available to estimate the care gap for services provided
under the sections of MaineCare policy provided under rule Chapter 101: MaineCare
Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 23 and 26 and those services provided under Section
65 that do not require prior authorization. If data is available, the organization and the
department shall estimate the care gap.
Following the modifications to contracts required in subsections 1 and 2, the
organization shall integrate multiple data streams, manage and store the data and develop
dashboards to display key data points over time. The organization may integrate any
available data for those MaineCare services that do not require prior authorization
described in subsection 3. In accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section
8712-A, the organization shall submit a report to the joint standing committees of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters and over
appropriations and financial affairs no later than November 15, 2027. This report must
contain data on the care gap with a breakdown by MaineCare Benefits Manual sections and
Office of Aging and Disability Services Policy Manual sections, including any changes in
trends. The report must include information on progress toward developing the care gap
analysis, including any options for MaineCare services without prior authorization. The
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human
services matters is authorized to report out legislation in response to the report in 2028. As
part of any proposed legislation, the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over health and human services matters must consider the inclusion of the care
gap data and the full cost of providing the services identified in the care gap in one of the
existing statutorily required reports submitted by the department to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters.
Sec. FF-4. Cost-of-living adjustment for essential support workers;
MaineCare rates. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department
Page 174 - 132LR3049(37)

of Health and Human Services shall submit a request to seek approval from the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 3.07% for reimbursement rates
subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 13, 65 and
92 and rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Sections 2, 12, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 26, 29, 40, 67, 96 and 97 Appendix C effective January 1, 2027. The department
shall submit the request required to seek approval under this section to implement the cost-
of-living adjustment as soon as practicable.
Sec. FF-5. Cost-of-living adjustment for state-funded home and
community-based services. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
increase reimbursement for state-funded home and community-based services by
implementing a cost-of-living increase of 3.07% for direct care services provided under the
department's Office of Aging and Disability Services, Part 1 rule Chapter 5, Office of
Aging and Disability Services Policy Manual, Sections 61, 63, 68 and 69 effective January
1, 2027 to maintain parity with similar MaineCare programs.
PART GG
Sec. GG-1. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§23, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 210, §1, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
23. Cellular telephone policy. By August 1, 2026, a school board shall adopt and
implement a policy prohibiting student use of personal electronic devices for the duration
of the school day, from starting bell to dismissal bell. The policy must restrict student use
of cellular telephones and other personal electronic devices with Internet or cellular
network capabilities. The Department of Education, in coordination with the Maine School
Management Association or a successor organization and other relevant stakeholders, shall
make available a model policy for school boards. The model policy must include exceptions
for compliance with a student's individualized education program, a documented
accommodation under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 United
States Code, Section 794 (2026) regarding an individual student, the delivery of prescribed
medical care as outlined in a student's individualized health care plan and language support
services for a student who is an emergent English language learner when no other
translation option is available.
PART HH
Sec. HH-1. 20-A MRSA c. 114-A, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. HH-2. 20-A MRSA §13112, sub-§4, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 70, §5,
is amended by repealing subparagraph (1).
Sec. HH-3. 20-A MRSA §15689-A, sub-§21, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt.
C, §11, is repealed.
PART II
Sec. II-1. 20-A MRSA §5201, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2005, c. 662, Pt. A, §11,
is further amended to read:
1. Eligibility to enroll; school year. A person meeting the minimum age requirements
of subsection 2 or section 7001, subsection 1‑B, paragraph B, and who has not reached 20
Page 175 - 132LR3049(37)

22 years of age before the start of the school year may enroll as a full-time or, with the
consent of the school board, as a part-time student, in the public elementary and secondary
schools where the student resides as defined described in section 5202. The school year,
for the purpose of this subsection, is defined as starting on July 1st and ending on the
following June 30th.
PART JJ
Sec. JJ-1. 20-A MRSA §7304, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. W, §20,
is amended to read:
3. Purposes. Allocations from the fund may be made to school administrative units
that have assumed the responsibility for child find activities and for ensuring a free,
appropriate public education for special education and related services pursuant to section
7006, subsection 2 as outlined in each child's individualized education program and,
including for general education costs for incurred in the provision of special education
services to children eligible under Part B, Section 619. The commissioner may pay costs
attributed to professional and administrative staff support to implement the requirements
of this section.
Sec. JJ-2. 20-A MRSA §7304, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Unexpended funds. If a school administrative unit has unexpended funds from an
allocation of the fund at the end of the fiscal year, these funds must be carried forward in
the school administrative unit preschool fund account and used to reduce the net preschool
expenses in the next fiscal year.
PART KK
Sec. KK-1. 20-A MRSA §8605, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2005, c. 2, Pt. D,
§29 and affected by §§72 and 74 and c. 12, Pt. WW, §18, is repealed.
Sec. KK-2. 20-A MRSA §8605, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 1991, c. 518,
§37, is repealed.
Sec. KK-3. 20-A MRSA §15674, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 504, Pt.
A, §6, is repealed.
Sec. KK-4. 20-A MRSA §15683, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 398,
§33, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The pupil count set forth in section 15674, subsection 1, paragraphs A, B and
C;
Sec. KK-5. 20-A MRSA §15689-A, sub-§30 is enacted to read:
30. Adult education. The commissioner may expend and disburse funds for adult
education students in accordance with the provisions of chapter 315.
PART LL
Sec. LL-1. 20-A MRSA §13013-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt.
C, §1, is further amended to read:
1. Department of Education salary supplement. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the Department of Education shall provide a public school teacher, a
Page 176 - 132LR3049(37)

teacher in a publicly supported secondary school or a teacher employed by an education
service center as authorized under chapter 123 who has attained certification from the
National Board for Professional Teaching Standards, or its successor organization, with an
annual national board certification salary supplement for the life of the certificate. The
salary supplement must be added to the teacher's base salary and must be considered in the
calculation for contributions to the Maine Public Employees Retirement System. If a
nationally certified teacher is no longer employed as a teacher, the supplement ceases. The
amount of the salary supplement is:
A. For fiscal year 2012-13, $2,500;
B. For fiscal year 2013-14, $2,750;
C. For fiscal year 2014-15 and succeeding years, except for a teacher under paragraph
D or E, $3,000; and
D. For fiscal year 2020-21 and succeeding years 2025-26, for a teacher who is
employed in a school in which at least 50% of students qualify for a free or reduced-
price lunch under chapter 223, subchapter 7 during the year that the supplement is
provided, $5,000.; and
E. For fiscal year 2026-27 and succeeding years, for a teacher who is employed in a
school in which at least 50% of students qualify for a free or reduced-price lunch under
chapter 223, subchapter 7 or at least 50% of students are identified as economically
disadvantaged for subsidy purposes under chapter 606-B during the year that the
supplement is provided, $5,000.
PART MM
Sec. MM-1. 20-A MRSA §15672, sub-§2-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2013, c.
167, Pt. B, §1, is repealed.
Sec. MM-2. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 571,
Pt. E, §23, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The school administrative unit's local share results in a full-value education
mill rate less than the local cost share expectation as described in section 15671‑A
through the 2009-10 fiscal year. Beginning in fiscal year 2010-11 and in
subsequent fiscal years, the school administrative unit's debt service allocation
must include principal and interest payments as defined in section 15672,
subsection 2‑A, paragraph A.
Sec. MM-3. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 571,
Pt. E, §23, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (2).
Sec. MM-4. 20-A MRSA §15689-A, sub-§29 is enacted to read:
29. Debt service. The commissioner shall pay principal and interest costs for
approved major capital projects in the allocation year, excluding payments made with funds
from state and local government accounts established under the federal Internal Revenue
Code and regulations for disposition of excess, unneeded proceeds of bonds issued for a
school project and excluding any principal and interest costs attributable to a school closed
for lack of need pursuant to chapter 202.
Page 177 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. MM-5. 20-A MRSA §15905, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 462,
§1, is further amended to read:
A. The state board may approve projects as long as no the project approval will not
cause debt service costs, as defined in section 15672, subsection 2‑A, paragraph A and
pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with Resolve 2007, chapter 223, section 4, to
exceed the maximum limits specified in Table 1 and Table 2 in subsequent fiscal years.
Table 1
Major Capital Integrated, Consolidated
Secondary and Postsecondary
Project
Fiscal year Maximum Debt Service Limit Maximum Debt Service Limit
1990 $ 48,000,000
1991 $ 57,000,000
1992 $ 65,000,000
1993 $ 67,000,000
1994 $ 67,000,000
1995 $ 67,000,000
1996 $ 67,000,000
1997 $ 67,000,000
1998 $ 67,000,000
1999 $ 69,000,000
2000 $ 72,000,000
2001 $ 74,000,000
2002 $ 74,000,000
2003 $ 80,000,000
2004 $ 80,000,000
2005 $ 84,000,000
2006 $ 90,000,000
2007 $ 96,000,000
2008 $100,000,000
2009 $104,000,000
2010 $108,000,000
2011 $126,000,000
2012 $116,000,000
2013 $116,000,000
2014 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2015 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2016 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2017 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2018 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2019 $126,000,000 $10,000,000
2020 $126,000,000 $20,000,000
2021 $126,000,000 $20,000,000
2022 $126,000,000 $20,000,000
2023 $126,000,000 $20,000,000
Table 2
Page 178 - 132LR3049(37)

Fiscal year Maximum Debt Service Limit
2024 $150,000,000
2025 $150,000,000
2026 $150,000,000
2027 $150,000,000
PART NN
Sec. NN-1. 20-A MRSA §15689-A, sub-§21, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt.
C, §11, is repealed.
PART OO
Sec. OO-1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Department of Education. The Department of Education shall carry forward any
General Fund balances remaining in the Special Services Team program at the end of any
fiscal year for use in the next fiscal year for the same purpose.
PART PP
Sec. PP-1. Transfer; Department of Education, Child Development
Services, Other Special Revenue Funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $12,600,000 of
the unencumbered balance forward from the Department of Education, General Purpose
Aid for Local Schools program, General Fund account, All Other line category to the
Department of Education, Child Development Services program, Other Special Revenue
Funds account, All Other line category.
Sec. PP-2. Transfer; Department of Education, Child Development
Services, General Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or
before June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $4,051,457 of the unencumbered
balance forward from the Department of Education, General Purpose Aid for Local Schools
program, General Fund account, All Other line category to the Department of Education,
Child Development Services program, General Fund account, All Other line category.
PART QQ
Sec. QQ-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Education, School Finance and Operations. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Education is
authorized to transfer up to $74,000 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line
category of the School Finance and Operations program, General Fund account for the
purposes of funding maintenance and licensing costs for an Internet-based application for
free or reduced-price meals. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. QQ-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Education, Leadership Team. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Education is authorized to
transfer up to $363,114 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
Page 179 - 132LR3049(37)

salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the
Leadership Team program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding annual
hosting and maintenance costs for the department’s grant management system. These
amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. QQ-3. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Education, Adult Education. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Education is authorized to
transfer up to $12,500 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the Adult
Education program, General Fund account for the purpose of funding rising costs related
to the adult education data system. These amounts may be transferred by financial order
upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART RR
Sec. RR-1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Department of Energy Resources. The Department of Energy Resources shall
carry forward any General Fund balances remaining in the Department of Energy
Resources program at the end of any fiscal year for use in the next fiscal year.
PART SS
Sec. SS-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to Capital Expenditures;
Department of Environmental Protection, Air Quality. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Environmental
Protection is authorized to transfer up to $256,994 of available balances of Personal
Services appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the Capital
Expenditures line category of the Air Quality program, General Fund for the purposes of
funding 2 ozone calibrator instruments, one ozone monitor instrument, one continuous,
real-time air quality monitoring instrument, one zero air generator, 2 hydrogen sulfide
analyzers, 2 trace-level dilution calibrators and 2 data loggers. These amounts may be
transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART TT
Sec. TT-1. 10 MRSA §962, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2015, c. 504, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Revenue obligation securities. Issue revenue obligation securities to finance
eligible projects, except that revenue obligation securities may not be issued for energy
distribution system projects or energy generating system projects unless the authority
issued a certificate of approval for those eligible projects before January 1, 2020 2040
pursuant to subchapter 3;
Sec. TT-2. 10 MRSA §1044, sub-§13, as amended by PL 2015, c. 504, §4, is
further amended to read:
Page 180 - 132LR3049(37)

13. Limitation. The authority may not issue revenue obligation securities for energy
distribution system projects or energy generating system projects unless the authority
issued a certificate of approval for the energy distribution system project or energy
generating system project before January 1, 2020 2040. Notwithstanding this subsection,
revenue refunding securities may be issued to refund any outstanding revenue obligation
securities.
Sec. TT-3. 35-A MRSA §3156, 5th ¶, as amended by PL 1997, c. 781, §2, is
further amended to read:
A certificate may not be issued under this section after July 31, 1998 2040.
PART UU
Sec. UU-1. Carrying provision; Maine Fire Protection Services
Commission, Maine Fire Protection Services Commission. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall
carry forward any unexpended balance remaining of the $1,500,000 appropriated in Public
Law 2023, chapter 459 in the Maine Fire Protection Services Commission, Maine Fire
Protection Services Commission program, General Fund account, All Other line category
to the next fiscal year to be used for fire service training facilities.
PART VV
Sec. VV-1. 22 MRSA §3731-A, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Donations or grants accepted; nonlapsing funds. The commissioner may accept
donations or grants for the Maine Child Care Affordability Program from any source. Any
unexpended funds appropriated or allocated by the Legislature or accepted by the
commissioner for the purposes of the Maine Child Care Affordability Program may not
lapse and must be carried forward in the same amount for the next fiscal year.
PART WW
Sec. WW-1. 22 MRSA §1708-A is enacted to read:
§1708-A. Reimbursement to Maine Veterans' Homes
Nursing facility services provided by a veterans' facility must be reimbursed by the
MaineCare program at rates established by the department pursuant to this section. This
section applies to all funds, including federal funds, paid by an agency of the State to a
veterans' facility for nursing facility care.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Nursing home" or "nursing facility" has the same meaning as in section 1812-A.
B. "Residential care facility" has the same meaning as in section 7852, subsection 14.
C. "Veterans' facility" means a nursing home that is operated by the Maine Veterans'
Homes at any location required under Title 37-B, section 601, subsection 2.
2. Per resident basis. Veterans' facilities must be reimbursed on a per resident daily
rate basis for services to residents covered under the MaineCare program.
Page 181 - 132LR3049(37)

3. Rate calculations. Rate calculations under this section must follow the process and
principles set forth in section 3173-J to determine a daily rate that is reasonable and
adequate to cover the MaineCare allowable costs of operating veterans' facilities and to
reflect any meaningful cost differences between veterans' nursing home and nonveterans'
nursing home costs for the direct care and routine care cost components of the daily rate.
Adjustments to rates and reimbursement for purposes that include, but are not limited to,
audit procedures, quality and case mix must be made in the same way as those adjustments
are made for all other nursing facilities as set forth in department rule.
4. Annual adjustments for inflation. The daily rate amounts calculated under this
section must be annually adjusted for inflation to the same extent that MaineCare
reimbursement rates for nonveterans' facilities that are nursing homes and residential care
facilities are adjusted.
Sec. WW-2. Supplemental payments to Maine Veterans' Homes
residential care facilities in fiscal year 2026-27. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall make a one-time payment to the Maine Veterans' Homes residential
care facilities for the difference between MaineCare payments and actual allowed
MaineCare costs, as reported on the most recently filed cost reports. The department may
make these residential care facility payments in fiscal year 2026-27 to enable the
department to seek and receive approval for a state plan amendment from the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
with federal matching payments to the extent possible.
Sec. WW-3. Supplemental payments previously appropriated. Upon
implementation of the rate calculations process established in the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 22, section 1708-A, any supplemental funding allocated or appropriated for the Maine
Veterans' Homes in Public Law 2021, chapter 528 that has not been expended may not be
used as supplemental payments but may be used for the purposes of this Part.
PART XX
Sec. XX-1. 22 MRSA §3108-A is enacted to read:
§3108-A. Heating assistance for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
households
To the extent that funds are available, the department may issue an annual heating
assistance payment to households receiving assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program.
PART YY
Sec. YY-1. 22 MRSA §3769-E, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. NNNNNNN,
§12, is repealed.
PART ZZ
Sec. ZZ-1. Continuation of limited-period positions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, all limited-period positions throughout State Government
that are scheduled to expire in June 2026, are already funded through the end of fiscal year
2025-26 and are proposed to continue in the 2026-2027 biennium are authorized to
continue until November 1, 2026.
Page 182 - 132LR3049(37)

PART AAA
Sec. AAA-1. PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. II, §4 is amended to read:
Sec. II-4. Supplemental payments to private psychiatric hospitals. The
Department of Health and Human Services, from the amounts appropriated and allocated,
shall determine a consistent and reasonable allocation method to distribute supplemental
payments to private psychiatric hospitals. Total payment amounts may not exceed the
lower of the amount appropriated for supplemental payments to psychiatric hospitals by
this Act and the amount by which any payment would cause the department to exceed
allowable aggregate upper payment limits as determined by the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
These payments must be allocated based on a consistent allocation method subject to
United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services approval from total supplemental pool amounts as follows:
1. A supplemental pool amount based on the tax owed by psychiatric hospitals in fiscal
years 2025-26 and 2026-27 as the result of the incremental increase in the hospital tax rate
imposed by this Part, for twice-annual supplemental payments in those fiscal years; and
2. A supplemental pool amount based on the tax owed by psychiatric hospitals in fiscal
year 2024-25 as the result of the retroactive application of the incremental increase in the
hospital tax rate imposed by this Part, for a one-time supplemental payment in fiscal year
2025-26.
Supplemental payments must continue until implementation of reimbursement reform
for psychiatric hospitals, at which point the supplemental payments must be discontinued
and the associated spending must be invested in direct reimbursement for inpatient and
outpatient psychiatric hospital services.
PART BBB
Sec. BBB-1. Emergency rule-making authority; health and human services
matters. The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to adopt emergency
rules under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 8054 and 8073 as necessary to
implement those provisions of this Act over which the department has subject matter
jurisdiction for which specific authority has not been provided in any other Part,
notwithstanding the requirement that the department find that immediate adoption is
necessary to avoid a threat to public health, safety or general welfare.
PART CCC
Sec. CCC-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services, State
Supplement to Federal Supplemental Security Income. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of unencumbered balance forward in the Department of
Health and Human Services, State Supplement to Federal Supplemental Security Income
program, General Fund account, All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2027.
PART DDD
Sec. DDD-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, $3,600,000 of the unencumbered
Page 183 - 132LR3049(37)

balance forward in the General Fund carrying accounts of the Department of Health and
Human Services in the All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART EEE
Sec. EEE-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to Capital
Expenditures; Department of Health and Human Services, Disproportionate
Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Health and Human Services is
authorized to transfer up to $290,664 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the Capital
Expenditures line category of the Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center
program, General Fund account for the purpose of funding the replacement of the camera
and access control system at Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center. These amounts may be
transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. EEE-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Health and Human Services, Office of MaineCare Services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the
Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to transfer up to $1,100,000 of
available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other
obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the Office of MaineCare Services
program, General Fund account for the purpose of funding rate determinations for
MaineCare services. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART FFF
Sec. FFF-1. 12 MRSA §10108, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Inland Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Program. The Inland
Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Program, referred to in this subsection as "the
program," is established within the department's fisheries and hatcheries division within
the Bureau of Resource Management.
A. The program must:
(1) Prioritize native inland fish conservation and the research, management and
enhancement of the State's native inland fish populations, including but not limited
to those identified by the department as species of greatest conservation need,
brook trout, lake whitefish, arctic charr and lake trout;
(2) Identify and implement actions to enhance native inland fish production and
stocking, including assessment of native inland fish production programs; and
(3) Work to conserve, protect and enhance the State's sport fish fisheries.
B. To the extent that resources allow, the program must support and incorporate the
following elements:
Page 184 - 132LR3049(37)

(1) The design and implementation of regional and statewide fishery research
programs designed to conserve the State's native inland and sport fish fisheries and
promote the long-term sustainability and health of those fisheries;
(2) Investment in new technology, equipment and training programs to enhance
the success and effectiveness of the program;
(3) Effective communication regarding ongoing program actions, to promote
program success and collaboration;
(4) The establishment of collaborative partnerships to engage organizations,
communities and companies representing conservation groups, anglers, land trusts
and other organizations involved in outdoor recreation in implementing and
publicizing the program; and
(5) Engagement with representatives of various agencies, anglers and nonprofit
organizations to enhance and restore the habitats and populations of native inland
fisheries.
C. The commissioner may accept money, goods or services donated to the department
for the program. Money accepted by the commissioner under this paragraph must be
deposited into the fisheries and hatcheries division dedicated account.
D. The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall report no later than
February 1st annually to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over inland fisheries and wildlife matters regarding program activities. The
report must describe the work being done to conserve, research, manage and enhance
the State's native inland fish populations and must include a summary of program
expenditures, including how those expenditures were allocated.
PART GGG
Sec. GGG-1. 12 MRSA §10252, as affected by PL 2003, c. 614, §9 and amended
by c. 655, Pt. B, §51 and affected by §422, is repealed and the following enacted in its
place:
§10252. Fish hatchery maintenance fund
1. Fund established. The fish hatchery maintenance fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established in the department as a nonlapsing fund to be used by the
commissioner to fund or assist in funding engineering designs, statewide facilities
assessments and maintenance, repair and capital improvements at fish hatcheries and
feeding stations owned by the State. The fund may be used for overtime personnel services
costs when overtime for fish stocking and other hatchery-related work is operationally
required. The fund may support the design, construction and operation of additional state
fish hatcheries that support the mission of the department, as approved by the Legislature.
The fund may not be used to fund the general operating costs of an existing fish hatchery.
2. Funding. Notwithstanding section 10801, subsection 4, $2 from each fishing
license sold must be deposited into the fund. Additionally, money deposited pursuant to
Title 29-A, section 456-C, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (1) must be credited to
the fund. The commissioner may accept and deposit into the fund any monetary gifts,
donations or other contributions from public or private sources and must use that money
for the purposes specified in subsection 1.
Page 185 - 132LR3049(37)

PART HHH
Sec. HHH-1. PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. FF, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. FF-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District; fiscal year 2025-26.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2025-26 only, the
Judicial Department is authorized to transfer up to $750,000 $1,250,000 of available
balances of appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Courts - Supreme,
Superior and District program, General Fund, after all financial commitments for salary,
benefit and other obligations have been made, to the General Fund, All Other line category
in order to fund temporary clerk services, marshal services contracts, guardians ad litem,
interpreters and mental health services. These amounts may be transferred by financial
order on the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor.
These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. HHH-2. PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. FF, §2 is amended to read:
Sec. FF-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District; fiscal year 2026-27.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27 only, the
Judicial Department is authorized to transfer up to $750,000 $1,250,000 of available
balances of appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Courts - Supreme,
Superior and District program, General Fund, after all financial commitments for salary,
benefit and other obligations have been made, to the General Fund, All Other line category
in order to fund temporary clerk services, marshal services contracts, guardians ad litem,
interpreters and mental health services. These amounts may be transferred by financial
order on the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor.
These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART III
Sec. III-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Judicial Department is
authorized to transfer up to $2,050,725 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line
category of the Courts - Supreme, Superior and District program, General Fund account
for the purposes of funding iPad replacements and licensing fees, rising contract costs
related to case management services, rising utility costs, rising interpreter costs, rising
travel costs for staff and judicial officers and the implementation of a new records
management system. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. III-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Judicial Department is
authorized to transfer up to $109,448 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line
category of the Courts - Supreme, Superior and District program, General Fund account
Page 186 - 132LR3049(37)

for the purposes of funding general facility improvements, increased lease costs and
additional file storage at the Lincoln District Court location. These amounts may be
transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART JJJ
Sec. JJJ-1. 26 MRSA §1418-A, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 560, Pt. F, §13,
is amended to read:
The Division for the Blind and Visually Impaired is established within the department
Bureau of Rehabilitation Services under the jurisdiction of the Director of the Division for
the Blind and Visually Impaired. The commissioner shall appoint the director, subject to
the Civil Service Law.
PART KKK
Sec. KKK-1. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; General
Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027,
the State Controller shall transfer $38,409,609 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund
within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund.
PART LLL
Sec. LLL-1. 12 MRSA §6043 is enacted to read:
§6043. Marine Science Research and Boat Operations and Maintenance Fund
1. Fund established. The Marine Science Research and Boat Operations and
Maintenance Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established as a dedicated,
nonlapsing fund administered by the department for the purpose of providing funds in
support of marine science programs for the purposes described in subsection 3. Balances
may not lapse and must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
2. Sources of funding. The fund consists of any money received from the following
sources:
A. Fees charged to marine science research programs based on research conducted and
boat use;
B. Contributions from private sources;
C. Federal funds and awards; and
D. Any other funds received in support of the purposes for which the fund is
established.
3. Disbursements from fund. The department shall use the funds received pursuant
to subsection 2 to support marine science programs in the State, including, but not limited
to, funding for marine science research, boat operations and boat maintenance.
PART MMM
Sec. MMM-1. Carrying balances; Department of Marine Resources,
Bureau of Marine Science. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the
end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall carry forward any unexpended balance
Page 187 - 132LR3049(37)

remaining of the $400,000 appropriated in Public Law 2025, chapter 2 in the Department
of Marine Resources, Bureau of Marine Science program, General Fund account, Capital
Expenditures line category to the next fiscal year until the balance is fully expended. The
funding must be used to support the department's obligation of the total cost for federal
Public Assistance 406 Mitigation funding from the United States Department of Homeland
Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency related to storm damages from January
2024.
PART NNN
Sec. NNN-1. 4 MRSA §157, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
ZZZZ, §2, is further amended to read:
A. The Governor, subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over judiciary matters and to confirmation by the Legislature, shall
appoint to the District Court 42 judges, except that, beginning July 1, 2024, the
Governor, subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over judiciary matters and to confirmation by the Legislature, shall appoint
to the District Court 44 46 judges. At least one judge must be appointed from each
district who is a resident of a county in which the district lies, except that in District 3
there must be 2 judges appointed who are residents of a county in which the district
lies; in District 6 there must be 2 judges appointed who are residents of a county in
which the district lies; and in District 9 there must be 2 judges appointed who are
residents of a county in which the district lies. Each District Court Judge has a term of
office of 7 years.
To be eligible for appointment as a District Judge, a person must be a member of the
bar of the State. The term "District Judge" includes the Chief Judge and Deputy Chief
Judge.
PART OOO
Sec. OOO-1. 24 MRSA §2986, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2025, c. 109, §3, is
further amended to read:
3. Completed kit. If the victim has not reported the alleged offense to a law
enforcement agency when the examination is complete, the hospital or health care
practitioner shall then notify the nearest law enforcement agency, which shall transport and
store the completed forensic examination kit for 8 20 years. The completed kit may be
identified only by the tracking number. If during that storage period a victim decides to
report the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency, the victim may contact the hospital
or health care practitioner to determine the tracking number. The hospital or health care
practitioner shall provide the victim with the tracking number on the forensic examination
kit and shall inform the victim which law enforcement agency is storing the kit.
If the victim reports the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency by the time the
examination is complete, the investigating agency shall retain custody of the forensic
examination kit.
If an examination is performed under subsection 5 and the victim does not, within 60 days,
regain a state of consciousness adequate to decide whether or not to report the alleged
offense, the State may file a motion in the District Court relating to the storing or processing
analysis of the forensic examination kit. Upon finding good cause and after considering
Page 188 - 132LR3049(37)

factors, including, but not limited to, the possible benefits to public safety in processing
analyzing the kit and the likelihood of the victim's regaining a state of consciousness
adequate to decide whether or not to report the alleged offense in a reasonable time, the
District Court may order either that the kit be stored for additional time or that the kit be
transported to the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory for processing analysis in
accordance with the laboratory's practices and procedures, or such other disposition that
the court determines just. In the interests of justice or upon motion by the State, the District
Court may conduct hearings required under this paragraph confidentially and in camera
and may impound pleadings and other records related to them.
A law enforcement agency shall store a completed forensic examination kit involving
sexual assault for 20 years regardless of whether the alleged offense is reported to a law
enforcement agency.
Sec. OOO-2. 25 MRSA §2915-B is enacted to read:
§2915-B. Sexual assault forensic examination kit tracking system
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Crime laboratory" means the Maine State Police Crime Laboratory located in
Augusta or another accredited laboratory that provides forensic services to law
enforcement agencies for the purpose of analyzing forensic examination kits.
B. "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.
C. "Forensic examination kit" or "kit" means a uniform standardized forensic
examination kit developed by the department pursuant to section 2915, subsection 1
for evidence collection by a licensed health care provider in alleged cases of sexual
assault.
D. "Law enforcement agency" means the Bureau of State Police, a county law
enforcement agency or a municipal law enforcement agency.
E. "Licensed health care provider" means:
(1) A hospital licensed under Title 22, chapter 405; or
(2) A health care practitioner who is licensed by this State to provide or otherwise
lawfully providing health care or a partnership or corporation made up of such
health care practitioners.
F. "Sexual assault" means any crime enumerated in Title 17-A, chapter 11.
G. "Tracking system" means the forensic examination kit tracking system established
by the department pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Forensic examination kit tracking system. The department shall operate and
maintain a tracking system for all completed forensic examination kits, regardless of
whether the alleged offense relating to the kit was reported to a law enforcement agency,
that is continuously accessible to approved users as determined by department rule,
including, at a minimum, licensed hospitals and licensed health care providers that perform
forensic examinations for victims of sexual assault.
A. The department shall operate and maintain the tracking system through the use of
department personnel and resources and may contract with public or private entities,
Page 189 - 132LR3049(37)

including, but not limited to, software and technology providers, to accomplish the
department's duties related to the tracking system.
B. Approved users shall adhere to the following procedures when entering information
for each kit into the tracking system, which must, at a minimum, collect the following
information.
(1) A crime laboratory shall enter into the tracking system each new and unused
kit and record each kit's intended destination before the kit leaves the possession
of the crime laboratory.
(2) A licensed health care provider shall enter into the tracking system:
(a) The date the licensed health care provider receives each kit from a crime
laboratory;
(b) The date a particular kit is used for evidence collection, is discarded based
on damage to the kit or is used for training; and
(c) The date a completed kit is transferred to a law enforcement agency, the
name of the law enforcement agency to which the kit was transferred and, to
the extent known to the licensed health care provider, whether the victim of
sexual assault from whom the forensic evidence in the kit was collected has
reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency.
(3) A law enforcement agency shall enter into the tracking system:
(a) The date the law enforcement agency receives a completed kit, the location
where that kit is being stored and, to the extent known by the law enforcement
agency, whether the victim of sexual assault from whom the forensic evidence
in the kit was collected has reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement
agency;
(b) The date the law enforcement agency transfers a completed kit to a crime
laboratory and the name of the crime laboratory to which the kit was
transferred; and
(c) The date the law enforcement agency reports to a prosecuting attorney that
a forensic examination has been performed pursuant to Title 24, section 2986.
(4) A crime laboratory shall identify when it has conducted an analysis of a
completed kit and enter into the tracking system the date of the analysis.
(5) A law enforcement agency that receives a kit after analysis from a crime
laboratory shall enter into the tracking system the date it received the kit and
whether that kit was stored or destroyed.
C. The tracking system must provide for the updating and tracking of a forensic
examination kit as follows.
(1) A victim of sexual assault from whom forensic evidence has been collected
using a kit must have access to the tracking system on an anonymous and secure
basis for the purposes of receiving updates regarding the kit and tracking the status
of the kit.
(2) A licensed health care provider, law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney
or any other entity in possession of a kit must have access to the tracking system
Page 190 - 132LR3049(37)

for the purposes of entering, updating and tracking the status and location of the
kit.
(3) A prosecuting attorney in the State must have access to the tracking system for
the purpose of receiving updates regarding the kits and tracking the status of the
kits.
3. Participation required. Law enforcement agencies, licensed health care providers,
crime laboratories and prosecuting attorneys in the State shall participate in the tracking
system on the schedule and in the manner required by department rules adopted pursuant
to subsection 7.
4. Immunity. A person or entity required by subsection 3 to participate in the tracking
system is immune from civil liability for actions taken as a participant that are required by
subsection 3 or by rules adopted pursuant to subsection 7.
5. Confidentiality. The tracking system and all information in the tracking system is
confidential.
6. Report. The department shall report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters and the
Governor by January 1, 2028 and annually thereafter regarding the tracking system. The
report may include recommendations from the department for improved operation of the
tracking system and must include the following information, identified by the county from
which a forensic examination kit was entered into the tracking system:
A. The number of completed kits in the tracking system, including:
(1) The number of completed kits for which a victim of sexual assault has reported
the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency and, of those kits, the number on
which analysis has been completed and the number on which analysis has not been
completed; and
(2) The number of completed kits for which a victim of sexual assault has not
reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency and, of those kits, the
number on which analysis has been completed and the number on which analysis
has not been completed;
B. The number of completed kits that were entered into the tracking system during the
prior calendar year, including:
(1) The number of completed kits for which a victim of sexual assault has reported
the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency and, of those kits, the number on
which analysis has been completed and the number on which analysis has not been
completed; and
(2) The number of completed kits for which a victim of sexual assault has not
reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency and, of those kits, the
number on which analysis has been completed and the number on which analysis
has not been completed;
C. The average and median lengths of time for forensic examination kits to be sent for
analysis after being entered into the tracking system and for analysis to be completed;
and
Page 191 - 132LR3049(37)

D. The number of reported forensic examination kits entered into the tracking system
for more than one year for which analysis has not been completed.
A law enforcement agency that performs its duties in more than one county shall provide
to the department tracking information for each county where a forensic examination kit
was entered into the tracking system.
7. Rules. The commissioner shall adopt rules to govern participation in and
implementation of the tracking system. The rules must include provisions for maintaining
confidentiality of tracking system information; provisions to ensure timely posting to the
tracking system; a process for approving tracking system users and access for approved
users; procedures for posting information and for updating information in the tracking
system; and requirements for documentation of persons who have posted, accessed and
updated information in the tracking system. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined by Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. OOO-3. 25 MRSA §3821, as amended by PL 2025, c. 109, §6, is further
amended to read:
§3821. Transportation and storage of forensic examination kits
For the purposes of this section, "sexual assault" means any crime enumerated in Title
17‑A, chapter 11 and "strangulation" has the same meaning as in Title 17‑A, section 208,
subsection 1, paragraph C.
If a victim of sexual assault or strangulation has a forensic examination and has not
reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency when the examination is
complete, the licensed hospital or licensed health care practitioner that completed the
forensic examination shall notify the nearest law enforcement agency. That law
enforcement agency shall transport the completed forensic examination kit, identified only
by a tracking number assigned by the kit manufacturer, to its evidence storage facility. The
law enforcement agency shall store the forensic examination kits involving sexual assault
for 20 years and forensic examination kits involving only strangulation for 6 years. If
during that storage period the victim reports the offense to a law enforcement agency, the
investigating agency shall take possession of the forensic examination kit.
If a victim of sexual assault or strangulation has a forensic examination and has
reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency when the forensic examination is
complete, or the victim reports the alleged offense after the forensic examination kit has
been transported to the nearest law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency
investigating the alleged offense shall take possession of that kit.
A law enforcement agency shall store the forensic examination kits involving sexual
assault for 20 years and forensic examination kits involving only strangulation for 6 years,
regardless of whether the alleged offense relating to the kit is reported to a law enforcement
agency.
In the case of a forensic examination performed under Title 24, section 2986,
subsection 5, the law enforcement agency must immediately notify the district attorney for
the district in which the hospital or health care practitioner is located that such a forensic
examination has been performed and a forensic examination kit has been completed under
Title 24, section 2986, subsection 5.
Page 192 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. OOO-4. Sexual assault forensic examination kit inventory. By October
1, 2027, all law enforcement agencies that receive, maintain, store or preserve sexual
assault forensic examination kits shall complete an inventory of all kits in their possession
and shall report their findings to the Department of Public Safety. At a minimum, reported
findings to the department must include a breakdown by year by each agency of the number
of:
1. Completed kits received, including a breakdown of the number of these kits for
which a victim of sexual assault has reported the alleged offense to a law enforcement
agency and the number of these kits for which the victim of sexual assault has not reported
the alleged offense to a law enforcement agency;
2. Completed kits for which a victim of sexual assault has reported the alleged offense
to a law enforcement agency and the kit has not been analyzed by a crime laboratory. For
purposes of this section, "crime laboratory" has the same meaning as in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 25, section 2915-B, subsection 1, paragraph A; and
3. Completed kits that have been returned to the law enforcement agency after analysis
by a crime laboratory.
The department shall compile all agency findings and present a report of the inventory
by January 1, 2028 to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over criminal justice and public safety matters. At the time the report is presented, the
department shall post the report on its publicly accessible website.
PART PPP
Sec. PPP-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Public Safety, State Police. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Public Safety is authorized to
transfer up to $292,500 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the State
Police program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding a Maine Information
and Analysis Center contract for firearms examiner services. These amounts may be
transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and
approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to
appropriations.
Sec. PPP-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Public Safety, State Police. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Public Safety is authorized to
transfer up to $500,500 of available balances of Personal Services appropriations, after all
salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line category of the State
Police program, General Fund account for the purposes of funding the replacement of 8
40-millimeter launchers and consoles at 3 emergency communications centers. These
amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. PPP-3. Transfer of Personal Services balances to Capital
Expenditures; Department of Public Safety, State Police. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Public Safety
Page 193 - 132LR3049(37)

is authorized to transfer up to $91,650 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations, after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the Capital
Expenditures line category of the State Police program, General Fund account for the
purposes of funding a roof replacement at the K-9 office, a heat pump and generator for the
Pittsfield barracks and updating the security system at the Bangor barracks. These amounts
may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer
and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to
appropriations.
Sec. PPP-4. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Public Safety, Criminal Justice Academy. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27, the Department of Public Safety
is authorized to transfer up to $540,000 of available balances of Personal Services
appropriations after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met, to the All Other line
category of the Criminal Justice Academy program, General Fund account for the purposes
of funding rising food service costs. These amounts may be transferred by financial order
upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART QQQ
Sec. QQQ-1. 20-A MRSA §12723, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 372, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§12723. Maine Free Community College Program
The Maine Free Community College Program, referred to in this section as "the
program," is established. The system shall waive tuition for no more than 2 years for an
eligible student who meets the conditions under subsection 2. The availability of the tuition
waiver is limited to the amount appropriated.
1. Definition. For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"eligible student" means a person who graduated from high school in the previous 2
academic years or obtained the equivalent of a high school diploma in the previous 2
academic years.
2. Conditions. In order to receive a tuition waiver under this section, an eligible
student must:
A. Pursue an associate degree or other academic credential;
B. Have established a primary residence in the State for at least 12 consecutive months
immediately prior to the date of admission to a college and reside in the State for the
duration of the student's enrollment in the college;
C. Accept all available federal and state grants, scholarships and other sources of
funding; and
D. Access the tuition waiver for no longer than 150% of the time stated by a college
for completion of a program of study.
3. Report. No later than January 15th of each year, the system shall prepare and
submit a report regarding the program to the Governor and the joint standing committee of
Page 194 - 132LR3049(37)

the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters and the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs.
PART RRR
Sec. RRR-1. 5 MRSA §12004-A, sub-§22, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 786, §5, is
repealed.
Sec. RRR-2. 10 MRSA §1404, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 717, §3, is
amended to read:
6. Warranty supplemental. That this statutory warranty is in addition to any express
warranty provided by the manufacturer or dealer and any warranty created by state or
federal law, including the implied warranties of merchantability and fitness for a specific
purpose. The Manufactured Housing Board Maine Office of Community Affairs, in
consultation with the Department of the Attorney General, shall prepare a written warranty
form that contains the terms of subsections 1 to 5 and shall ensure that this warranty form
is distributed to all dealers and manufacturers doing business in this State.
Sec. RRR-3. 10 MRSA §8001, sub-§38, ¶R, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 397, §11,
is repealed.
Sec. RRR-4. 10 MRSA §9001, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1999, c. 725, §1, is
further amended to read:
2. Intent. It is therefore declared that the State, with the passage of this chapter,
intends:
A. To provide protection to the public against hazards from poorly constructed or
installed manufactured housing;
B. To provide and enforce, with respect to its licensees and political subdivisions,
uniform performance standards for construction and installation of manufactured
housing that ensure durability and safety of manufactured housing; and
C. To eliminate all costly, duplicative regulations and to adopt rules that provide for
the performance necessary to provide decent, safe and sanitary housing at prices that
people of this State can afford and to establish regulations that govern those matters
within this State;.
D. To establish an administrative board for the purpose of administering and enforcing
this chapter and applicable warranties;
E. To require this board to assume responsibilities as consistent with this chapter,
including the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the administration and
enforcement of rules, investigations of complaints and any other acts that are consistent
with the purposes of this chapter;
F. To have this board, in the administration of this chapter, give consideration to
economic factors that may result in additional costs to home buyers and eliminate any
unnecessary costs that may occur from the enforcement of this chapter or any other
Act; and
G. To grant to this board the investigative and regulatory powers it may reasonably
require to accomplish the foregoing purposes and intent and to carry out the provisions
Page 195 - 132LR3049(37)

of this chapter, including making decisions, in accordance with the Maine
Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. RRR-5. 10 MRSA §9002, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1977, c. 550, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. RRR-6. 10 MRSA §9002, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §4,
is further amended to read:
5. Inspection agency. "Inspection agency" means an approved person or organization,
public or private, determined by the board office to be qualified by reason of facilities,
personnel and demonstrated ability and independence of judgment to provide for inspection
and approval of the design, construction or installation of manufactured housing in
compliance with the standards and the rules adopted in accordance with this Act chapter.
Sec. RRR-7. 10 MRSA §9002, sub-§6, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 260, Pt. A,
§1, is amended to read:
B. The assembly and fastening of structural components of manufactured housing,
including the completed roof system, as specified by the manufacturer's installation
instructions and in accordance with the rules of the board office.
Sec. RRR-8. 10 MRSA §9002, sub-§7, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt.
B, §6, is further amended to read:
B. State-certified modular homes, which are those units that the manufacturer certifies
are constructed in compliance with this Act chapter and rules, meaning structures,
transportable in one or more sections, that are not constructed on a permanent chassis
and are designed to be used as dwellings on foundations when connected to required
utilities, including the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning or electrical systems
contained therein. "Manufactured housing" does not include modular homes
constructed at an educational facility by students pursuant to rules adopted by the board
office;
Sec. RRR-9. 10 MRSA §9002, sub-§11-A is enacted to read:
11-A. Office. "Office" means the Maine Office of Community Affairs as established
in Title 5, chapter 310-B.
Sec. RRR-10. 10 MRSA §9003, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §8, is
repealed.
Sec. RRR-11. 10 MRSA §9004, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. D, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. RRR-12. 10 MRSA §9005-A, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. D, §4, is
amended to read:
§9005-A. Powers and duties
The board office shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
The board office shall propose, revise, adopt and enforce rules necessary to carry out
this chapter in accordance with the provisions of Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
Page 196 - 132LR3049(37)

375, subchapter 2‑A. The board office may delegate the enforcement authority to
employees or to other entities established by rule by the office.
Sec. RRR-13. 10 MRSA §9006, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §9, is
further amended to read:
§9006. Installation standards
1. Standards. The board office shall, by rule, set uniform reasonable standards for
the installation of manufactured homes, including, but not limited to, standards for
foundations, supports, anchoring, underpinning and skirting of manufactured homes
installed in this State.
2. Exemption. Manufactured housing which that is manufactured, sold, installed or
serviced in compliance with this chapter shall be is exempt from all state or other political
subdivision codes, standards or regulations which that regulate the same matters.
Sec. RRR-14. 10 MRSA §9006-B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §10, is
further amended to read:
§9006-B. Formaldehyde emissions; disclosure
In addition to requiring that the "Health Notice on Formaldehyde Emissions" set out in
24 Code of Federal Regulations 53280.309, Section 3280.309 be prominently displayed in
each manufactured housing unit sold in the State and provided as part of the Manufactured
Home Consumer Manual provided to each purchaser of a new manufactured housing unit,
the board office shall require that a copy of that notice be provided to a purchaser of a new
manufactured housing unit at the time of execution of the purchase and sales agreement,
and that each purchaser sign a certification, provided at the bottom of that notice, that the
purchaser has read and understood the contents of the notice before signing the purchase
and sales agreement.
Sec. RRR-15. 10 MRSA §9006-C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 241, Pt. A, §§1 and
2, is further amended to read:
§9006-C. Warranty seals
The board office shall issue warranty seals to be attached on manufactured housing
sold in this State. The following provisions govern the attachment of warranty seals on
manufactured housing.
1. Manufacturer's warranty seal. Before manufactured housing may be installed in
this State, the manufacturer shall first obtain from the board office a Maine manufacturer's
warranty seal. The warranty seal may be issued upon payment of the fee as set pursuant to
section 9021, subsection 2‑A. The manufacturer must attach the seal to the manufactured
housing.
2. Installer's or mechanic's warranty seal. Before manufactured housing may be
installed in this State, the installer or mechanic must obtain from the board office a Maine
installer's or mechanic's warranty seal. The warranty seal may be issued upon payment of
the fee as set pursuant to section 9021, subsection 2‑A. The installer or mechanic must
attach the seal to the manufactured housing.
Sec. RRR-16. 10 MRSA §9006-D, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 281, §1, is amended
to read:
Page 197 - 132LR3049(37)

§9006-D. Notice of installation
1. Notice of installation. A manufacturer, dealer, mechanic and installer shall notify
the board office every month of the installations completed by that person that month. The
notice must include the location of each unit of manufactured housing, the owner of each
unit at the time of installation, the type or model of the unit, the manufacturer of the unit,
written certification that the installation meets standards that conform to those required by
the board office and the name and address of the manufacturer, dealer, mechanic or
installer. The information must be submitted within 10 days after the end of each month
in the form and manner prescribed by the board office by rule. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
II‑A 2-A.
2. Failure to file. The board office may require a manufacturer, dealer, mechanic or
installer who fails to comply with this section to pay a fine of not less than $5 and not more
than $100 for each day the notice is late.
Sec. RRR-17. 10 MRSA §9008, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§11, is further amended to read:
1. Licenses. A person may not manufacture, sell, broker, distribute, install or service
any manufactured housing in this State regardless of the destination of the housing without
first obtaining a license from the board office as required in this chapter.
Sec. RRR-18. 10 MRSA §9009, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §12, is
further amended to read:
§9009. Investigations; suspensions; revocations
1. Investigations. The board office is authorized to conduct, delegate or administer
any inspections and investigations as may be necessary to carry out its responsibilities
under this chapter. Fees for inspection of manufactured housing that must be paid by the
manufacturer, dealer, developer dealer, installer or mechanic whose actions or failure to act
gave rise to the necessity of the inspection are set pursuant to section 9021, subsection 2‑A.
The board office is authorized to contract with local governments and private inspection
organizations to carry out such inspection functions to the extent not prohibited by federal
law, rule or regulation.
3. Remedies for manufacturing and building system defects. The board staff office
may investigate any complaints made to the board office of noncompliance with or
violation of chapter 213 or a warranty applicable to the sale of manufactured housing. If
the board office finds, after hearing, that a manufacturer, dealer or developer dealer has
sold, or is making available for sale, manufactured housing that poses a threat to public
health or safety or has failed to comply with chapter 213 or an applicable warranty, express
or implied, the board office may order the manufacturer, dealer or developer dealer or any
combination thereof to take appropriate corrective action. Corrective action may include,
but is not limited to, reimbursing consumers for repairs that are covered by warranty and
made by the consumer if the consumer notifies the dealer, developer dealer or manufacturer
in writing of the defect within a reasonable time prior to undertaking the repairs and the
board office finds that the repairs are or were necessary to correct or prevent an imminent
threat to health or safety or to the structure of the manufactured housing. The board office
may also revoke or suspend the license of the manufacturer, dealer, developer dealer or any
Page 198 - 132LR3049(37)

combination thereof to prevent any future threat to public health or safety. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 8003, subsection 5‑A, revocations ordered by the board office are
subject to judicial review exclusively in the Superior Court in accordance with Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 7. This subsection applies to any new manufactured housing that
is sold to a consumer after January 1, 1993.
4. Remedies for installation defects. The board staff office may investigate all
complaints made to the board office of noncompliance with or violation of chapter 213 or
a warranty applicable to the installation of manufactured housing. If the board office finds,
after hearing, that the installation of manufactured housing poses a threat to public health
or safety or does not comply with the board's office's installation standards, chapter 213 or
any applicable warranty, the board office may order the installer to take appropriate
corrective action. Corrective action may include, but is not limited to, reimbursing
consumers for repairs that are covered by warranty and made by the consumer if the
consumer notifies the installer or mechanic in writing of the defect within a reasonable time
prior to undertaking the repairs and the board office finds that the repairs are or were
necessary to correct or prevent an imminent threat to health or safety or to the structure of
manufactured housing. The board office may also revoke or suspend the installer's or
mechanic's license to install manufactured housing to prevent any future threat to the public
health or safety. Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 10, section 8003, subsection 5‑A,
revocations Revocations ordered by the board office are subject to judicial review
exclusively in the Superior Court in accordance with Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 7.
This subsection applies to any new manufactured housing that is sold to a consumer after
January 1, 1993.
Sec. RRR-19. 10 MRSA §9011, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §13, is
further amended to read:
§9011. Enforcement and penalties
1. Inspection of violations. The board office may, upon complaint or probable cause,
inspect the manufactured housing, manufacturing facilities, a licensee's business facilities
or such records as may be necessary to verify whether a violation has occurred. If the board
office finds that a violation has occurred, it shall proceed pursuant to section 9009.
2. Petition to initiate legal action. The board office may petition the Attorney
General to initiate legal action in any court of competent jurisdiction for monetary or
injunctive relief to enforce this chapter.
3. Penalties. Any A person found guilty of violation of this chapter may be required
to pay a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each such violation, but not more than
$5,000 for an action consisting of separate violations.
4. Private actions. The private rights of action created by this subsection are in
addition to any rights of enforcement and relief granted to the board office in this chapter.
The board office shall notify all claimants of their right to seek remedy.
A. A person damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter also has a cause of action
in court against the person responsible for the manufacture, brokering, distribution,
sale, lease, installation or service, and the court may award appropriate damages and
cost for litigation in its judgment.
Page 199 - 132LR3049(37)

B. After exhausting all administrative remedies, a person damaged as a result of a
violation of section 9042 also has a cause of action in court against the political
subdivision of the State that fails to comply with the provisions of section 9042, and
the court may award injunctive relief.
5. Crime designated. An individual or a director, officer or agent of a corporation
who knowingly and willfully violates section 9008 in a manner that threatens the health or
safety of any purchaser commits a Class E crime.
Sec. RRR-20. 10 MRSA §9012, as enacted by PL 1977, c. 550, §1, is amended to
read:
§9012. Confidential information
1. Reported information. All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the
board office, its director or any of its employees which that contains or relates to a trade
secret, or which that, if disclosed, would put the person furnishing the information at a
substantial competitive disadvantage, shall be considered is confidential, except that the
information may be disclosed to other federal, state or local officials concerned with
enforcement of this chapter or when relevant in any proceeding under this chapter or any
related law, rule or regulation.
2. Refusal to release information. In any action brought against a member, officer
or employee of the board office pursuant to Title 1, section 410, for refusal to release
information in the custody or control of the board office, it shall be is a defense if that the
defendant refused to release the information in the good faith belief that such information
was rendered confidential by the terms of subsection 1.
3. State not liable. No An action for damages shall may not accrue against the State
or the board, or the members, officers or employees of the board: office for the mistaken
release of information rendered confidential by subsection 1.
A. For the mistaken release of information rendered confidential by subsection 1.
Sec. RRR-21. 10 MRSA §9021, as amended by PL 2021, c. 642, §4 and c. 676, Pt.
A, §21, is further amended to read:
§9021. Licenses
The board office shall adopt rules governing qualifications for each category of license
under its jurisdiction.
1. Licenses required. Any A person who engages in the business of manufacturing,
brokering, distributing, selling, installing or servicing manufactured housing, regardless of
the destination of the housing, must first obtain a license issued by the board office. The
board office shall, within a reasonable time, issue a license to any a person who intends to
manufacture, sell, install or service manufactured housing in this State subject to filing and
approval of an application. Any A person who is licensed to conduct these activities by
other state or federal law is exempt from this requirement when the law provides for
specific authority to provide a particular service or preempts the requirement for such a
license. Active licensees of the Real Estate Commission are exempt from the licensing
requirement for selling or brokering used manufactured housing and new manufactured
housing if such housing is sold or offered for sale by a licensee of the board office.
Page 200 - 132LR3049(37)

1-A. Initial training. All licensees and applicants for licensure must obtain initial
training, including, but not limited to, the servicing and installation of manufactured
housing. Applicants for initial licensure must complete the training before the board office
approves the application for licensure.
2-A. Fees. The Director of the Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation
within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation director of the office may
establish by rule fees for purposes authorized under this chapter in amounts that are
reasonable and necessary for their respective purposes. The license fee to operate a
manufactured housing community pursuant to subchapter 6 may not exceed a base fee of
$60 plus an additional amount of up to $6 per manufactured home site, except that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2030, the fee per manufactured home site is $16 per site. This fee must accompany
each license application, including applications for manufactured housing community
expansion and license renewal. The review and evaluation fees authorized by section 9083
may not exceed the actual cost of the review or evaluation. The fee for any inspection
authorized by this chapter may not exceed the actual cost of the inspection. The fee for
each warranty seal required by section 9006‑C, subsections 1 and 2 and each new dwelling
unit required by section 9045 may not exceed $200. The fee for any other purpose
authorized by this chapter may not exceed $200 annually. Rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
3. License term. A license expires on the date set by the Commissioner of
Professional and Financial Regulation pursuant to section 8003, subsection 4 director of
the office for the licensing period for which the license was issued. A license may be
renewed upon receipt of an application for renewal and the payment of the renewal fee as
set pursuant to subsection 2‑A. A license may be renewed up to 90 calendar days after the
date of expiration upon payment of a late fee in addition to the renewal fee. An applicant
who submits an application for renewal more than 90 calendar days after the expiration
date is subject to all requirements governing new applicants under this chapter.
4. Renewals. A license may be renewed up to 90 days after the date of its expiration
upon payment of a late fee in addition to the renewal fee as set under subsection 2‑A. If
any licensee fails to renew within 90 days after expiration, that licensee is required to make
a new application.
6. Financial responsibility. The board office may require bonding or other reasonable
methods to ensure that manufacturers, dealers, developer dealers and others licensed under
this chapter are financially responsible to fully comply with this chapter.
8-A. Denial or refusal to renew license; disciplinary action. In addition to the
grounds enumerated in section 8003, subsection 5‑A, paragraph A, subparagraphs (1), (2)
and (3), the board office may deny a license, refuse to renew a license or impose the
disciplinary sanctions authorized by section 8003, subsection 5‑A for a violation of the
rules of the office or for any of the following reasons:
A. Accepting manufactured housing, directly or indirectly, from a manufacturer not
licensed by the State pursuant to this chapter;
B. Selling or delivering, directly or indirectly, manufactured housing to a dealer or
developer dealer not licensed by the State pursuant to this chapter; or
Page 201 - 132LR3049(37)

C. Violation of any of the provisions of chapter 213.
9. Proof of sales tax registration. The board office shall require that an applicant for
a manufacturer, dealer or developer dealer license under this subchapter demonstrate that
the applicant is registered with the State Tax Assessor for the collection of sales and use
tax under Title 36, chapter 211 or that the applicant is not required to register under that
chapter.
10. License by endorsement. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, the board office, in accordance with this section 8003‑H and any applicable rules
adopted pursuant to that this section, shall establish a process to issue a license by
endorsement for each license authorized under this chapter that the board office determines
is appropriate for licensure by endorsement. An applicant may submit an application under
the process established under this subsection or any other licensure process authorized in
this chapter.
Sec. RRR-22. 10 MRSA §9041, first ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 695, Pt. B,
§3, is further amended to read:
The board office shall adopt rules and establish standards as provided by section
9005‑A to administer and enforce this subchapter.
Sec. RRR-23. 10 MRSA §9042, as amended by PL 2011, c. 633, §4, is further
amended to read:
§9042. Standards
1. Standards. The board office shall, by rule, adopt standards in conformance with
nationally recognized standards for the construction and the installation of manufactured
housing.
2. Approval. The board office shall approve for sale or installation all manufactured
housing that complies with the rules and standards authorized by this chapter or shall
delegate the authority to inspect and approve the manufactured housing by inspection
agencies authorized by the board office.
3. Exemption. Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 25, section 2357‑A and Title
30‑A, section 4358, new manufactured housing that is manufactured, brokered, distributed,
sold, installed or serviced in compliance with this chapter is exempt from all state or other
political subdivision codes, standards, rules or regulations that regulate the same matters.
A building permit or certificate of occupancy may not be delayed, denied or withheld on
account of any alleged failure of new manufactured housing to comply with any code,
standard, rule or regulation from which the new manufactured housing is exempt under this
subsection.
5. Local enforcement. Except as specifically set forth in this subsection, a certificate
of occupancy for any certified manufactured housing may not be denied, delayed or
withheld on account of any alleged failure to comply with this chapter or any building code
or rule adopted by the board office. For the purposes of this section, "certified
manufactured housing" means new manufactured housing to which a label, seal or other
device has been affixed, in accordance with rules adopted by the board office, certifying
the compliance of the housing with this chapter and all applicable rules.
Page 202 - 132LR3049(37)

A. The State or a political subdivision of the State may deny a certificate of occupancy
for any certified manufactured housing when, in the exercise of reasonable judgment,
the State or the political subdivision of the State determines that an imminent and direct
risk of serious physical injury or death would exist in the normal use of the
manufactured housing.
B. If a certificate of occupancy for certified manufactured housing is denied, the State
or a political subdivision of the State shall promptly provide the applicant for the
certificate of occupancy with written notice of the denial. The notice must describe
each reason for the denial of the certificate of occupancy in sufficient detail to allow
the applicant to correct each deficiency noted. The State or a political subdivision of
the State shall simultaneously provide a copy of the notice to the board office.
C. If the code enforcement or other inspection officer of the State or a political
subdivision of the State identifies a failure of certified manufactured housing to comply
with this chapter or any building code or rule adopted by the board office, the officer
may file a complaint with the board office in accordance with section 9051.
D. This chapter may not be construed to impose a duty on a code enforcement or other
inspection officer of the State or a political subdivision of the State to inspect any
certified manufactured housing for compliance with this chapter or any building code
or rule adopted by the board office. Unless a certificate of occupancy has been issued
pursuant to the provisions of section 9043, subsection 2, paragraph A, a certificate of
occupancy for certified manufactured housing does not constitute a representation by
the State or a political subdivision of the State that the manufactured housing meets the
standards established under this chapter.
6. Review of denial; issuance of certificate of occupancy. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Title 25, chapter 313, if a certificate of occupancy for certified manufactured
housing is denied on account of any alleged failure of the manufactured housing to comply
with this chapter or any building code or rule adopted by the board office or any law, rule,
regulation or ordinance from which the manufactured housing is exempt under this chapter,
the applicant for the certificate of occupancy may petition the board office to review the
denial.
The board office shall issue a certificate of occupancy for the manufactured housing if,
after appropriate notice and administrative hearing in accordance with Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter IV 4, the board office determines that:
A. The manufactured housing has been certified pursuant to the rules adopted by the
board office;
B. The certificate of occupancy was not denied pursuant to subsection 5, paragraph A;
and
C. The notice of denial issued under subsection 5, paragraph B does not specify any
violation of applicable law, rule, regulation or ordinance from which the manufactured
housing is not exempted under this chapter.
A certificate of occupancy issued under this subsection has the same validity, force and
effect as if issued by the State or a political subdivision of the State in which the
manufactured housing is located.
Page 203 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. RRR-24. 10 MRSA §9043, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §§18 and
19, is further amended to read:
§9043. Approval alternatives
1. Inspection agency. Any A manufacturer seeking inspection and approval of
manufactured housing subject to the requirements of this subchapter may contract with an
inspection agency authorized by the board office to perform the necessary services in order
to obtain approval of the manufactured housing.
2. Local option. The provisions of this subchapter must be waived by the board office
with respect to manufactured housing that is installed in a municipality that has adopted a
building code and has a local building code enforcement agency if:
A. The manufactured housing is found by the local enforcement agency to comply
with the applicable local building code; and
B. The local enforcement agency reports the compliance to the board office in such
form and detail as the board office may reasonably require.
3. Program of approval. The board office may provide a special program of approval
to manufacturers who can demonstrate an unreasonable economic hardship resulting from
the alternatives in subsections 1 and 2, except that in no case shall a program of
unsupervised self-certification may not be authorized.
4. Certification. The manufacturer of that housing, regardless of the approval
alternative used, shall certify that the manufactured housing conforms to all applicable
standards whether adopted by the board office or local enforcement agency, as the case
may be, and that manufacturer's certification must be permanently affixed to the
manufactured housing in accordance with such requirements as the board office may by
rule prescribe. Affixation of a certificate to manufactured housing signifies the
manufacturer's representation and warranty to all purchasers of the housing that the housing
was manufactured in accordance with all applicable standards of the board office or the
local enforcement agency, as the case may be, in effect on the date of manufacture.
5. Documentation. The manufacturer shall provide to an agency in accordance with
this section for review and approval any required documents necessary to define the design,
assembly and installation of the manufactured housing to be produced, including the quality
assurance practices to be applied by the manufacturer.
6. Inspection and certification. Manufactured housing produced by a manufacturer
approved in subsection 5, shall must be inspected by an approval agency in accordance
with this section, and certified by that agency as having been constructed in accordance
with the standards adopted by the board office or local enforcement agency, as the case
may be, provided as long as the approval agency makes that determination.
Sec. RRR-25. 10 MRSA §9044, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §20, is
further amended to read:
§9044. Authorized inspection agencies
1. Establishment of procedures and standards. The board office shall, by regulation
rule, establish procedures and standards for the qualification of private or public agencies
to perform evaluation and inspection services required by this subchapter. The current
edition of the Criteria Standard Specification for Agencies Engaged in System Analysis
Page 204 - 132LR3049(37)

and Compliance Assurance for Manufactured Buildings Building, ASTM-E 541, as
adopted by the American Society of Testing and Materials shall ASTM International must
be considered by the board office in adopting these standards and procedures.
2. Inspection agencies. The board shall office may qualify as inspection agencies
only those persons or organizations which that it determines to comply with the standards
adopted by the board office pursuant to subsection 1. Inspection agencies qualified under
this subsection may contract with manufactured housing manufacturers to provide
inspection services required by this subchapter.
3. Suspension of qualification. Qualification of an inspection agency must be
suspended by the board office if, after appropriate notice and administrative hearing, it
determines the agency is no longer qualified as meeting the standards adopted pursuant to
subsection 1. The board office may request information and documentation and may
conduct such reviews and inspections of the work of a qualified agency as the board office
determines are necessary to reasonably ensure continuing compliance of the qualified
agency with the standards adopted pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. RRR-26. 10 MRSA §9046, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§21, is further amended to read:
Upon complaint by any a person concerning an alleged violation of this chapter, the
board office may investigate and determine, or may cause to be investigated and
determined, whether the unit complies with established rules. The board office shall notify
the complainant of the complainant's right to relief under section 9011, subsection 4. If the
board office determines the defect occurred in other similar manufactured housing, the
board office shall notify all ascertainable purchasers of the housing, in accordance with the
records obtained from the manufacturer and dealer of their possible right of action under
this subchapter. Failure of the manufacturer, dealer or developer dealer to retain reasonable
business records or to provide access to those records in response to a request by the board
office pursuant to this subchapter is a violation of this chapter.
Sec. RRR-27. 10 MRSA §9047, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §22, is
further amended to read:
§9047. Notification and correction of defects
1. Manufacturer. Every A manufacturer of manufactured housing in this State and
any a manufacturer who offers manufactured housing for sale, lease, delivery, introduction
or importation into this State shall furnish notification of any defect in manufactured
housing produced by the manufacturer that the manufacturer or the board office determines
relates to a standard of the board office that is applicable to the housing or that constitutes
a safety hazard to an occupant of the housing. The notification must be accomplished in a
manner and within a time the board office by rule prescribes, except that the rules must at
least provide the following:
A. Notification by mail to the first purchaser of the manufactured housing, other than
a dealer or developer dealer of the manufacturer, and to any subsequent purchaser
whose identity the manufacturer knows;
B. Notification by mail or some expeditious means to the dealers and developer dealers
of the manufacturer to whom the manufactured housing was delivered; and
Page 205 - 132LR3049(37)

C. Notification by mail to the board office.
2. Dealers. Any A person who sells, leases, delivers or transports manufactured
housing that has been certified under this chapter shall notify the board office and any
present or prospective purchaser of the housing in writing of any defect resulting from
damage or modification to the housing that the person determines relates to a standard of
the board office that is applicable to the housing or that constitutes a safety hazard to an
occupant of the housing. This requirement does not apply to sales or leases of manufactured
housing after the first purchase of the housing by a person for purposes other than resale
and does not apply to deliveries or transportations of the manufactured housing that occur
after the first installation of the housing on a permanent foundation.
3. Corrections. The licensed person responsible for noncompliance with the standards
adopted by the board office or for the creation of a safety hazard shall promptly make or
cause to be made such repairs and modifications as may be necessary to correct the
nonconformance or eliminate the safety hazard. Any A licensed person who fails to make
these repairs or modifications is subject to section 9009.
Sec. RRR-28. 10 MRSA §9048, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. D, §10, is
further amended to read:
§9048. Reciprocity
1. Standards. If the board office finds that the standards for the manufacture and
inspection of manufactured housing prescribed by statute or regulation of another state or
governmental agency meet the objectives of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter and are enforced satisfactorily by that other state or other governmental agency,
or by their agents, the board office may accept manufactured housing that has been certified
by that other state or governmental agency as being in compliance with this chapter. The
standards of another state are not considered to be satisfactorily enforced unless that other
state provides for notification to the board office of suspensions or revocations of approvals
issued by that other state in a manner satisfactory to the board office and so notifies the
board office. Acceptance of this notification does not remove the board's office's right to
pursue remedies outlined in sections 9009 and 9011.
2. Suspension or revocation. Notwithstanding Title 5, section 10051, the board office
may suspend or revoke the board's office's acceptance or certification, or both, of
manufactured housing certified under the reciprocal provisions of this section, for the
following causes:
A. If the board office determines that the standards for the manufacture and inspection
of the manufactured housing of another state or governmental agency do not meet the
objectives of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;
B. The board office determines that the standards for manufacture and inspection are
not being enforced to the satisfaction of the board office; or
C. The other state or governmental agency suspends or revokes its approval or
certification.
3. Cooperation. In order to encourage reciprocity, the board office shall cooperate
with similar authorities in other jurisdictions, with national standards organizations and
with model code procedures for testing, evaluating, approving and inspecting manufactured
housing, and otherwise encouraging their production and acceptance.
Page 206 - 132LR3049(37)

4. Agreement. The board shall office may not grant this reciprocity unless the
recipient state enters into an agreement with the board office whereby manufactured
housing manufactured within Maine and regulated under the provisions of this chapter shall
be is deemed approved for sale in that recipient state.
5. Formal agreements. The board, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of
Professional and Financial Regulation, office may enter into formal agreements with the
agencies or authorities of other states, or other governmental agencies, or their agents, to
carry out the purpose of this chapter.
Sec. RRR-29. 10 MRSA §9051, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §23, is
further amended to read:
§9051. General
1. Violation. The board office may cause to be investigated any complaint of an
alleged violation by any licensee or of any rules adopted by the board office, either by its
own inspector or any an authorized agency, to determine the validity of the complaint.
A. Within one year and 10 days after installation, any a home buyer of new
manufactured housing may file a complaint about any defective construction or
installation defect.
B. Any A person having knowledge of a violation of this chapter may file a complaint
within one year of that violation.
2. Form. Complaints may be made in any form, as approved by the board office, as
long as the complaint includes all information the board office considers necessary.
3. Notice for purposes of limitation of actions. If a consumer files a written
complaint with the manufacturer, dealer, developer dealer, installer, mechanic or board
office within one year and 10 days after installation of new manufactured housing, receipt
of the written complaint by the manufacturer, dealer, developer dealer, installer, mechanic
or board office tolls the statute of limitations for purposes of bringing an action to enforce
any an applicable warranty concerning the defect that is the subject of the written
complaint.
Sec. RRR-30. 10 MRSA §9061, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 152, §16, is
repealed.
Sec. RRR-31. 10 MRSA §9061, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1987, c. 395, Pt. A,
§38, is repealed.
Sec. RRR-32. 10 MRSA §9061, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1987, c. 395, Pt. A,
§38, is repealed.
Sec. RRR-33. 10 MRSA §9061, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Director. "Director" means the Director of the Maine Office of Community
Affairs.
Sec. RRR-34. 10 MRSA §9061, sub-§9, as amended by PL 1993, c. 642, §31, is
further amended to read:
9. State administrative agency. "State administrative agency" means the department
or office that has been approved or conditionally approved to carry out the state plan for
Page 207 - 132LR3049(37)

enforcement of the standards pursuant to section 623 of the Housing and Community
Development Act of 1974, Public Law 93-383, 42 United States Code, Section 5422 and
24 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 3282, Subpart G.
Sec. RRR-35. 10 MRSA §9062, first ¶, as amended by PL 1995, c. 502, Pt. H,
§14, is further amended to read:
The board shall delegate the responsibility for administering the state administrative
agency program to the Commissioner of Professional and Financial Regulation. The
commissioner director may delegate or contract out the administration of the state
administrative agency program at the commissioner's director's discretion. The board
office is vested with the authority upon appropriate notice to discontinue participation in
the federal enforcement program as a state administrative agency for this State.
Sec. RRR-36. 10 MRSA §9063, first ¶, as amended by PL 1995, c. 353, §2, is
further amended to read:
The commissioner director is authorized to issue adopt, amend and revoke rules as
necessary to implement all procedures required of a state administrative agency pursuant
to 24 Code of Federal Regulations, Paragraph 3282 and 42 United States Code, Sections
5401 to 5426, including the implementation of a consumer complaint handling process and
the holding of hearings. In the event of a conflict between this chapter and the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 involving the state
administrative agency program, the National Manufactured Housing Construction and
Safety Standards Act of 1974 prevails. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine
technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. RRR-37. 10 MRSA §9064, as amended by PL 1995, c. 353, §3, is further
amended to read:
§9064. Standards
1. Adoption, administration and enforcement of standards. The department office
is charged with the adoption, administration and enforcement of manufactured housing
construction and safety standards. The standards adopted must meet the standards adopted
pursuant to the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of
1974, 42 United States Code, Sections 5401 to 5426.
2. Rules. The department office may adopt rules necessary to enforce the standards
adopted under subsection 1.
Sec. RRR-38. 10 MRSA §9065, first ¶, as amended by PL 1995, c. 353, §4, is
further amended to read:
The department office, by authorized representatives, may enter, at reasonable times,
any factory, warehouse or establishment in which manufactured housing is manufactured,
stored or held for sale for the purpose of ascertaining whether the requirements of the
federal manufactured housing construction and safety standards and the rules of the
department office have been and are being met.
Sec. RRR-39. 10 MRSA §9066, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§25, is further amended to read:
Page 208 - 132LR3049(37)

1. Violations. A person who violates any of the following provisions relating to
manufactured housing or rules adopted by the department office is subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed $1,000 for each violation. Each violation constitutes a separate violation with
respect to each manufactured housing unit, except that the maximum penalty may not
exceed $1,000,000 for any related series of violations occurring within one year from the
date of the first violation. It is a violation of this chapter for a person:
A. To manufacture for sale, lease, sell, offer for sale or lease or introduce, deliver or
import into the State any manufactured housing that is manufactured on or after the
effective date of any applicable federal manufactured home construction and safety
standard that does not comply with that standard;
B. To fail or refuse to permit access to or copying of records, fail to make reports or
provide information or fail or refuse to permit entry or inspection as required by section
9065;
C. To fail to furnish notification of any defect as required by 42 United States Code,
Section 5414;
D. To fail to issue a certification required by 42 United States Code, Section 5415 or
to issue a certification to the effect that a manufactured home conforms to all applicable
federal manufactured home construction and safety standards, if that person in the
exercise of due care has reason to know that the certification is false or misleading in
a material respect;
E. To fail to establish and maintain records or make such reports and provide
information as the department office may reasonably require to enable it to determine
whether there is compliance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction
and Safety Standards Act of 1974; or fail to permit, upon request of a person duly
authorized by the commissioner director, inspection of appropriate books, papers,
records and documents relative to determining whether a manufacturer, distributor or
dealer has acted or is acting in compliance with this chapter or with the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974; or
F. To issue a certification pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section 5403, Paragraph
(a), if the person in the exercise of due care has reason to know that the certification is
false or misleading in a material respect.
Sec. RRR-40. 10 MRSA §9068, as amended by PL 1995, c. 353, §6, is further
amended to read:
§9068. Monitoring inspection fees
The department office shall establish a monitoring inspection fee in an amount
established by the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development. This monitoring inspection fee is an amount paid by the manufacturer for
each home produced in this State.
The manufacturer shall pay the monitoring inspection fee shall be paid by the
manufacturer to the Secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, who shall distribute for distribution, along with the fees collected from all
home manufacturers, among the approved and conditionally approved states, based on the
number of new homes whose first location after leaving the manufacturing plant is on the
premises of a distributor, dealer or purchaser in that state.
Page 209 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. RRR-41. 10 MRSA §9082, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§29, is further amended to read:
A person may not conduct, control, manage or operate, for compensation, directly or
indirectly, any manufactured housing community unless licensed by the board office.
Licenses issued must be displayed in a place readily visible to customers or other persons
using a licensed establishment.
Sec. RRR-42. 10 MRSA §9082, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§29, is further amended to read:
Any A person desiring a license shall submit satisfactory evidence, in a form acceptable
to the board office, of that person's ability to comply with the minimum standards of this
subchapter and all rules adopted under this subchapter.
Sec. RRR-43. 10 MRSA §9083, first ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 428, §1, is
further amended to read:
Application and license fees for manufactured housing communities are set under
section 9021, subsection 2‑A, including applications for manufactured housing community
expansion and license renewal. Fees are also set under section 9021, subsection 2‑A for
manufactured housing community inspections; for the cost of reviewing engineering and
site plans; for costs incurred in evaluating an applicant’s eligibility for licensure as a
manufactured housing community; and for costs incurred in evaluating a licensee’s
ongoing compliance with the requirements of this subchapter and the rules of the board
office. Failure to pay costs billed to an applicant or licensee within 90 days of the billing
date constitutes grounds for license revocation, unless an extension for an additional period
not to exceed 90 days is granted in writing by the board office. A municipality shall accept
a license issued by the board office as evidence a manufactured housing community meets
all requirements of this subchapter. A municipality may not charge any additional fees for
a manufactured housing community to operate.
Sec. RRR-44. 10 MRSA §9084, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §§31 to 33,
is further amended to read:
§9084. Issuance of licenses
The board office shall, within 30 days following receipt of application, issue a license
to operate any manufactured housing community that is found to comply with this
subchapter and the rules adopted by the board office.
When any applicant is found, based upon an inspection by the board office or by
municipal inspection made according to section 9088, an applicant is found to not be in
compliance with the requirements of this subchapter or rules adopted and approved
pursuant to section 9085 or section 9088, subsection 1, the board office may refuse issuance
of the initial license but may issue a conditional license with such terms and conditions as
required by the board office except when conditions are found that present a danger to the
health and safety of the public. A conditional license may not exceed 90 days. Failure by
the conditional licensee to meet the terms and conditions specified permits the board office
to void the conditional license.
Page 210 - 132LR3049(37)

The conditional license is void when the board office has delivered in hand or by
certified mail a written notice to the conditional licensee or, if the licensee cannot be
reached for service in hand or by certified mail, has left notice thereof at the facility.
Upon the written request of the board office, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention shall provide such technical
services as may be required by the board office to assist with inspections and licensing of
new manufactured housing communities. The department Department of Health and
Human Services may assess the manufactured housing community owner a reasonable fee
for these services.
A license expires on the date set by the Commissioner of Professional and Financial
Regulation pursuant to section 8003, subsection 4 director of the office for the licensing
period for which the license was issued. A license may be renewed upon receipt of an
application for renewal and payment of the renewal fee as set under section 9021,
subsection 2‑A, subject to compliance with rules of the board office and with this
subchapter. A license may be renewed up to 90 days after the date of its expiration upon
payment of a late fee in addition to the renewal fee as set under section 9021, subsection
2‑A. An applicant who submits an application for renewal more than 90 calendar days
after the expiration date is subject to all requirements governing new applicants under this
chapter.
The issuance of the license provided for in this subchapter does not provide exemption
from other state or local laws, ordinances or regulations, notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary.
A license issued under this subchapter may not be assigned or transferred.
Sec. RRR-45. 10 MRSA §9085, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§34, is further amended to read:
The board office may make adopt and enforce all necessary rules for the administration
of this subchapter, and may repeal or amend such rules from time to time as may be in the
public interest, insofar as that action is not in conflict with any of the provisions of this
subchapter.
Sec. RRR-46. 10 MRSA §9086, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B,
§35, is further amended to read:
The board office and any duly designated officer or employee thereof may enter upon
the premises of any manufactured housing community licensed pursuant to this subchapter
at any reasonable time in order to determine the state of compliance with this subchapter
and any rules in force pursuant to this subchapter. The right of entry and inspection extends
to any premises under its jurisdiction that the board office has reason to believe are being
operated or maintained without a license, but no any such entry or inspection of any
premises may not be made without the permission of the owner or person in charge of the
premises or, after hearing, upon order of the court.
Sec. RRR-47. 10 MRSA §9088, as amended by PL 2025, c. 428, §2, is further
amended to read:
§9088. Municipal inspections
Page 211 - 132LR3049(37)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter to the contrary, the board
office may issue a license to a manufactured housing community on the basis of an
inspection performed by an inspector who works for and is compensated by the
municipality in which the establishment is located, but only if the following conditions
have been met.
1. Adopted rules; code of standards. The municipality involved has adopted a set
of rules, ordinances or other code of standards for the establishments which that has been
approved by the board office and which that is consistent with the rules used by the board
office for the issuance of the licenses in effect at the time of inspection.
2. Qualified to make inspections. No A municipally employed sanitarians sanitarian
may not make inspections an inspection under the provisions of this subchapter, unless
certified as qualified by the Commissioner of Health and Human Services.
3. Inspection to ascertain intent. The board office may from time to time inspect the
municipally inspected establishment to ascertain that the intent of these statutes is being
followed.
4. Inspection reports. The municipalities municipality shall furnish the board office
copies of its inspection reports relating to the inspections on a monthly basis.
5. Charge. Municipalities may not charge the board office for performing those the
inspections.
7. Licenses. Licenses issued under this section shall must be displayed, renewed and
in every other way treated the same as licenses issued under this subchapter on the basis of
inspection by the board office.
8. Certification. Certification of municipally employed sanitarians shall must be in
accordance with standards set by the Commissioner of Health and Human Services and
shall be extended for a period of 3 years.
Sec. RRR-48. 10 MRSA §9089, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A, §22, is
further amended to read:
§9089. Denial or refusal to renew license; disciplinary action
The board office may deny a license, or refuse to renew a license or impose the
disciplinary sanctions authorized by section 8003, subsection 5‑A for any of the reasons
enumerated in section 8003, subsection 5‑A, paragraph A noncompliance with any
provision of this subchapter.
Sec. RRR-49. 10 MRSA §9090-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 398, §1, is
amended to read:
3. Attestation of net worth. An entity claiming an exemption under subsection 2,
paragraph D shall provide the register of deeds with an attestation of net worth when the
deed for the manufactured housing community is offered for recordation and any other
information or documentation as required by the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation office by rule.
Sec. RRR-50. 10 MRSA §9094, sub-§2, ¶B-2, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 642,
§39, is amended to read:
Page 212 - 132LR3049(37)

B-2. At the time of sale or change in the principal occupant of a mobile home, the
mobile home park owner or operator may require the owner of the home, if the home
was built before June 15, 1976, to provide evidence that the home meets the
Manufactured Housing Board's Maine Office of Community Affairs' standard for used
manufactured housing. The mobile home owner may demonstrate compliance with the
standard by providing the park owner or operator with a report signed by the following
persons and indicating that the home complies with the standard's specifications
regarding those aspects of the home inspected:
(1) A licensed electrician who inspected the home's electrical system;
(2) A person licensed to repair the home's heating system who inspected the
home's heating system; and
(3) A certified professional engineer who inspected the home for safety and
structural soundness.
Signature of the report may not be construed for any purpose as an endorsement that
the home meets provisions of the standard other than those for which the inspection
was conducted. A park owner who receives a signed report indicating that the home
complies may not require removal of a home under this section on the basis of fire
safety or the safety of the home.
Sec. RRR-51. 10 MRSA §9094, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 104, Pt.
B, §3 and amended by Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further amended to read:
F. The Manufactured Housing Board Maine Office of Community Affairs, in
conjunction with the State Fire Marshal, the Department of the Attorney General,
representatives of the manufactured housing industry, representatives of mobile home
park owners or operators and representatives of mobile home owners and tenants, shall
develop recommendations concerning the standards for rules covered by this
subsection. The recommendations shall must include standards designed to ensure the
safety of the mobile home and its occupants, while being objective and measurable to
provide for enforcement. The recommendations shall be made to the joint standing
committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over legal affairs and business
legislation by January 15, 1990.
Sec. RRR-52. 10 MRSA §9094, sub-§2, ¶F-1, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 678, §2,
is repealed.
Sec. RRR-53. 10 MRSA §9094, sub-§2, ¶F-2, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 678, §2,
is repealed.
Sec. RRR-54. 25 MRSA §2450-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. D,
§31, is further amended to read:
In addition to the fees established in section 2450, a surcharge of 4¢ 6¢ per square foot
of occupied space must be levied on the existing fee schedule for new construction,
reconstruction, repairs, renovations or new use for the sole purpose of funding the activities
of the Technical Building Codes and Standards Board with respect to the Maine Uniform
Building and Energy Code, established pursuant to Title 10, chapter 1103, the activities of
the Division of Building Codes and Standards under chapter 314 and the activities of the
Maine Office of Community Affairs under Title 30‑A, section 4451, subsection 3‑A, except
Page 213 - 132LR3049(37)

that the fee for review of a plan for the renovation of a public school, including the fee
established under section 2450, may not exceed $450. Revenue collected from this
surcharge must be deposited into the Uniform Building Codes and Standards Fund
established by section 2374.
Sec. RRR-55. 30-A MRSA §4358, sub-§1, ¶D, as repealed and replaced by PL
1993, c. 487, §1, is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) For "newer mobile homes," as defined in paragraph A, subparagraph (1), a
foundation that conforms to the installation standards established by the
Manufactured Housing Board Maine Office of Community Affairs; or
Sec. RRR-56. 30-A MRSA §4358, sub-§3, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 506,
§3, is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Be built according to acceptable engineering standards and with a professional
engineer's seal as required by the Manufactured Housing Board Maine Office of
Community Affairs;
Sec. RRR-57. 30-A MRSA §4358, sub-§3, ¶H, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 506,
§3, is repealed.
Sec. RRR-58. Transition provisions; Manufactured Housing Board. The
following provisions govern the transition of the responsibilities of the Manufactured
Housing Board, and its supporting services provided by the Department of Professional
and Financial Regulation, Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation, to the
Maine Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Manufactured Housing Board, including acting as the state
administrative agency under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in
or by the Manufactured Housing Board or on its behalf by the Office of Professional and
Occupational Regulation or any of the board's administrative units or officers are declared
in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect under the
authority of the Manufactured Housing Board or on its behalf by the Office of Professional
and Occupational Regulation or any of the board's administrative units or officers continue
in effect until supplanted by rules established by the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Manufactured Housing Board become, on the effective date of this Part, part of the
property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Manufactured Housing Board may be used by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Employees of the Maine Office of Community Affairs who were employees of the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation immediately prior to the effective
Page 214 - 132LR3049(37)

date of this Part retain all their employee rights, privileges and benefits, including sick
leave, vacation and seniority, provided under the Civil Service Law or collective bargaining
agreements. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Human
Resources shall provide assistance to the affected departments and shall assist with the
orderly implementation of this subsection.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances remaining in associated accounts of the Manufactured
Housing Board, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
PART SSS
Sec. SSS-1. 20-A MRSA §13407, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 441, §1, is
further amended to read:
3. School years beginning in or after 2022 and before 2027. For the school year
starting after June 30, 2022, and in each subsequent school year starting before July 1,
2027, the minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
is $40,000.
Sec. SSS-2. 20-A MRSA §13408 is enacted to read:
§13408. Minimum salaries beginning in 2027-2028 school year
1. School year 2027-2028. For the school year starting after June 30, 2027, the
minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical education teachers is
$45,000;
2. School year 2028-2029. For the school year starting after June 30, 2028, the
minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical education teachers is
$47,500; and
3. School years beginning in or after 2029. For the school year starting after June
30, 2029, and in each subsequent school year, the minimum salary for certified teachers
and career and technical education teachers is $50,000.
A school administrative unit shall provide to the department annually on or before
October 1st the number of certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
eligible for incremental salary increases as defined in section 15689, subsection 7‑A,
paragraph A.
Sec. SSS-3. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§7-B is enacted to read:
7-B. Adjustment for minimum teacher salary. Beginning in fiscal year 2027-28,
the commissioner shall, in accordance with this subsection, increase the state share of the
total allocation to a qualifying school administrative unit by an amount necessary to achieve
the minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
established in section 13408.
A. As used in this subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, "qualifying
school administrative unit" means a school administrative unit that the commissioner
determines to have a locally established salary schedule with a minimum teacher salary
less than $45,000 in school year 2027-2028. As used in this subsection, unless the
context otherwise indicates, "incremental salary increases" means the incremental
Page 215 - 132LR3049(37)

increases in the salaries of certified teachers and career and technical education
teachers employed by a qualifying school administrative unit in school year 2027-2028
necessary to meet the minimum salary requirements of section 13408 from fiscal year
2027-28 to fiscal year 2029-30.
B. The commissioner shall allocate the funds appropriated by the Legislature in
accordance with the following.
(1) The amount of increased funds provided to qualifying school administrative
units under this subsection must be the amount necessary to fund the incremental
salary increases specified in this subsection.
(2) The number of certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
eligible for incremental salary increases in a qualifying school administrative unit
for a fiscal year must be based on the information supplied to the department
pursuant to section 13408 in that fiscal year.
(3) The increased funds provided under this subsection must be issued to
qualifying school administrative units as an adjustment to the state school subsidy
for distribution to the certified teachers and career and technical education
teachers. Qualifying school administrative units shall use the payments provided
under this subsection to provide salary adjustments to those certified teachers and
career and technical education teachers eligible for incremental salary increases.
The department shall collect the necessary data to allow the funds to be included
in a qualifying school administrative unit's monthly subsidy payments beginning
no later than February 1st of each fiscal year.
(4) Funding for incremental salary increases in fiscal year 2027-28 must be based
on data submitted to the department and certified by school administrative units as
of October 1, 2026.
PART TTT
Sec. TTT-1. Transfer; Department of Labor, Maine Apprenticeship
Program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer up to $89,082 in fiscal year 2026-27, and up to $93,500 in fiscal year 2027-28,
from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Adult Use Cannabis Public
Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account to
the Department of Labor, Maine Apprenticeship Program, Other Special Revenue Funds
account to support the continuation of one limited-period CareerCenter Consultant position
established by Public Law 2023, chapter 683, Part B, section 5 through June 18, 2028.
PART UUU
Sec. UUU-1. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 2, Pt. A, §5 and
affected by §14, is amended to read:
4. Investment of funds. The money in the stabilization fund may be invested as
provided by law with the earnings credited to the stabilization fund.
Sec. UUU-2. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
Page 216 - 132LR3049(37)

4-A. Investment earnings. At the close of every month during which the stabilization
fund is below the 18% limitation described in subsection 1, the State Controller shall credit
investment earnings as follows:
A. Fifty percent of the investment earnings must be credited to the stabilization fund;
B. Twenty-five percent of the investment earnings must be credited to the Irrevocable
Trust Funds for Other Post-employment Benefits established in section 286-B,
subsection 2 for the state employee plan, as defined in section 286-B, subsection 1,
paragraph D; and
C. Twenty-five percent of the investment earnings must be credited to the Land for
Maine's Future Trust Fund established in section 6203-D.
Sec. UUU-3. 5 MRSA §1532, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. F, §2,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
5. Investment earnings; exception. At the close of every month during which the
stabilization fund is at the 18% limitation described in subsection 1, the State Controller
shall credit investment earnings as follows:
A. Seventy-five percent of the investment earnings must be credited to the Irrevocable
Trust Funds for Other Post-employment Benefits established in section 286-B,
subsection 2 for the state employee plan, as defined in section 286-B, subsection 1,
paragraph D; and
B. Twenty-five percent of the investment earnings must be credited to the Land for
Maine's Future Trust Fund established in section 6203-D.
PART VVV
Sec. VVV-1. Carrying provision; Department of Secretary of State,
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall
carry forward up to $750,000 in unexpended balances in the Personal Services and All
Other line categories in the Department of Secretary of State, Bureau of Corporations,
Elections and Commissions program, after all financial commitments for obligations and
budgetary adjustments have been made, to the next fiscal year in the All Other line category
in the Department of Secretary of State, Bureau of Corporations, Elections and
Commissions program to be used to continue the modernization of systems and services
provided to the public. These funds do not lapse and are intended to carry until expended.
PART WWW
Sec. WWW-1. 20-A MRSA §7211, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Supports, assistance and resources to school administrative units; authority to
bill. The Child Development Services System may assess fees for services provided to
school administrative units under this section as follows.
A. The Child Development Services System may assess fees to school administrative
units for supports, assistance and resources provided by regional support and service
hubs under this section. Fees must be established in accordance with rules adopted
pursuant to subsection 4 and may be based on, but are not limited to, the type, intensity,
Page 217 - 132LR3049(37)

duration or frequency of services and the costs reasonably associated with the provision
of those services.
B. The Child Development Services System may bill school administrative units for
supports, assistance and resources provided by regional support and service hubs under
this section, and school administrative units shall pay such invoices from funds
available for special education and related services, subject to applicable state and
federal law. The Child Development Services System may enter into agreements or
memoranda of understanding with school administrative units that specify the scope of
services and the method and schedule of payment.
Sec. WWW-2. 20-A MRSA §7211, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement subsection 3 specifying the
method for establishing rates for supports, assistance and resources provided to school
administrative units by regional support and service hubs under this section, which may
include hourly rates, per-service rates, per-pupil rates or other reasonable and established
methodologies. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
PART XXX
Sec. XXX-1. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt.
N, §2 and affected by §3, is amended to read:
B-1. "Commercial wood harvesting" means the commercial severance and, yarding
and hauling of trees for sale or for processing into logs, pulpwood, bolt wood, wood
chips, stud wood, poles, pilings, biomass or fuel wood or other products commonly
known as forest products.
Sec. XXX-2. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 469, §14
and affected by §44, is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) New or used machinery and equipment for use directly and primarily in
commercial wood harvesting, including, but not limited to, chain saws, skidders,
delimbers, forwarders, slashers, feller bunchers and, wood chippers, semitrailers
as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 66, trailers as defined in Title
29-A, section 101, subsection 86, trucks as defined in Title 29-A, section 101,
subsection 88, truck tractors as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 90,
pickup trucks as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 55 and commercial
motor vehicles as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 17; and
Sec. XXX-3. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 469, §14
and affected by §44, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Depreciable Except as provided in subparagraph (4), "depreciable machinery and
equipment" does not include a motor vehicle as defined in section 1752, subsection 7
or a trailer as defined in section 1752, subsection 19‑A.
Sec. XXX-4. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. "Hauling" means the transportation of forest products from the land where the forest
products were harvested to their initial destination involving production or use.
Page 218 - 132LR3049(37)

Sec. XXX-5. Application. This Part applies to sales occurring on or after January
1, 2027.
PART YYY
Sec. YYY-1. Supplemental payment to hospitals. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall determine a consistent and reasonable allocation method to
distribute a one-time supplemental payment to acute care hospitals. The amount of the
payment must equal the amount appropriated and allocated for this purpose by this Act but
may be proportionally reduced if revenues collected pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 36, chapter 377 are less than the allocation. Additionally, total payment
amounts may not exceed the lower of the amount appropriated for supplemental payments
by this Act and the amount by which any payment would cause the department to exceed
allowable aggregate upper payment limits as determined by the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The
department may make these payments in fiscal year 2026-27 to enable the department to
seek and receive approval for a state plan amendment from the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services with federal
matching payments to the extent possible.
Sec. YYY-2. Cost-of-living adjustment. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit the required
methodology notice necessary to seek approval from the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement a
cost-of-living adjustment for inpatient diagnosis-related group reimbursement rates subject
to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 45 effective July 1,
2026. The amount of the cost-of-living adjustment must be determined based on amounts
appropriated and allocated for this purpose by this Act and actual revenues collected
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, chapter 377.
Sec. YYY-3. Supplemental payments and increases in rates contingent.
Any supplemental payments and increases to hospital inpatient reimbursement rates
provided for in this Part with funding made available due to changing the base year of the
hospital tax are contingent upon the Department of Health and Human Services seeking
and being approved for any applicable tax waivers from the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to 42
Code of Federal Regulations, Section 433.72.
PART ZZZ
Sec. ZZZ-1. Transfer from Maine Budget Stabilization Fund; Highway
Fund unallocated balance. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer $13,029,115 from the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund
within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services to the unallocated balance
of the Highway Fund on or before June 30, 2027.
PART AAAA
Sec. AAAA-1. Carrying provision; Department of Education, Office of
Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2025-26, the State Controller shall carry
Page 219 - 132LR3049(37)

forward $1,117,457 of the unexpended balance of funds appropriated for debt service costs
associated with the bonding authority granted in Public Law 2021, chapter 635, Part X for
career and technical education centers and regions in the Department of Education, Office
of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways program, General Fund account, All
Other line category to the next fiscal year.
PART BBBB
Sec. BBBB-1. State Controller; post-closing. The State Controller is authorized
to keep open the official system of general accounts of State Government for fiscal year
2025-26 in order to make post-closing entries and adjustments to carry out the provisions
of this Act.
Sec. BBBB-2. Retroactivity. This Part applies retroactively to June 30, 2026.
PART CCCC
Sec. CCCC-1. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§2-D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412,
Pt. S, §4, is further amended to read:
2-D. Credit in 2022 and after. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022,
a resident individual is allowed a credit against the taxes imposed under this Part equal to
the amount by which the benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 4% of the resident
individual's income. The For tax years beginning on January 1, 2022 and before January
1, 2026, the credit may not exceed $1,000 for resident individuals under 65 years of age as
of the last day of the taxable year or, for. For tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, the credit may not exceed $1,500 for resident individuals under 65 years of age as of
the last day of the taxable year. For tax years beginning before January 1, 2024, the credit
may not exceed $1,500 for resident individuals 65 years of age and older as of the last day
of the taxable year. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, for resident
individuals 65 years of age and older, the credit may not exceed $2,000. In the case of
married individuals filing a joint return, only one spouse is required to be 65 years of age
or older to qualify for the $1,500 or $2,000 credit limitation. Married taxpayers filing
separate returns do not qualify for the credit under this section.
PART DDDD
Sec. DDDD-1. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Income tax surcharge. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the
tax calculated under subsections 1-F, 2-F and 3-F is increased by an income tax surcharge
at the rate of 2% on that portion of the taxpayer's Maine taxable income in excess of:
A. For married persons filing separate returns, 1/2 of the applicable amount under
paragraph D;
B. For single individuals, $1,000,000;
C. For heads of households, $1,500,000; and
D. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, $1,500,000.
Sec. DDDD-2. 36 MRSA §5160, as amended by PL 2003, c. 390, §35, is further
amended to read:
§5160. Imposition of tax
Page 220 - 132LR3049(37)

The tax is imposed, at the rates provided by section 5111 for single individuals,
including the surcharge imposed pursuant to section 5111, subsection 7 at the rate for single
individuals, upon the Maine taxable income of estates and trusts. The tax must be paid by
the fiduciary.
Sec. DDDD-3. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§10, as corrected by RR 2025, c. 1, Pt. A,
§58, is amended to read:
10. Dependent exemption phase-out. Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter,
by the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified in section 5219‑SS, subsection 4,
paragraphs A, B and C, except that, for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding
section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer
Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year
divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30,
2024; and
Sec. DDDD-4. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. H,
§4 and reallocated by RR 2025, c. 1, Pt. A, §59, is amended to read:
11. Income deduction for retirement plan benefits; applicable amount. Beginning
in 2025 and each year thereafter, by the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified
in section 5122, subsection 2, paragraph M‑3, except that for the purposes of this
subsection, notwithstanding section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment"
is the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the
preceding calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month
period ending June 30, 2024.; and
Sec. DDDD-5. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Income tax surcharge. Beginning in 2026 and each year thereafter, by the dollar
amounts specified in section 5111, subsection 7, paragraphs B, C and D, except that for the
purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-
living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending
June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for
the 12-month period ending June 30, 2025.
PART EEEE
Sec. EEEE-1. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 201, §1;
c. 230, §2; c. 306, §§2 and 3; and c. 361, §§3 to 5, is further amended by enacting at the
end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
As used in this subsection, "low-income household" means a household that is eligible for
an assistance program administered by the Maine State Housing Authority pursuant to Title
30-A, section 4722, subsection 1, paragraph W or a means-tested assistance program
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services and that has an income of
no more than 150% of the federal poverty level, as defined in Title 22, section 3762,
subsection 1, paragraph C.
Sec. EEEE-2. Funds to supplement allocations for low-income electric
ratepayer assistance. Funds appropriated for low-income electric ratepayer assistance
in Part A are in addition to the amounts already allocated by the Public Utilities
Page 221 - 132LR3049(37)

Commission for low-income electric ratepayer assistance under the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3214, subsection 2.
PART FFFF
Sec. FFFF-1. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶R, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595,
§2, is further amended to read:
R. Persons in the employment of the Department of Health and Human Services on
October 1, 2025 or hired thereafter who have the job classification of Mental Health
Worker I, Mental Health Worker II, Mental Health Worker III or Mental Health
Worker IV; and
Sec. FFFF-2. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶S, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 595, §3,
is amended to read:
S. Persons in the employment of the Department of Public Safety on August 1, 2026
or hired thereafter who have the job classification of emergency communications
director.;
Sec. FFFF-3. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶T is enacted to read:
T. Employees of the Office of Chief Medical Examiner within the Department of the
Attorney General on August 1, 2026 or hired thereafter; and
Sec. FFFF-4. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶U is enacted to read:
U. Persons in the employment of the Department of Health and Human Services on
August 1, 2026 or hired thereafter who provide crisis outreach and crisis services to
adults with developmental disabilities or intellectual disabilities in a community-based
or residential setting and who have the job classification of Community Response
Worker.
Sec. FFFF-5. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595, §4, is
further amended to read:
2. Qualification for benefits. A member employed in any one or a combination of
the capacities specified in subsection 1 after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; any employee identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
R; after July 31, 2026 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph S; any employee
identified in subsection 1, paragraph T; after July 31, 2026 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph U; and any employee identified in subsection 1, paragraph L,
qualifies for a service retirement benefit if that member either:
A. Is at least 55 years of age and has completed at least 10 years of creditable service
under the 1998 Special Plan in any one or a combination of the capacities; or
B. Has completed at least 25 years of creditable service in any one or a combination
of the capacities specified in subsection 1, whether or not the creditable service
Page 222 - 132LR3049(37)

included in determining that the 25-year requirement has been met was earned under
the 1998 Special Plan or prior to its establishment.
Sec. FFFF-6. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595,
§5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Service credit purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated
contributions following termination of service is included only to the extent that
time to which the refund relates was served after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B;
after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H;
after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to
K; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
Q in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1. Service
credit may be purchased for service by an employee identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs L, M, R and, S, T and U regardless of when performed; and
Sec. FFFF-7. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595,
§6, is further amended to read:
A. If all of the member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the
capacities specified in subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U; if service credit
was purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for
service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1 after
June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after
September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after
July 31, 2026 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U;
or if service credit was purchased by other than the repayment of an earlier refund and
eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit, including, but not limited to,
service credit for military service, was achieved after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
Page 223 - 132LR3049(37)

30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U, the benefit must be
computed as provided in section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A.
(1) If the member had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the benefit
under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3, paragraphs A and B.
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced by 6% for each year
that the member's age precedes 55 years of age.
Sec. FFFF-8. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595,
§7, is further amended to read:
B. Except as provided in paragraphs D, E, F, G and, H, I and J, if some part of the
member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in
subsection 1 was earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
M; before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; before
October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and before
August 1, 2026 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U
and some part of the member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the
capacities specified in subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U, then the member's
service retirement benefit must be computed in segments and the amount of the
member's service retirement benefit is the sum of the segments. The segments must be
computed as follows:
(1) The segment or, if the member served in more than one of the capacities
specified in subsection 1 and the benefits related to the capacities are not
interchangeable under section 17856, segments that reflect creditable service
earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
Page 224 - 132LR3049(37)

before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and
before August 1, 2026 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
paragraphs S to U or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated
contributions for service before July 1, 1998, for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; before October 1, 2021 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph Q; before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph R; and before August 1, 2026 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U in a capacity or capacities specified in
subsection 1 or purchased by other than the repayment of a refund and eligibility
to make the purchase of the service credit, including, but not limited to, service
credit for military service, was achieved before July 1, 1998 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; before July 1, 2002 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; before July 1, 2020 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; before October 1, 2021 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; before October 1, 2025 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and before August 1, 2026 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U, must be computed under
section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is qualified under
subsection 2, paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount of the
segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection
3, paragraphs A and B; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount
of the segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3‑A; and
(2) The segment that reflects creditable service earned after June 30, 1998 and
before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C
to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after
June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after
September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after
September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and
after July 31, 2026 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs
S to U or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions
for service after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees
Page 225 - 132LR3049(37)

identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U in any one or a
combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1, or purchased by other than
the repayment of a refund and eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit,
including, but not limited to, service credit for military service, was achieved after
June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U must be computed under section 17852,
subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is qualified under subsection 2,
paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment amount
must be reduced in the manner provided in section 17852, subsection 3,
paragraphs A and B for each year that the member's age precedes 55 years of
age; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment
amount must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. FFFF-9. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. The service retirement benefit of a member to whom subsection 1, paragraph T
applies and who qualifies for service retirement benefits under subsection 2 must be
computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A on the basis of all of the
member's creditable service in the capacity specified in subsection 1, paragraph T,
regardless of when that creditable service was earned, except that for a member
qualifying under subsection 2, paragraph B:
(1) If the member had 10 years of service on July 1, 1993, the benefit must be
reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection 3, paragraphs A and B for each
year the member's age precedes 55 years of age; or
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. FFFF-10. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶J is enacted to read:
Page 226 - 132LR3049(37)

J. The service retirement benefit of a member to whom subsection 1, paragraph U
applies and who qualifies for service retirement benefits under subsection 2 must be
computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A on the basis of all of the
member's creditable service in the capacity specified in subsection 1, paragraph U,
regardless of when that creditable service was earned, except that for a member
qualifying under subsection 2, paragraph B:
(1) If the member had 10 years of service on July 1, 1993, the benefit must be
reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection 3, paragraphs A and B for each
year the member's age precedes 55 years of age; or
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. FFFF-11. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2025, c. 595, §9,
is further amended to read:
5. Contributions. Notwithstanding any provision of subchapter 3 to the contrary,
after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; after
September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; after September
30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; and after July 31, 2026 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs S to U, a member in the
capacities specified in subsection 1 must contribute to the State Employee and Teacher
Retirement Program or have pick-up contributions made at the rate of 8.65% of earnable
compensation until the member has completed 25 years of creditable service as provided
in this section and at the rate of 7.65% thereafter.
PART GGGG
Sec. GGGG-1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 15 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 15
MAINE EVICTION PREVENTION PROGRAM
§4994-D. Maine Eviction Prevention Program
The Maine Eviction Prevention Program, referred to in this section as "the program,"
is established within the Maine State Housing Authority to provide rental assistance to
individuals.
1. Eligibility; income. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish eligibility
criteria and application requirements for participation in the program consistent with the
requirements under this subchapter. A program applicant's income may not exceed 60%
of the area median income, adjusted for family size, in accordance with federal standards
Page 227 - 132LR3049(37)

generally accepted as of the effective date of this subchapter and comparable to the
standards of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
2. Rental assistance. A participant in the program is eligible to receive up to $800
per month in rental assistance paid directly to the participant's landlord for up to 12 months.
3. Assistance priority. Rental assistance under this subchapter must be awarded in
the following order of priority:
A. As the first priority, participants who have received a summons and complaint for
forcible entry and detainer;
B. As the 2nd priority, participants who receive an eviction notice for nonpayment of
rent; and
C. As the 3rd priority, participants who pay over 30% of their income in rent.
4. Payment requirement. A participant in the program is required to pay 30% of the
participant's income toward the participant's rental obligation.
5. Rent requirement. A participant in the program must reside in a rental unit in
which the rent is at or below 125% of the fair market rent established by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 24 Code of Federal
Regulations, Section 888.113 for the household size in the area in which the rental unit is
located.
6. Eviction for cause. A landlord may evict a program participant only for cause
during any month rental assistance is paid by the program.
7. Program administration. The Maine State Housing Authority shall delegate
administration of the program and provide appropriate funding to one or more of the
following: a designated community action agency as described by Title 22, section 5324;
a municipal housing authority; or any other qualified entity as determined by the Maine
State Housing Authority. An entity delegated to administer the program shall develop a
method of verifying a participant's eligibility for the rental assistance every 6 months after
initial approval. An entity delegated to administer the program shall limit administrative
costs of the program to 12% or less of distributions received.
8. Rules. The Maine State Housing Authority may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
PART HHHH
Sec. HHHH-1. Transfer from General Fund; MaineCare Stabilization
Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027,
the State Controller shall transfer $31,250,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund to the MaineCare Stabilization Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account
within the Department of Health and Human Services to prevent any loss of services or
increased cost of services to a MaineCare member that would otherwise result from
insufficient General Fund appropriations, insufficient federal matching funds or any other
shortage of funds or changes in federal or state law, rule or policy.
Sec. HHHH-2. Transfer from General Fund; Education Stabilization
Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027,
Page 228 - 132LR3049(37)

the State Controller shall transfer $31,250,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund to the Education Stabilization Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account
within the Department of Education to prevent any reduction in the state share percentage
of the statewide adjusted total cost of the components of essential programs and services
that would otherwise result from insufficient General Fund appropriations or any other
shortage of funds.
Page 229 - 132LR3049(37)